GREEN  TRANSPORTATION  INFRASTRUCTURE:

CHALLENGES  TO  ACCESS  AND

IMPLEMENTATION

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

MAY  10,  2007

Serial No. 110–27

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

34–909PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2007

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
KEN  CALVERT,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

HON.  DAVID  WU,  Oregon,  Chairman

JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLIE  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
MIKE  ROSS,  Arizona
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas

MIKE  QUEAR  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

RACHEL  JAGODA  BRUNETTE  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

COLIN  MCCORMICK  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member
TIND  SHEPPER  RYEN  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

PIPER  LARGENT  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

MEGHAN  HOUSEWRIGHT  Research  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

May  10,  2007

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  David  Wu,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  Tech-
nology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  U.S.  House
of Representatives ................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Phil  Gingrey,  Ranking  Minority  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Technology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................

Panel  1:

Ms.  Gloria  M.  Shepherd,  Associate  Administrator,  Office  of  Planning,  Envi-
ronment,  and  Realty,  Federal  Highway  Administration,  U.S.  Department
of Transportation

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr. Benjamin H. Grumbles, Assistant Administrator for Water, U.S. Environ-

mental Protection Agency

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Panel  2:

Mr.  Sam  Adams,  Commissioner  of  Public  Utilities,  City  of  Portland,  Oregon
Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr.  Daniel  J.  Huffman,  Managing  Director,  National  Resources,  National

Ready Mixed Concrete Association

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr. Hal Kassoff, Senior Vice President for Sustainable Development, Parsons

Brinckerhoff

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

8
8

9
10

11
12
25

25
27
33
34

37
39
42

43
45
51

51
53
54
55

(III)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Ms.  Gloria  M.  Shepherd,  Associate  Administrator,  Office  of  Planning,  Envi-
ronment,  and  Realty,  Federal  Highway  Administration,  U.S.  Department
of Transportation .................................................................................................
Mr. Benjamin H. Grumbles, Assistant Administrator for Water, U.S. Environ-
mental Protection Agency ....................................................................................
Mr. Sam Adams, Commissioner of Public Utilities, City of Portland, Oregon ...
Mr.  Daniel  J.  Huffman,  Managing  Director,  National  Resources,  National
Ready Mixed Concrete Association .....................................................................
Mr. Hal Kassoff, Senior Vice President for Sustainable Development, Parsons
Brinckerhoff ..........................................................................................................

Page

66

70
74

76

80

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Statement of the Interlocking Concrete Pavement Institute (ICPI) ....................

84

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

GREEN  TRANSPORTATION  INFRASTRUCTURE:
CHALLENGES  TO  ACCESS  AND  IMPLEMEN-
TATION

THURSDAY,  MAY  10,  2007

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  2:30  p.m.,  in  Room
2318 of the Rayburn House Office Building, Hon. David Wu [Chair-
man of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Green Transportation Infrastructure:

Challenges to Access and

Implementation

THURSDAY, MAY 10, 2007

2:00 P.M.–4:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

On  Thursday,  May  10,  the  Subcommittee  on  Technology  and  Innovation  of  the
Committee  on  Science  and  Technology  will  hold  a  hearing  to  examine  options  for
construction  technologies  and  materials  available  for  transportation  infrastructure
that  contribute  to  stormwater  management  and  control  of  non-point  source  water
pollution.  Federal  and  local  government  officials  and  industry  representatives  will
also address barriers to widespread implementation of these technologies.
2. Witnesses
Ms.  Gloria  Shepherd  is  the  Associate  Administrator  for  Planning,  Environment,
and Realty at the Federal Highway Administration (FHWA) of the U.S. Department
of Transportation (DOT).
Mr.  Benjamin  Grumbles  is  the  Assistant  Administrator  for  the  Office  of  Water
at the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).
Mr.  Sam  Adams  is  the  Commissioner  of  Public  Utilities  for  the  City  of  Portland,
Oregon. His jurisdiction includes the Bureau of Environmental Services and the Of-
fice of Transportation.
Mr.  Dan  Huffman  is  the  Managing  Director  for  National  Resources  for  the  Na-
tional Ready Mixed Concrete Association (NRMCA).
Mr. Hal Kassoff is the Senior Vice President for Sustainable Development at Par-
sons Brinckerhoff, a leading infrastructure engineering firm.

3. Brief Overview

• Transportation  infrastructure  such  as  roads  and  parking  lots  contribute  to
pollution  of  ground  and  surface  water  because  they  are  impervious  surfaces
and  collect  a  high  concentration  of  contaminants.  Stormwater  washes  pollut-
ants  off  of  hard  surfaces  and  concentrates  runoff  into  streams,  lakes,  and
bays  without  filtration  that  could  mitigate  the  effect  of  the  contaminants.  In
addition,  these  hard  surfaces  concentrate  rainfall  during  storms  and  empty
the  flow  of  water  immediately  via  storm  sewers  intro  streams,  rivers,  and
lakes,  unlike  the  slow,  natural  filtration  when  rain  falls  on  undeveloped
ground.  The  results—flooding,  increased  sedimentation  and  erosion,  and  pol-
lution of ecosystems.
• Engineers  have  developed  numerous  technologies  that  can  be  incorporated
into  transportation  infrastructure  which  contribute  to  controlling  stormwater
and  mitigating  non-point  source  water  pollution.  These  green  infrastructure
technologies help absorb and filter excess runoff, rather than funneling runoff
into large sewer pipes that empty directly into detention ponds or water treat-
ment  facilities,  which  can  easily  become  overwhelmed  during  heavy  rainfall.
• There has not been widespread implementation of green transportation infra-
structure by governments or private industry. There are technical, social, and
regulatory barriers to implementation which are being addressed to some ex-
tent by the Federal Government and private non-profit organizations, but ad-
ditional efforts are necessary.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

4. Issues and Concerns
What future research is necessary, both in the area of technology develop-
ment and testing and evaluation? A common argument against the use of green
transportation  infrastructure  by  governments  and  private  industry  is  the  lack  of
data (or the lack of awareness of data) supporting the claims that these technologies
control runoff and reduce non-point source pollution. Additional testing and evalua-
tion  as  well  as  more  robust  public  awareness  campaigns  could  ease  concerns  that
green infrastructure technologies are ineffective. Testing and evaluation should also
cover the traditional criteria used to judge transportation infrastructure: safety, reli-
ability,  and  cost.  Currently,  the  EPA  depends  on  outside  groups  for  data  collection,
and  as  a  result,  data  tends  to  be  incomplete  and  only  covers  specific  projects,  not
overall technology performance in a variety of settings. Because EPA uses perform-
ance-based  standards  to  determine  whether  technologies  effectively  contribute  to
preventing  water  pollution,  the  lack  of  data  makes  it  especially  difficult  to  get  ap-
proval to use new technology from some regional administrators.

The  American  Association  of  State  Highway  and  Transportation  Officials
(AASHTO) maintains a database of all proposed research projects proposed by State
departments of transportation in the field of environmental protection. The proposed
research  is  intended  to  meet  specific  needs  of  transportation  officials,  and  covers
broad  topics  such  as  noise,  energy,  wildlife  protection,  and  water  management.  In
the  area  of  stormwater  management,  states  have  proposed  over  30  different  re-
search  projects  that  would  provide  further  data  and  feedback  on  the  use  of  green
transportation  infrastructure.  The  results  would  be  a  valuable  tool  for  helping  con-
vince  State  and  local  transportation  officials  and  private  industry  of  the  effective-
ness  of  these  technologies.  Unfortunately,  research  funding  is  limited,  and  many
proposed projects are not carried out.
How  should  a  builder  determine  which  type  of  green  transportation  infra-
structure  technology  is  most  appropriate  for  their  project?  How  should
that technology be integrated into the overall stormwater management sys-
tem? One of the primary reasons builders resist incorporating green transportation
infrastructure  technologies  into  their  design  plans  is  the  lack  of  understanding  of
the  different  options.  Given  that  even  EPA  regional  offices  do  not  have  universal
expertise in this area, it is not surprising that builders are reluctant to invest time
and effort in familiarizing themselves with green technologies. One of the most com-
plicated  aspects  of  planning  designs  that  incorporate  green  infrastructure  is  deter-
mining  the  most  appropriate  technologies  to  use  for  a  particular  climate  and  built
environment.  A  technology  appropriate  for  a  major  urban  center  in  the  Northeast
would likely not be effective for a more rural area in the desert Southwest. Addition-
ally,  these  technologies  do  not  operate  independently,  but  are  most  effective  when
they  are  integrated  into  an  overall  stormwater  management  and  sewer  system.
Since  the  technologies  are  relatively  new,  many  builders  do  not  have  the  expertise
necessary to efficiently integrate the design into an existing water management sys-
tem.  EPA  is  working  to  educate  designers  and  builders  through  the  use  of  fact
sheets  on  the  various  technologies,  but  additional  efforts  are  necessary  to  facilitate
broader implementation.
What  should  the  Federal  Government  do  to  facilitate  adoption  of  green
transportation  infrastructure  by  State  and  local  governments  and  private
companies?  How  can  federal  agencies  coordinate  effectively  to  maximize
use of green technologies? Federal action on the issue of green transportation in-
frastructure has been generally limited to research and development, public aware-
ness  campaigns,  and  demonstration  projects.  While  these  efforts  are  laudable,  the
Federal Government could provide stronger incentives for using these types of tech-
nology.  Federal  agencies  can  also  set  a  good  example  by  using  green  infrastructure
practices at their facilities around the country, thus demonstrating that these tech-
nologies are useful in many climates and settings around the country.

There  are  also  federal  funding  sources  that  could  be  used  to  provide  incentives
for the use of green infrastructure. In March, the House passed H.R. 720, the Water
Quality  Financing  Act  of  2007,  which  authorized  the  use  of  EPA  grant  money—
which  previously  had  been  limited  to  funding  traditional  stormwater  management
infrastructure  such  as  sewer  pipes—for  green  infrastructure.  Federal  funding  for
green  transportation  infrastructure  elements  both  provides  a  financial  incentive  for
their  use  by  states  and  municipalities  and  indicates  federal  recognition  of  the  tech-
nology’s effectiveness.

Additionally,  better  coordination  between  federal  agencies  is  necessary  to  allow
new  technologies  into  the  marketplace  without  being  impeded  by  federal  regula-
tions.  Currently,  some  EPA  regions  do  not  allow  the  use  of  innovative  technologies

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

in  spite  of  work  performed  by  other  federal  agencies,  including  FHWA,  that  dem-
onstrates  their  effectiveness.  Improving  coordination  between  R&D  agencies  and
regulatory  agencies  can  help  ensure  that  technology  transfer  is  not  hampered  by
outdated regulations.
5. Background

The  information  in  this  section  is  summarized  from  the  National  Cooperative
Highway Research Program’s 2006 report, Evaluation of Best Management Practices
for Highway Runoff Control.
Environmental Problems Associated With Runoff

Changes in the amount of land covered by surfaces that are impervious to water,
such as roads or parking lots, can have significant impacts on an area’s natural hy-
drology, potentially resulting in flooding, pollution, or aquatic ecosystem destruction.
Due  to  their  impermeable  nature,  roads  and  parking  lots  decrease  the  amount  of
rainwater that will infiltrate into the ground, leading to an increase in the amount
of  rainwater  that  runs  over  the  surface  of  the  ground,  referred  to  as  ‘‘surface  run-
off.’’  An  area  that  is  fully  paved  has  on  average  of  15  to  20  times  the  amount  of
runoff as a completely undeveloped area. Thus, streams, rivers, lakes and other bod-
ies  of  surface  water  receive  a  greater  volume  of  runoff  under  developed  conditions
than  they  would  under  undeveloped  conditions.  They  also  receive  the  peak  flow  of
this  surface  runoff  much  sooner  than  they  would  under  natural  conditions,  where
water would filter through slowly. These changes in volume and timing can degrade
the  physical  characteristics  of  streams  and  rivers.  Increases  in  erosion  will  widen
channels, decrease the stability of banks, and widen flood plains. These changes af-
fect the fish and other animals and plants. Additionally, these changes to the water-
shed can increase the possibility that a stream will experience reduced or intermit-
tent flow during some times of the year, since there is less groundwater to recharge
the  stream  and  the  flow  of  runoff  into  the  stream  is  no  longer  gradual  but  instead
very sharp. Thus, developed areas have a significant and far-ranging environmental
impact.

Runoff  from  highways  contributes  to  non-point  source  pollution—the  type  of  non-
localized  pollution  emission  that  is  responsible  for  over  80  percent  of  the  degrada-
tion of the Nation’s surface water. Stormwater moves over agricultural land, lawns,
urban areas, and other types of human land-use, washing chemicals like fertilizers,
heavy  metals,  and  harmful  bacteria  into  surface  water.  Highway  and  other  trans-
portation  installations  are  major  contributors  to  this  type  of  pollution.  The  most
common  contaminants  in  highway  runoff  are  metals,  inorganic  salts,  aromatic  hy-
drocarbons  (such  as  the  carcinogenic  chemical  benzene)  and  suspended  solids  that
accumulate on the road surface as a result of regular highway operations and main-
tenance activities.
Runoff Mitigation Methods

To be an effective tool in countering the negative impact of rainfall runoff, mitiga-
tion measures must reduce the speed and volume of flow and treat or reduce pollut-
ants.  Mitigation  techniques  rely  on  structural  and  non-structural  best  management
practices  (BMPs)  to  address  these  goals.  Structural  measures  are  installations  like
infiltration  basins  and  trenches,  detention  and  retention  ponds,  constructed  wet-
lands,  vegetated  swales  and  filter  strips,  and  filtration  systems.  Generally  they  are
above  ground  and  rely  on  passive  methods  to  accomplish  treatment  goals.  Some
highly urbanized areas use underground, proprietary systems. Non-structural meas-
ures  are  designed  to  control  runoff  and  pollution  problems  at  their  source;  they  in-
clude practices such as street sweeping and reductions in fertilizer applications.

Stormwater  managers  generally  choose  their  treatment  technique  by  evaluating
the amount of land available, the cost of implementation and operation and mainte-
nance  of  the  technology,  and  the  treatment  objectives.  Attenuation  methods,  or  re-
ducing  the  size  of  the  peak  runoff  flow,  can  be  accomplished  by  intercepting  the
rainfall  with  vegetation  and  avoiding  overly  efficient  conveyance  systems  (such  as
large  storm  drains)  and  detention  ponds.  All  of  these  serve  the  purpose  of  slowing
the  water  as  it  travels  to  the  ground  or  surface  water.  Reductions  in  stormwater
volume can be accomplished with retention, infiltration and evapo-transpiration (the
water lost through evaporation and plant processes).

Low-impact development is a comprehensive design strategy intended to maintain
the  natural  hydrology  of  an  area  even  after  roads  and  other  infrastructure  are  in-
stalled.  It  embodies  the  principles  of  conservation,  minimization  of  impact,  and
maintenance  of  natural  watershed  hydrologic  timing.  Ideally,  low  impact  develop-
ment  should  be  designed  to  replicate  pre-development  conditions  as  much  as  pos-
sible.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Current Federal Programs

6

While most of the decisions regarding implementation of green transportation in-
frastructure  are  made  at  the  State  and  local  level,  there  are  federal  programs  ad-
dressing  the  issue  of  non-point  source  water  pollution  control  in  transportation  in-
frastructure. The Green Highways Partnership (GHP) is the primary federal vehicle
for  encouraging  the  use  of  green  transportation  infrastructure  by  State  and  local
governments  and  private  industry.  EPA  and  FHWA  are  the  chief  federal  partici-
pants  in  the  partnership,  which  includes  an  expanding  list  of  State  departments  of
transportation,  trade  organizations,  municipal  governments,  and  non-profit  organi-
zations. The Partnership’s activities focus on planning and design, construction, and
operations and maintenance of green transportation infrastructure, and include pilot
projects that demonstrate cost-effective, environmentally-sound transportation infra-
structure  technologies  that  meet  State  performance  requirements.  GHP  includes  a
specific  program  on  watershed-driven  stormwater  management  which  includes  the
development of best practices and performance standards, and the collection of data
and modeling results to better understand the benefits of green technologies.

FHWA,  through  the  Surface  Transportation  Environment  and  Planning  (STEP)
Cooperative  Research  Program,  also  conducts  research  to  improve  air  quality  and
climate,  wetlands,  and  water  quality  and  ecosystems  as  part  of  its  environmental
research  initiative.  Stormwater-control  related  projects  include  basic  research  into
the  contribution  of  impervious  surfaces  to  runoff,  and  development  of  methods  to
rapidly assess the effects of highways on adjoining ecosystems.

Additional  research  projects  are  supported  through  the  Transportation  Research
Board (TRB), a FHWA-funded arm of the National Research Council (NRC). As part
of the National Cooperative Highway Research Program, TRB has sponsored evalua-
tions  of  best  management  practices  for  highway  runoff,  long  term  data  collections
on  the  effect  of  highway  construction  on  habitats,  and  other  projects  related  to  the
effect of transportation infrastructure on non-point source water pollution. The EPA
Office of Water participates in TRB committees, and assists in the translation of re-
search results into usable manuals and guides for State and local agencies.

The  EPA  Office  of  Water  also  supports  the  use  of  green  infrastructure  through
the  National  Menu  of  Storm  Water  Best  Practices,  a  web-based  database  of
stormwater  management  options  for  local  authorities.  EPA  developed  this  database
beginning in 2000. The database includes information and builder specifications for
a  variety  of  green  transportation  infrastructure  technologies.  The  Office  of  Water
has  also  begun  cooperating  with  environmental  non-profit  organizations  to  promote
the use of these practices among local governments. They provide additional support
to  State  and  local  governments  through  the  development  of  fact  sheets  that  specify
which technologies are suited to various environments around the country.
6. Challenges to Implementation

Though  research  has  shown  significant  benefits  in  terms  of  stormwater  manage-
ment  and  control  of  non-point  source  water  pollution,  technologies  such  as  bio-
swales  and  pervious  pavement  have  not  been  adopted  in  many  jurisdictions  or  by
private  entities.  There  are  numerous  barriers  to  full  adoption  of  green  infrastruc-
ture,  including  technical  problems,  regulatory  challenges,  and  general  industry  re-
sistance to changing practices.
Technical Challenges

The  installation  of  green  transportation  infrastructure  can  be  impeded  by  prob-
lems  of  high  cost  and  availability  of  space  for  technologies.  For  measures  that  are
installed  directly  on  the  roadway,  unless  new  infrastructure  is  being  constructed,
there are high costs associated with removing old materials and installing new sur-
faces.  Additionally,  the  disruption  to  traffic  and  business  is  extremely  costly.  In
many  urban  areas,  there  is  also  not  space  on  the  roadside  or  around  parking  lots
to  install  measures  such  as  bio-swales,  limiting  local  governments’  choices  of  tech-
nology.

Various  climates  can  also  present  unique  challenges  to  implementation.  In  areas
where  very  cold  weather  is  common,  technologies  that  retain  water  for  slow  filtra-
tion are susceptible to freezing. Freeze/thaw cycles can shorten the lifespan of infra-
structure,  as  well  as  limiting  its  ability  to  effectively  filter  pollutants  from  runoff.
Further  research  will  help  develop  better  guidelines  as  to  which  technologies  are
most appropriate for various climates.
Regulatory Challenges

Federal,  State,  and  local  government  agencies  have  taken  an  active  role  in  pro-
moting the use of green transportation infrastructure, but paradoxically, those same
entities have often erected regulatory barriers which prevent widespread implemen-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

tation.  On  the  federal  level,  the  U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency  (EPA)  has
begun  promoting  the  use  of  green  infrastructure,  including  transportation  infra-
structure, through its Office of Water. In March 2007, Assistant Administrator Ben
Grumbles  released  a  memo  to  regional  administrators  encouraging  the  acceptance
of green infrastructure to protect water quality (Appendix I). The EPA also recently
signed  an  agreement  with  a  number  of  environmental  organizations  to  assist  State
and local governments in implementing green infrastructure projects.

However,  though  the  Office  of  Water  has  been  a  strong  advocate  for  green  infra-
structure  projects,  there  are  regulatory  barriers  internal  to  the  EPA  that  prevent
those projects from moving forward. Through the Clean Water Act, the National Pol-
lutant  Discharge  Elimination  System  (NPDES)  permit  program  gives  EPA  the  au-
thority to regulate sources of water that release pollutants into ground and surface
water. The program is administered on a regional level, and regional administrators
have discretion over defining a green infrastructure technology as a source of water
that is covered by NPDES. If technologies such as pervious pavement or bio-swales,
which  filter  runoff  before  it  flows  into  the  ground  or  surface  water,  are  considered
‘‘point  sources’’  that  inject  water  directly  into  the  ground.  EPA  regulations  require
permitting  procedures  that  act  as  a  significant  disincentive  to  use  these  tech-
nologies.

For example, when the City of Portland was preparing its ‘‘Clean River Plan’’ for
the Willamette River in 2000 and 2001, the city planners wanted to incorporate bio-
swales as part of the runoff management plan. However, the EPA regional adminis-
trator  was  not  familiar  with  research  results  which  indicated  that  bio-swales  effec-
tively  filtered  pollutants  from  runoff,  and  required  extensive  permitting  and  moni-
toring  systems  under  the  NPDES  authority,  thus  creating  a  financial  disincentive
for the use of bio-swales. Conversely, in other regions, EPA regional administrators
have  taken  a  leadership  role,  reducing  the  bureaucratic  barriers  to  implementing
projects  using  green  infrastructure.  The  Office  of  Water’s  initiative  has  a  goal  of
standardizing implementation procedures across the various regions.

State  and  local  authorities  can  sometimes  also  be  at  fault  in  preventing  imple-
mentation  of  green  transportation  infrastructure,  but  unlike  federal  laws  that  spe-
cifically  disallow  the  use  of  green  technologies  without  extensive  permitting,  State
and  local  authorities  tend  to  fail  to  explicitly  allow  their  use.  As  a  result,  govern-
ments  or  private  companies  within  the  jurisdiction  who  propose  the  use  of  green
transportation  infrastructure  are  not  given  approval  simply  because  the  innovative
technologies  have  not  been  previously  considered  by  the  regulating  authority.  The
problem  is  then  self-perpetuating,  as  these  local  governments  block  all  potential
demonstration  projects,  and  then  continue  to  deny  builders  on  the  basis  that  there
have  been  no  successful  demonstration  projects.  Of  course,  many  cities  have  acted
as leaders in the green transportation infrastructure initiative, but the challenge re-
mains to universalize its use across local jurisdictions.
Social Challenges

Finally,  there  are  social  challenges  to  widespread  implementation  of  green  trans-
portation  infrastructure.  The  transportation  construction  industry  is  highly  decen-
tralized,  and  stakeholders  range  from  State  governments  to  private  developers.  As
a  whole,  the  industry  tends  to  be  risk-averse,  and  hence  reluctant  to  adopt  tech-
nologies  that  may  be  considered  experimental  or  unproven  because  of  concerns
about  high  cost,  reliability,  maintenance,  or  simply  confusion  about  the  best  prod-
ucts  to  use.  The  slow  adoption  of  these  technologies  has  also  led  to  a  shortage  of
trained  contractors  who  are  able  to  properly  design  and  install  integrated  systems,
making implementation more difficult and costly.

Numerous companies, non-profits, and industry organizations have developed pro-
grams  to  specifically  promote  environmentally-friendly  advances  in  construction
techniques  and  technologies  with  varying  levels  of  success.  Market-driven  tech-
niques are most effective: demonstrating that green transportation infrastructure is
attractive  to  consumers  as  part  of  a  corporate  citizenship  initiative  has  been  an  ef-
fective  means  of  encouraging  implementation.  For  example,  Turner  Construction
Company,  one  of  the  largest  construction  companies  in  the  United  States,  recently
worked  with  Wal-Mart  to  develop  a  ‘‘green  supercenter’’  which  incorporated  green
transportation  elements  such  as  bio-swales  and  pervious  pavement  as  part  of  an
overall  sustainability  initiative  that  was  formulated  to  build  community  goodwill.
The EPA and FHWA, through the Transportation Research Board (TRB), have also
dedicated  some  resources  towards  training  programs,  but  the  scope  of  these  pro-
grams is limited because of budgetary constraints.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

Chairman  WU.  I  call  the  Subcommittee  to  order.  I  would  like  to
welcome  everyone  to  this  hearing  on  Green  Transportation  Infra-
structure: Challenges to Access and Implementation.

The  Committee  has  heard  a  lot  of  testimony  over  the  last  five
months  on  high-tech  methods  to  mitigate  climate  change.  Today,  I
want  to  hear  about  simpler  methods  for  protecting  our  lakes,  riv-
ers, and oceans. I have invited today’s witnesses because they each
give a unique perspective in the field of green transportation infra-
structure.

Now,  this  is  a  term  that  is  not  necessarily  well  known  outside
of  environmental  circles.  Simply  put,  green  transportation  infra-
structure  is  the  use  of  materials,  methods,  and  methods  for  con-
struction  of  roads,  highways,  and  parking  lots  that  minimize  envi-
ronmental  impact.  Today,  we  will  hear  about  the  materials  and
technologies that specifically contribute to the minimization of non-
point source water pollution.

Runoff  is  a  major  contributor  to  water  pollution,  especially  from
roads and parking lots, which concentrate oil, gasoline, heavy met-
als,  and  other  pollutants,  which  then  flow  unimpeded  into  our  na-
tion’s  waterways.  For  example,  a  one  acre  parking  lot  produces  16
times  the  runoff  of  a  one  acre  meadow.  In  recent  years,  local  gov-
ernments and companies and private citizens have been working to
develop  simple,  yet  innovative  solutions  that  integrate  control  of
non-point  source  water  pollution  into  the  existing  infrastructure.
The  results,  a  common  sense,  low  cost,  low  maintenance  system
that  reduces  pollution,  prevents  flooding,  protects  ecosystems,  and
maintains a more natural hydrological environment.

I  would  like  to  thank  our  witnesses  for  testifying  today.  Our
challenge  today  is  not  the  development  of  new  technologies.  It  is
to get people to start using the technologies that we do have. I hope
that  at  the  end  of  this  hearing,  that  we  have  learned  a  lot  about
technologies  for  controlling  non-point  source  water  pollution  that
can  be  integrated  into  transportation  infrastructure.  I  am  short-
ening my opening statement in the interests of adjusting to the flex
of  our  Committee  schedule  and  our  Floor  schedule,  and  I  will  sub-
mit my full statement into the record.

I  would  like  to  recognize  my  good  colleague  from  Georgia,  Dr.
Gingrey,  the  Ranking  Member  of  this  committee,  for  his  opening
statement.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Wu follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN DAVID WU

I would like to call the Subcommittee to order.
I  want  to  welcome  everyone  to  this  morning’s  hearing  on  Green  Transportation
Infrastructure: Challenges to Access and Implementation. The Committee has heard
a  lot  of  testimony  over  the  last  five  months  on  high-tech  ways  to  mitigate  climate
change. Today I want to hear about simpler methods for protecting our lakes, rivers
and  oceans.  I’ve  invited  today’s  witnesses  because  they  each  a  unique  perspective
in  the  field  of  green  transportation  infrastructure.  Now  this  is  a  term  that  is  not
necessarily well known outside of environmental circles. Simply put, green transpor-
tation  infrastructure  is  the  use  of  materials  and  methods  for  construction  of  roads,
highways,  and  parking  lots  that  minimize  environmental  impact.  Today  we  will
hear  about  the  materials  and  technologies  that  specifically  contribute  to  the  mini-
mization of non-point source water pollution.

Runoff  is  a  major  contributor  to  water  pollution,  especially  from  roads  and  park-
ing  lots  which  concentrate  oil,  gasoline,  heavy  metals,  and  other  pollutants  which
then  flow  unimpeded  into  our  nation’s  water.  For  example,  a  one-acre  parking  lot

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

produces  16  times  the  runoff  of  a  one-acre  meadow.  In  recent  years,  local  govern-
ments, companies, and private citizens have been working to develop simple yet in-
novative solutions that integrate control of non-point source water pollution into the
existing infrastructure. The results: a common sense, low cost, low maintenance sys-
tem that reduces pollution, prevents flooding, protects ecosystems, and maintains a
more natural hydrological environment.

On paper, these technologies look like no-brainers. So why don’t we see them used
more often? While there are technological issues and research that needs to be car-
ried  out  to  prove  their  effectiveness,  the  biggest  impediments  are  State  and  federal
regulations.  Clean  water  is  regulated  by  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency  on
a  regional  basis,  and  some  regional  administrators,  including  in  my  home  district
of  Portland,  are  not  familiar  with  the  benefits  of  using  green  infrastructure  for  fil-
tering runoff. Because of they have discretion to approve or disapprove technologies,
some  of  these  administrators  tend  to  rely  on  standard  operating  procedures  and
steer clear of innovative solutions. We’ll hear this afternoon from Assistant Adminis-
trator  Ben  Grumbles  of  the  EPA’s  Office  of  Water,  who  is  taking  the  lead  at  his
agency  to  educate  the  EPA  regional  administrators  across  the  country  about  green
infrastructure  technologies.  I  hope  to  be  able  to  work  with  Assistant  Administrator
Grumbles  to  promote  the  implementation  of  green  transportation  infrastructure
projects across the country.

We  also  need  to  see  better  coordination  among  the  federal  agencies  working  on
the  R&D  and  regulatory  aspects  of  green  transportation  infrastructure.  Technology
development must not happen in a vacuum. The DOT, EPA, universities, and other
stakeholders must work together to make sure that technology fits into the current
regulatory structure. Likewise, regulators must be flexible enough to evaluate tech-
nology  according  to  its  performance.  In  addition,  the  Federal  Government  should
take the lead in training the private sector to insist on the use of green technologies
for all new developments.

Thank you again to our witnesses for testifying today. Our challenge today is not
to  development  new  technologies.  It’s  to  get  people  to  start  using  the  technologies
we’ve  got.  I  hope  at  the  end  of  this  hearing  that  we’ve  learned  a  lot  about  tech-
nologies for controlling non-point source water pollution that can be integrated into
transportation infrastructure. I hope we also gain a better understanding of how to
facilitate  implementation  of  these  technologies  in  the  public  and  private  sectors  to
better  protect  our  nation’s  precious  water.  I’d  now  like  to  recognize  my  colleague,
Ranking Member Gingrey, for an opening statement.

Mr.  GINGREY.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you,  and  I  thank  the  wit-
nesses.  I  apologize  to  the  witnesses.  I  had  memorized  my  18  page
opening  statement,  and  in  the  interest  of  time,  my  staff  has  re-
dacted  it  so  much  now  that  I  am  going  to  have  to  read  it,  because
it is a different statement. But thank you so much, Mr. Chairman,
for having this important hearing.

Roads  and  highways  let  people  in  the  smallest  towns  reach  out
to  the  largest  cities.  They  let  urban  workers  escape  to  more  tran-
quil homes outside of the city, and they let mom and pop stores in
Cedartown, Georgia, in my district, ship their wares easily, quickly,
and affordably. In short, they form the fabric that keeps this coun-
try connected and competitive.

Unfortunately,  roads  and  highways  have  also  left  an  indelible
mark  on  our  environment.  Today,  I  am  looking  forward  to  hearing
our distinguished panel discuss how we can further reduce, maybe
even  negate  environmental  degradation  associated  with  our  trans-
portation  system.  From  reviewing  your  testimony,  it  appears  that
green  or  sustainable  highway  technologies  could  be  a  win-win  for
everyone  involved.  However,  it  is  also  clear  that  we  are  not  quite
there yet.

And  I  would  like  to  close  by,  again,  thanking  you  for  coming  be-
fore the Committee today to discuss this very, very important topic.
I am looking forward to hearing your thoughts, and starting a dia-
logue  with  you  on  how  we  can  improve  our  nation’s  environment
and support our critical highway infrastructure.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

And Mr. Chairman, I will yield back the balance of my time.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Gingrey follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE PHIL GINGREY

Thank you Mr. Chairman and I want to also thank our panel of witnesses for tak-

ing the time to be with us here today.

Roads and highways have left an indelible mark on our nation’s history and char-
acter,  promoting  an  unprecedented  freedom  to  travel,  trade,  and  prosper.  Indeed,
the family car trip remains an icon of holiday festivities. . .along of course with the
inevitable cries of, ‘‘Are we there yet?’’ from the back seat.

Our  nation’s  transportation  infrastructure  not  only  allows  the  cross-country  trek
to Grandma’s house, but also allows our local grocery stores to sell fruits and vege-
tables  from  across  the  state,  across  the  country,  and  indeed  also  from  across  the
world.

Roads and highways let people in the smallest towns reach out to the largest cit-
ies.  They  let  urban  workers  escape  to  more  tranquil  homes  outside  the  city.  And
they  let  a  mom  and  pop  store  in  Cedartown,  GA  ship  their  wares  easily,  quickly,
and affordably. In short, they form the fabric that keeps this country connected and
competitive.

Unfortunately,  roads  and  highways  have  also  left  an  indelible  mark  on  our  envi-
ronment.  Air  and  water  quality  can  suffer  from  poorly  designed  or  over-used  roads
as  tailpipe  emissions  accumulate  in  the  air—and  oil,  dust,  and  chemicals  seep  into
the  watershed.  Road  construction  itself  can  damage  ecosystems,  clouding  streams
with  dirt  and  debris  or  filling  in  wetlands  that  protect  from  flooding  and  provide
precious habitat.

Over the years, local, State, and Federal governments have acted to contain these
harms  by  requiring  environmentally  responsible  planning  and  development  and  in-
vesting in cleaner and greener technologies and construction techniques.

Today, I’m looking forward to hearing our distinguished panel discuss how to fur-
ther  reduce,  maybe  even  negate,  environmental  degradation  associated  with  our
transportation system. From reviewing your testimony, it appears that green or sus-
tainable  highway  technologies  could  be  a  win-win  for  everyone  involved.  However,
it’s also clear that we’re not quite there yet.

There are a few key points that I hope we can discuss today. First, your testimony
points  out  that  measures  to  improve  highways  must  be  tailored  to  that  particular
road,  taking  into  account  the  local  terrain  and  weather,  the  broader  ecosystem  and
watershed, and the expected use of the road.

With all these variables at play, we can’t just assume that particular green high-
way technologies or practices will be effective everywhere. So, do we currently have
data  that  is  robust  enough  to  meet  the  needs  of  highway  administrators  and  engi-
neers in both Georgia and North Dakota? If not, do we have a research plan to help
make these technologies viable?

Second,  implementing  these  new  technologies  and  practices  will  require  close  co-
operation  between  large  groups  of  stakeholders;  contractors,  highway  and  environ-
mental  administrators  at  the  federal,  State,  and  local  level,  as  well  as  community
residents.

Communicating and coordinating with a large and diverse group like this is chal-
lenging in any circumstance, and I’d like to hear the panel’s thoughts on how green
highway practices can be better disseminated across the country.

I’d  like  to  close  by  again  thanking  you  for  coming  before  the  Committee  today  to
discuss this important topic. I’m looking forward to hearing your thoughts and start-
ing  a  dialogue  with  you  on  how  we  can  improve  our  nation’s  environment  and  sup-
port our critical highway infrastructure.

Mr. Chairman, I’ll yield the balance of my time.
Chairman WU. Thank you very much, Dr. Gingrey. Our first wit-
ness  is  Ms.  Gloria  Shepherd,  who  is  the  Associate  Administrator
for Planning, Environment, and Realty at the Federal Highway Ad-
ministration.

Let  us  see.  We  also  have  Mr.  Ben  Grumbles,  who  in  addition  to
being the Assistant Administrator of the Office of Water at the En-
vironmental  Protection  Agency  is  an  alumni  of  the  Science  and
Technology Committee staff. Welcome back.

I  also  have  a  special  welcome  for  our  next  two  witnesses,  who
both come from Oregon. City Commissioner Sam Adams was elect-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

ed  to  the  Portland  City  Council  in  2005.  He  oversees  the  Office  of
Transportation and the Bureau of Environmental Services. He has
taken  the  lead  in  developing  a  citywide  green-streets  policy,  which
requires  green  street  development  for  all  newly  constructed  or  re-
constructed roadways. Welcome, Sam.

Mr.  Dan  Huffman  is  the  Managing  Director  for  National  Re-
sources  for  the  National  Ready  Mixed  Concrete  Association,  and
also comes from Portland, Oregon.

Our final witness is Mr. Hal Kassoff, who is a Senior Vice Presi-

dent at Parsons Brinckerhoff, a leading construction firm.

And with that, Ms. Shepherd, please proceed.

Panel 1:

impacts 

STATEMENT  OF  MS.  GLORIA  M.  SHEPHERD,  ASSOCIATE  AD-
MINISTRATOR,  OFFICE  OF  PLANNING,  ENVIRONMENT,  AND
REALTY,  FEDERAL  HIGHWAY  ADMINISTRATION,  U.S.  DE-
PARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Ms.  SHEPHERD.  Chairman  Wu,  Ranking  Member  Gingrey,  and
Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to
testify today about the Federal Highway Administration’s efforts to
advance environmentally sensitive transportation infrastructure.

from  simply  mitigating  environmental 

I  am  pleased  to  have  the  opportunity  to  testify  about  ways  in
which FHWA is advancing a shift in the focus of the highway com-
munity 
to
proactively  contributing  to  environmental  enhancements.  To  fulfill
this  responsibility,  we  work  closely  with  our  partners  at  the  fed-
eral,  State,  and  local  levels  to  provide  coordinated  national  re-
search,  and  to  deliver  research  results  through  training,  and  tech-
nical assistance.

Minimizing  damage  from  and  mitigating  negative  impacts  of
transportation  facilities  on  the  human  and  natural  environment
are  always  significant  considerations  for  every  federal-aid  funded
highway project, from the initial planning and project development
throughout  the  design,  construction,  operation,  and  maintenance
stages.  Our  State  partners  are  learning  from  experiences  that  in-
troducing  environmentally  sound  technologies  and  construction
considerations early in the project development process can produce
savings  in  costs  and  time,  and  can  reduce  future  remediation  ex-
penses.

As  more  transportation  environmental  research  is  being  under-
taken  by  a  diverse  array  of  organizations,  there  is  a  growing  need
for  organizational  approaches  to  make  the  results  more  visible.
FHWA participates in a variety of research coordination efforts, in-
cluding the Surface Transportation Environment and Planning Co-
operative Research Program, better known STEPCRP, our National
Highway  courses,  our  Local  and  Tribal  Technical  Assistance  Pro-
grams,  and  through  development  of  case  studies  to  show  case  best
practice and innovative techniques.

FHWA is also becoming an active participant in the Green Infra-
structure  Planning  Workshops  developed  by  a  number  of  resource
and  regulatory  agencies  in  cooperation  with  the  Conservation
Fund.  We  are  a  leading  partner  in  the  Mid-Atlantic  Green  High-
way  Partnership.  FHWA  is  actively  working  with  the  interagency

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

teams  of  the  Green  Highway  Partnerships 
in  the  area  of
stormwater  runoff  management,  recycling,  re-use  of  industrial  by-
product materials, and conservation and ecosystem management.

In  our  efforts  to  promote  technologies  that  mitigate  damage  and
impacts on environment from highway construction and operations,
we  have  made  the  issue  of  managing  highway  stormwater  runoff
a  particular  focus.  While  highway  runoffs  may  be  a  potential
threat, there are a number of highly effective measures, structural
and  nonstructural,  available  to  treat  runoff  before  it  actually
reached any receiving waters.

Site-specific  practices  remain  important  treatment  options,  but
we  are  increasingly  focusing  our  practice  and  techniques  that  look
at ecosystem level impacts. At selecting the most appropriate man-
agement practice, FHWA encourages states to study the amount of
time, type of their highway runoff, and availability of land, and the
physical  characteristics  on  the  site  before  designing  any  control
strategies for a specific area.

One challenge that is facing us, as we work to expand acceptance
in  the  use  of  environmentally  sensitive  technologies,  is  the  lack  of
a  sufficient  track  record  illustrating  the  costs  versus  the  benefits
of various technologies. The business case has to be made that new
transportation  technologies  can  be  utilized  safely  in  an  environ-
mentally  sensitive  manner.  Context-sensitive  solutions  that  fully
integrate  safety  into  the  project  development  process  can  assure
both environmental and highway safety benefits.

When  appropriately  applied,  green  transportation  technologies
and  practices,  such  as  highway 
infrastructure  to  mitigate
stormwater  runoff,  beneficial  re-use  of  industrial  byproduct  mate-
rials, and context-sensitive solutions not only help to avoid or miti-
gate negative environmental impacts of highway constructions, but
can produce safety enhancements and economic savings as well.

Mr.  Chairman,  Members,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  tes-
tify.  I  would  be  pleased  to  answer  any  questions  that  you  may
have.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Shepherd follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF GLORIA M. SHEPHERD

Chairman  Wu,  Ranking  Member  Gingrey,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,
thank you for the opportunity to testify today about the Federal Highway Adminis-
tration’s  (FHWA)  efforts  to  advance  environmentally  sensitive  transportation  infra-
structure. FHWA is fostering a continued shift in the focus of the highway commu-
nity  from  simply  mitigating  environmental  impacts  to  actively  contributing  to  envi-
ronmental  improvements.  In  fulfilling  this  responsibility,  we  work  closely  with  our
partners at the federal, State, and local levels to provide a coordinated national re-
search  agenda  and  deliver  research  results  through  training  and  technical  assist-
ance

Following  the  direction  provided  by  the  National  Environmental  Policy  Act
(NEPA),  FHWA  and  the  State  departments  of  transportation  (DOTs)  have  become
proactive  partners  in  the  environmental  area.  The  Safe,  Accountable,  Flexible,  Effi-
cient  Transportation  Equity  Act:  A  Legacy  for  Users  (SAFETEA–LU)  expanded  the
focus  of  environmental  considerations  from  project  development,  construction,  and
operations,  to  the  area  of  transportation  planning.  SAFETEA–LU  also  contains  a
number  of  provisions  to  improve  coordination  between  transportation  and  resource
agencies.  Minimizing  damage  from,  and  mitigating  negative  impacts  of,  transpor-
tation facilities on the human and natural environments are always significant con-
siderations  for  every  federal-aid  funded  highway  project,  from  the  initial  planning
and design stages, through development and construction, to operation and mainte-
nance.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

Our State partners are learning from experience that introducing environmentally
sound  technologies  and  construction  practices  early  in  project  development  can
produce  savings  in  costs  and  in  time  to  completion,  and  can  reduce  future  remedi-
ation expenses. FHWA and its partners have made substantial contributions to the
natural environment and to communities, through planning and programs that sup-
port context sensitive solutions, stormwater management, beneficial re-use of indus-
trial  byproducts  materials,  wetland  banking,  habitat  restoration,  historic  preserva-
tion,  air  quality  improvements,  bicycle  and  pedestrian  facilities,  wildlife  crossings,
and  public  and  tribal  government  involvement  in  transportation  project  develop-
ment.

FHWA  will  continue  to  support  these  programs  while  it  also  works  with  State,
local, and federal partners to conduct sound environmental reviews in a timely way.
With prompt decision-making, we routinely reduce project cost escalation, ease con-
gestion, and deliver the transportation and safety improvements that the American
public expects.
Research Programs for Environmentally Sound Practices and Technologies
Working  with  its  partners,  FHWA  supports  a  research  and  technology  program
that is focused on developing and implementing an environmentally sensitive trans-
portation program.

State  Planning  and  Research  (SP&R)  Program.  Section  505  of  title  23,  United
States  Code,  requires  that  states  set  aside  two  percent  of  the  apportionments  from
the  Interstate  Maintenance,  National  Highway  System,  Surface  Transportation,
Highway  Safety  Improvement,  Highway  Bridge,  Congestion  Mitigation  and  Air
Quality Improvement, and Equity Bonus programs for State planning and research
activities.  Of  this  amount,  states  must  allocate  25  percent  for  research,  develop-
ment,  and  technology,  unless  the  state  certifies  that  transportation  planning  ex-
penditures will require more than 75 percent of the amount set aside. In fiscal year
2006,  the  set  aside  amounted  to  almost  $600  million  and,  thus,  provided  almost
$150  million  for  the  State  Planning  and  Research  (SP&R)  Program.  SP&R-funded
activities involve researching new areas of knowledge, adapting findings to practical
applications  by  developing  new  technologies,  transferring  the  technologies,  and
training the users of the technologies.

The  SP&R  Program  is  intended  to  solve  problems  identified  by  the  states.  State
DOTs  are  encouraged  to  establish  research,  development,  and  training  programs
that  anticipate  and  address  transportation  concerns  before  they  become  critical
problems. Each state must implement a program that ensures effective use of avail-
able SP&R funds on a statewide basis, and each state is permitted to tailor its pro-
gram to meet local needs. High priority is given to applied research on State or re-
gional problems, transfer of technology from researcher to user, and research for set-
ting standards and specifications. Major research and development areas include in-
frastructure  renewal  (including  pavement,  structures,  and  asset  management);  ac-
tivities  relating  to  safety,  operations,  and  management;  environmental  and  real  es-
tate planning; and policy analysis and systems monitoring.

State  DOTs  have  used  SP&R  funds  for  substantial  research  into  regional
stormwater  issues  and  development  of  best  management  practices  suitable  for  the
particular  issues  in  that  locality  or  state.  An  example  of  ongoing  research  related
to  stormwater  at  the  State  level  is  an  ‘‘Investigation  of  Stormwater  Quality  Im-
provements  Utilizing  Permeable  Pavement  and/or  Porous  Friction  Courses,’’  which
is being sponsored by the Texas DOT using SP&R funds.

Surface Transportation Environment and Planning Cooperative Research Program
(STEP).  At  the  national  level,  FHWA  currently  administers  environment  and  plan-
ning  research  funds  under  the  STEP  program  created  by  SAFETEA–LU  in  section
5207.  STEP  is  intended  to  improve  understanding  of  the  complex  relationship  be-
tween  surface  transportation,  planning,  and  the  environment.  The  program  is  au-
thorized at $16.875 million per year for fiscal years 2006 through 2009.

Current  initiatives  propose  research  in  areas  related  to  planning,  air  quality,
noise  abatement,  wetlands,  vegetation  management,  wildlife 
connectivity,
brownfields,  and  stormwater.  Some  specific  stormwater  initiatives  are  the  Inter-
national  Storm  Water  Best  Management  Practices  Database,  Evaluation  and  Up-
date of FHWA Pollutant Loadings Model for Highway Stormwater Runoff, and Syn-
thesis  on  the  Fate  and  Effects  of  Chloride  from  Road  Salt  Applied  to  Highways  for
Deicing. Other proposed research would examine tools such as Geographic Informa-
tion  Systems  (GIS)  and  Global  Positioning  Systems  (GPS)  to  better  map  important
ecosystem  features,  including  wildlife  corridors  and  invasive  plants,  to  improve  our
ability  to  recognize  and  address  environmental  concerns  very  early  in  the  process
of planning a project.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

Center  for  Environmental  Excellence.  In  section  5309,  SAFETEA–LU  authorizes
$1.25  million  per  year  for  fiscal  years  2006  through  2009  to  establish  a  Center  for
Environmental  Excellence  to  provide  technical  assistance,  information  sharing  of
best  practices,  and  training  in  the  use  of  tools  and  decision-making  processes  that
can  assist  states  in  planning  and  delivering  environmentally  sound  surface  trans-
portation projects. FHWA is currently reviewing proposals from universities and ex-
pects to announce the establishment of the new Center for Excellence shortly.

Infrastructure  Research  and  Technology.  FHWA’s  infrastructure  research  and
technology  programs  also  pursue  initiatives  with  potential  environmental  benefits,
including:

the waterway.

• Cantilever construction of bridges, which keeps construction equipment out of
• Prefabricated  technologies  for  construction  and  repair  of  infrastructure
(bridges  and  pavements)  and  other  accelerated  construction  technologies
which  reduce  environmental  impacts  by  (a)  moving  much  of  the  construction
process to controlled environments and (b) reducing the duration of damaging
activities.
• ‘‘Warm mix’’ technology for asphalt paving which reduces the temperature at
which asphalt paving materials are manufactured and placed, thereby reduc-
ing both emissions and fuel consumption. This technology also has the poten-
tial  to  increase  the  amount  of  recycled  asphalt  pavement  that  can  be  effec-
tively used in the paving mixture.

FHWA promotes and supports the use of recycled materials in highway construc-
tion and, through our contractor, the Recycled Materials Resource Center, currently
at  the  University  of  New  Hampshire,  we  are  making  changes  in  the  extent  of  use
of  several  industrial  by-product  materials  in  highway  construction.  FHWA  also  has
an active Recycling Team that works with the states, the Environmental Protection
Agency (EPA), and industry to implement recycling technology.

Funding for these initiatives comes from several sources, including the Innovative
Pavement  Research  and  Deployment  Program  and  the  Innovative  Bridge  Research
and  Deployment  Program.  The  Highways  for  LIFE  program  will  also  contribute  to
implementation of these technologies.
Research  Coordination,  Training  and  Technical  Assistance,  and  Partner-

ships

Coordination. As more transportation and environmental research is being under-
taken by a diverse array of organizations, there is a growing need for organized ap-
proaches that support well-crafted research agendas. FHWA hosts, funds, or partici-
pates in various research coordination efforts. FHWA’s STEP program is a coopera-
tive  research  program,  and  stakeholders  were  extensively  engaged  in  defining  the
research  agenda  and  identifying  focus  areas  and  projects.  In  addition  to  FHWA’s
STEP program, National and State-level research programs of particular interest to
State  DOT  transportation  and  environmental  practitioners  include  the  Strategic
Highway  Research  Program  Two  (SHRP–2)  led  by  the  Transportation  Research
Board  (TRB);  the  National  Cooperative  Highway  Research  Program  (NCHRP)  re-
search programs, including the 25–25 research initiative, which provides funding for
quick  turnaround  research  by  American  Association  of  State  Highway  and  Trans-
portation  Officials’  (AASHTO)  Standing  Committee  on  Environment;  individual
State  DOTs’  research  programs,  which  increasingly  include  environmental  compo-
nents that are often conducted in coordination with university partners; and univer-
sity  research,  particularly  practitioner-oriented  research  conducted  by  University
Transportation  Centers  around  the  Nation  that  receive  funding  authorized  under
SAFETEA–LU.

An  additional  key  area  of  investment  is  the  AASHTO  Center  for  Environmental
Excellence Transportation Environmental Research Ideas (TERI) Database. TERI is
a dynamic tool that helps practitioners keep track of and prioritize constantly evolv-
ing transportation and environmental research needs.

Training  and  Technical  Assistance.  Important  components  of  a  coordinated  re-
search  agenda  are  training  and  technical  assistance.  FHWA  is  working  with  our
partners  at  all  levels  to  share  research  results  and  promote  environmentally  sound
practices.

The FHWA’s National Highway Institute (NHI) has developed courses addressing
environmental  issues  associated  with  infrastructure  construction,  operation,  and
maintenance,  including  a  number  of  courses  relating  to  water  quality  and  runoff.
Development  of  courses  in  these  areas  is  coordinated  with  the  appropriate  federal
agencies—most  often  EPA,  the  United  States  Army  Corps  of  Engineers,  and  the
United  States  Fish  and  Wildlife  Service  (USFWS)—and  with  representatives  of

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

State DOTs. Courses include ‘‘Design and Implementation of Erosion and Sediment
Control,’’ ‘‘Water Quality Management of Highway Runoff, and ‘‘Managing Road Im-
pacts on Stream Ecosystems: An Interdisciplinary Approach.’’ Attached to this state-
ment  is  a  summary  of  research  related  to  stormwater  runoff,  directly  carried  out,
funded,  or  supported  by  FHWA,  which  provides  additional  information  on  these
courses. (See Attachment—‘‘Status of Current FHWA Water Quality Research.’’)

FHWA  will  be  developing  a  NHI  short  course  entitled  ‘‘Environmental  Factors  of
Construction  and  Maintenance.’’  The  course  is  intended  to  familiarize  construction
teams  with  environmental  concerns  to  be  addressed  as  part  of  construction  and
maintenance operations. The scope of work for the training has been prepared, and
a  request  for  proposals  will  be  issued  shortly.  This  is  the  latest  of  several  courses
developed and offered by FHWA’s NHI relating to water quality and runoff. The At-
tachment also includes additional information on this course.

Technical  assistance  is  also  available  through  FHWA’s  Resource  Center  technical
teams  and  through  the  Local  Technical  Assistance  Program  (LTAP)  and  Tribal
Technical  Assistance  Program  (TTAP).  The  latter  two  organizations  represent  58
centers that work directly with local agencies to transfer technology and train prac-
titioners at city, town, county, and tribal levels.

In addition, FHWA has developed case studies to showcase best practices or inno-
vative  techniques.  Transportation  enhancement  funds  have  often  been  used  for
projects  that  improve  the  quality  of  highway  stormwater  runoff.  The  Sebago  Lake-
Route  35  Environmental  Mitigation  in  Standish,  Maine;  the  Santa  Monica  Urban
Runoff  Recycling  Facility;  and  the  Rock  Creek  Watershed  Restoration,  Montgomery
County,  Maryland,  are  three  examples  of  such  projects  showcased  on  our  transpor-
tation enhancements website.

We  also  showcase  important  water  quality  improvement  projects  or  mitigation
measures  in  our  Environmental  Excellence  Awards  Program  and  our  Exemplary
Ecosystem Initiatives. An example is the Berthoud Pass Mountain Access Project in
Colorado. This project received the 2005 Environmental Excellence Award for Road-
side Resource Management and Maintenance. Prior to this project, the sediment and
de-icing materials needed for safety considerations on U.S. Highway 40, as it passed
through  the  mountains  in  northwest  Colorado,  were  pushed  into  the  forest  floor
causing  streams  to  fill  up  and  clogging  pipes.  Now,  when  Colorado  DOT  mainte-
nance  crews  plow  the  highway  in  the  winter,  snow  and  sand  travel  through  a  so-
phisticated system of culverts and ditches to collect in a strategically placed concrete
storage basin. Once in the basins, the sand is allowed to settle out and clean water
is released into the watershed below the highway. Colorado DOT crews then recover
the sand from sloped access ramps, and the process begins again.

Partnerships.  FHWA  has  actively  supported  a  multi-agency  effort  to  develop  a
non-prescriptive  approach  to  making  infrastructure  more  sensitive  to  wildlife  and
ecosystems  through  greater  agency  cooperative  conservation.  The  collaborative  eco-
system approach to transportation development is described in ‘‘Eco-Logical: an Eco-
system Approach to Developing Infrastructure Projects.’’ FHWA currently has dedi-
cated  $1  million  for  grants  to  transportation  agencies,  local  governments,  non-gov-
ernmental  organizations,  and  others  to  advance  pilot  projects  based  on  Eco-Logical
and  integrated  planning  principles.  Integrated  planning  is  a  process  for  the  collec-
tion,  sharing,  analysis,  and  presentation  of  data  contained  in  agencies’  plans—con-
servation,  watershed,  historic  preservation,  transportation,  and  others—to  more
comprehensively  address  the  multiple  needs  of  an  area.  The  solicitation  for  these
grants  is  expected  to  be  posted  at  http://www.grants.gov/  and  several  FHWA
websites in the next few days.

National  Partnerships  are  also  being  promoted  through  workshops  on  Linking
Conservation  and  Transportation  Planning  and  Project  Development.  Pilot  work-
shops  were  held  last  year  in  Arizona,  Colorado,  and  Arkansas.  The  workshop  con-
tent  is  being  updated  and  workshops  will  be  offered  again  in  fiscal  year  2008.  The
purposes  of  the  workshops  are  to  (1)  facilitate  the  exchange  of  ideas,  concepts,  and
methods  for  better  collaboration  between  transportation  and  conservation  planning
practitioners  and  (2)  promote  the  sharing  of  conservation  and  transportation
geospatial  data,  methodologies,  and  tools  to  advance  planning,  environmental  stew-
ardship, and streamlining goals. The primary audience for the training will be con-
servation  and  transportation  planning  and  project  review/development  staffs  at  the
federal, State, regional, and local levels.

FHWA  is  also  becoming  an  active  participant  in  the  Green  Infrastructure  Plan-
ning  Workshops  developed  by  a  number  of  resource  and  regulatory  agencies  in  co-
operation  with  the  Conservation  Fund.  Green  infrastructure  relates  to  a  strategic
approach  to  conservation  that  promotes  planning,  protection,  restoration,  and  long-
term  management  that  is  proactive,  systematic,  holistic,  multi-functional,  and
science-based. Green Infrastructure workshops approach transportation planning as

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

a  way  of  promoting  integrated  planning  principles.  FHWA  has  provided  funding
support  for  Green  Infrastructure  Workshops  held  recently  in  Anchorage,  Alaska,
and Colorado Springs, Colorado.

FHWA  has  been  a  leading  partner  in  the  Mid-Atlantic  Green  Highways  Partner-
ship  (GHP).  The  GHP  is  a  public-private  initiative  that  seeks  to  revolutionize  the
manner  in  which  our  nation’s  transportation  infrastructure  is  planned  and  con-
structed. The GHP promotes integrated planning, regulatory flexibility, and market-
based rewards. The GHP provides State DOTs an opportunity to highlight good en-
vironmental practices already underway and encourages additional innovations.

FHWA  has  contributed  significant  resources  towards  the  partnership  including
staff  time,  monetary  commitments,  and  technological  expertise.  Recently,  FHWA
and EPA co-founded a Green Highways Partnership grant for innovative watershed
management  projects  within  the  Anacostia  Watershed.  The  grant,  announced  on
Earth Day 2006, awarded a total of $1 million to three different groups working on
projects  designed  to  protect  and  restore  urban  water  resources  through  a  holistic
watershed approach to managing water quality. The grant supports Low Impact De-
velopment and restoration work in the Anacostia River watershed. This partnership
represents  significant  leveraging  of  public,  private,  and  non-profit  resources,  while
playing  a  pivotal  role  in  advancing  environmental  results;  safe,  sustainable  trans-
portation  systems;  and  economic  competitiveness  in  and  around  the  Anacostia  wa-
tershed in D.C. and Maryland.

Another recent event was a GHP workshop with Maryland that reviewed a project
in the early Environmental Impact Statement stage to discuss stormwater manage-
ment,  conservation  practices,  and  recycle/re-use  of  industrial  byproducts,  with  a
focus on what can then be used in the construction plans for the project.

In  addition  to  work  on  stormwater  runoff  management,  FHWA  is  collaborating
with  the  multi-disciplinary,  interagency  teams  of  the  GHP  in  the  following  areas:
Recycling and Reuse. Recycling of industrial byproducts and their re-use as mate-
rials  for  infrastructure  construction  can  not  only  reduce  a  wide  range  of  environ-
mental  impacts  (conserve  landfill,  reduce  water/air  pollution,  reduce  greenhouse
gases), but can also save energy, money, and conserve non-renewable resources. The
GHP recycling and re-use team has a number of efforts underway, primarily to over-
come  informational  barriers.  After  identifying  and  evaluating  existing  environ-
mental  regulations  and  construction/material  specifications,  the  team  will  develop
guidance documents for State and local agencies on the best methods and specifica-
tions  for  the  use  of  industrial  byproduct  materials  in  road  and  bridge  construction.
The team will also produce a comprehensive toolkit that provides technical informa-
tion and guidance to help DOTs and regulatory agencies overcome barriers.

Another  GHP  priority  is  to  highlight  existing  State  DOT  projects  that  optimize
the beneficial re-use of industrial byproducts. An example of a project that has been
showcased  through  the  GHP  is  the  Tarrtown  Bridge  in  Pennsylvania,  where  the
Pennsylvania  DOT  used  shredded  tires  as  lightweight  embankment  fill  on  two
bridge  approaches.  The  project  incorporated  approximately  780,000  scrap  tires,
thereby easing the load on landfills.

In West Virginia, the State DOT is using recycled blast furnace slag as the aggre-
gate of choice in the western part of the state for the majority of the asphalt surface
course pavements. The effort results in a safer pavement due to the aggregate’s non-
polishing  properties  (higher  friction  number).  Further,  recycling  blast  furnace  slag,
when  available  locally,  offers  an  economic  advantage  compared  with  using  virgin
limestone aggregate.

These  are  just  two  examples  of  the  various  industrial  byproduct  materials  that
FHWA is actively promoting for re-use in highway and bridge construction. As noted
above, the Recycled Materials Resource Center mission is to conduct research to in-
sure that the use of recycled materials does not have a negative impact on the envi-
ronment  and  to  provide  technical  information  to  State  and  local  agencies  on  the
proper re-use of the materials.

Conservation and Ecosystem Management (principles and practices). The conserva-
tion and ecosystem management team within the GHP focuses on bringing advances
in  mapping  and  data  management  together  with  various  initiatives  in  conservation
and  ecosystem  management  to  achieve  greener  highways.  The  data  and  regulatory
managers  are  working  to  gain  agreement  on  how  to  develop  a  set  of  tailored,  core
data-sets  and  maps  that  can  be  integrated  at  both  the  transportation  project  and
planning  levels.  The  maps  will  facilitate  information  sharing  at  the  federal,  State,
metropolitan  planning  organization,  and  local  levels,  and  will  facilitate  the  integra-
tion  of  conservation  and  ecosystem  management  practices  into  land-use  planning.
Priority  areas  for  conservation  will  emerge  from  the  development  of  a  regional  eco-
system framework.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

The Green Highways Partnership represents the next logical step in the evolution
of  EPA,  FHWA,  and  Mid-Atlantic  State  DOT  efforts  in  environmental  streamlining
and stewardship.
Management of Highway Stormwater Runoff

FHWA  has  made  the  issue  of  managing  stormwater  runoff  a  particular  focus  in
its efforts to promote technologies that mitigate damage and impacts to the environ-
ment from highway construction and operation.

Highway stormwater runoff, as part of development and urbanization, is a poten-
tial  source  of  a  wide  variety  of  possible  pollutants  to  surrounding  water  bodies.
Highway surfaces, along with adjoining areas, collect a variety of materials as a re-
sult of highway usage, maintenance, natural conditions, and pollution fallout. While
highway  runoff  may  be  a  potential  threat  to  receiving  waters,  if  handled  properly
the runoff does not have to be a serious problem.

There  are  a  number  of  highly  effective  measures  available  to  treat  the  runoff  be-
fore  it  actually  reaches  any  receiving  waters.  Site-specific  practices  remain  impor-
tant  treatment  options,  but  a  changing  management  style  has  also  embraced  the
practice of planning at the watershed and sub-basin scales. Best management prac-
tices  are  no  longer  driven  only  by  water-quality  criteria.  We  are  not  looking  only
at  ‘‘end  of  the  pipe’’  treatment  technologies  but,  increasingly,  are  focusing  on  prac-
tices and techniques that look at ecosystem-level impacts and stressors, such as con-
serving  ecosystems,  maintaining  natural  drainage  courses,  and  minimizing  cleared
and graded area.

FHWA researches and showcases the various best management practices for man-
aging  stormwater  runoff  from  highway  projects.  These  best  management  practices
can generally be categorized as ‘‘structural’’ or ‘‘non-structural.’’

Structural  best  management  practices  consist  of  infiltration  technologies,  deten-
tion, retention, vegetative practices, filtering systems, and porous pavements. Struc-
tural  best  management  practices  operate  by  physically  trapping  runoff  until  con-
taminants settle out or are filtered through the underlying soils. They work through
gravity settling the constituents, the infiltration of soluble nutrients through the soil
or filters, or other biological and chemical processes.

Stormwater  management  innovations  are  underway  throughout  the  mid-Atlantic
region, where urbanized areas are particularly challenging. In 2004 in Washington,
D.C.,  the  District  Department  of  Transportation  installed  a  biocell  for  stormwater
management  at  Benning  Road  Bridge.  A  biocell  is  composed  of  natural  materials
such  as  mulch,  soil  mix,  and  various  types  of  vegetation.  Rather  than  require  an
engineered  structure  like  a  weir  or  drainage  pit,  a  biocell  acts  like  a  filtration
trench,  where  the  soil  or  natural  drainage  materials  filter  the  water.  A  biocell  can
remove up to 90 percent of the suspended solids from stormwater. This project rep-
resented the first use of low-impact stormwater management technology by the Dis-
trict government.

The  non-structural  best  management  practices  deal  mainly  with  source  controls
such  as  land  use  planning,  street  sweeping,  fertilizer  application  controls,  reduced
mowing,  and  litter  removal  from  roads  and  roadside  areas.  These  methods  help  re-
duce  the  initial  concentration  and  accumulation  of  contaminants  in  the  stormwater
runoff. Non-structural controls can reduce the need for structural controls.

Many  states,  including  Oregon,  have  implemented  a  requirement  that  any  engi-
neered  stormwater  facility,  such  as  detention,  treatment,  pumping,  or  infiltration,
must  be  accompanied  by  a  site  specific  ‘‘Operation  &  Maintenance’’  manual.  This
manual  is  necessary  to  ensure  the  agreements  and  assumptions  made  during  the
water resources analysis conducted during the NEPA environmental review process
are fulfilled for the life of the facility. The manual is provided to the people respon-
sible for the long-term maintenance of the facility.

FHWA’s  promotion  and  technical  support  for  more  environmentally  sensitive  use
of  de-icing  agents  and  chemicals,  as  well  as  abrasion  use  for  winter  road  mainte-
nance  activities,  is  saving  operating  budgets  and  increasing  roadway  asset  service
life, with less impact on the roadside environment. We find a similar payoff for im-
provements in summer work managing the roadsides using improved herbicide and
pesticide application and control.

In selecting the most appropriate best management practice, careful consideration
must  be  given  to  the  expected  amount  of  runoff,  the  type  and  amount  of  contami-
nants, the availability of land, and the physical characteristics of the site. Some best
management  practices  can  operate  in  any  weather  conditions,  while  others  cannot.
Where there is limited space, certain of the structural practices may not be reason-
able  or  feasible,  while  the  non-structural  practices  can  be  implemented  effectively
anywhere.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

FHWA  encourages  all  states  to  study  the  quality  of  the  highway  runoff  and  its
properties  before  implementing  or  designing  any  control  treatment  strategies  for  a
specific  area.  Given  that  every  watershed  is  different,  a  one-size  fits  all  approach
could  result  in  spending  funds  for  unnecessary  or  inappropriate  treatment.  We  en-
courage  early  study  by  providing  funding  for  mitigation  of  impacts  associated  with
federal-aid  highway  projects,  including  stormwater  control,  technical  assistance,
training, and research assistance to State and local transportation staff.

See  the  Attachment  to  this  statement  for  a  status  report  on  research,  training,
and  publications  related  to  stormwater  runoff,  being  carried  out,  funded,  or  sup-
ported by FHWA.
Obstacles to Implementation of Environmentally-Sensitive Technologies

The permitting program under the Clean Water Act, regulating discharges to wa-
ters  of  the  United  States,  addresses  stormwater  discharges  associated  with  urban
areas  and  certain  industrial  activities,  and  includes  transportation  facilities.  Be-
cause of a lack of monitoring information, scientific analysis, and third-party evalua-
tions, it may be difficult for new and innovative technologies to demonstrate signifi-
cant water quality treatment to satisfy regulatory agencies. For example, the EPA’s
Environmental  Technology  Verification  Program  approves  innovative  treatment
technologies  through  performance  verification  and  dissemination  of  information.
Some  State  regulatory  agencies  have  similar  programs.  While  these  programs  are
beginning  to  test  and  approve  innovative  technologies  in  their  region,  many  tech-
nologies are still being tested, thus the level of acceptance by the regulatory agency
for meeting permitting requirements may be limited, even if the technology theoreti-
cally demonstrates the necessary ability to meet the requirements.

Lack  of  a  sound  track  record  regarding  the  costs  versus  the  benefits  of  a  par-
ticular technology also can be a problem. The business case has to be made for why
a  new  technology  is  promising  for  both  the  environment  and  transportation.  Life
cycle  information  from  existing  infrastructure  construction  will  help  inform  future
decisions.

Of course safety and engineering considerations must always be balanced with en-
vironmental  benefits.  However,  safety  and  environmentally  sensitive  technologies
can  be  compatible.  Context  Sensitive  Solutions  that  fully  integrate  safety  into  the
project  development  process  ensure  that  both  the  environment  and  highway  safety
benefit.  For  example,  properly  designed  landscaping  can  ensure  adequate  sight  dis-
tances  for  drivers,  avoid  deadly  fixed  object  hazards,  and  maintain  the  ability  of
drivers  and  pedestrians  to  see  each  other.  Water  quality  and  highway  safety  can
both  be  improved  with  gently  sloping  clear  zones  that  allow  errant  motorists  to  re-
gain control of their vehicles and reduce the risk of fixed-object crashes. These clear
zones  also  allow  highway  runoff  to  be  filtered  or  absorbed  before  entering  water-
ways.
Conclusion

When  appropriately  applied,  ‘‘green’’  transportation  technologies  and  practices,
such  as  use  of  highway  infrastructure  to  mitigate  stormwater  runoff,  beneficial  re-
use of industrial byproduct materials, and context sensitive solutions, not only yield
significant  benefits  for  avoiding  or  mitigating  negative  environmental  impacts  of
highway  construction,  but  can  produce  safety  enhancements  and  economic  savings
as well. Ongoing research, transfer of technologies and best practices, and new part-
nerships  are  providing  states  and  tribal  governments  more  knowledge  and  tools  to
address  such  issues  as  stormwater  runoff  control.  A  heightened  focus  on  integrated
planning  should  help  ensure  that  potential  environmental  impacts  are  identified
and addressed early in the project development process.

Mr.  Chairman,  Members,  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  testify.  I  will  be

pleased to answer any questions you may have.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

ATTACHMENT

19

Status of Current FHWA Water Quality Research

http://www.fhwa.dot.gov/environment/natural.htm

5/10/2007

I. Research Projects
Project: International Stormwater BMP Database
Contractor: Wright Water Engineers, Inc., and GeoSyntec Consultants
Purpose  of  Work:  Water  Environment  Research  Foundation,  American  Society  of
Civil  Engineers-Environmental  and  Water  Resources  Institute,  United  States  Envi-
ronmental  Protection  Agency,  Federal  Highway  Administration  and  American  Pub-
lic  Works  Association  have  formed  a  coalition  of  organizations  to  fund  and  manage
the  International  Stormwater  Best  Management  Practices  (BMP)  Database.  The
work  will  consist  of  entering  currently  available  and  newly  developed  data  sets,
keeping  the  web  site  and  database  up  to  date,  providing  data  analysis  and  devel-
oping  protocols  for  integrating  low  impact  development  techniques  into  the  data-
base.
Status:  The  work  is  ongoing  and  the  database  is  currently  accessible  through  the
web site at http://www.bmpdatabase.org.
Project: Evaluation  and  Update  of  FHWA  Pollutant  Loadings  Model  for

Highway Stormwater Runoff

Contractor: U.S. Geological Survey, Reston, Virginia
Purpose of Work: The Federal Highway Administration and the U.S. Geological Sur-
vey  are  cooperating  on  a  national  project  to  evaluate  the  existing  highway
stormwater runoff model and update the model using new information and software.
This  work  will  incorporate  the  existing  model  in  a  new  software  platform,  provide
information  on  the  probability  distributions  of:  precipitation  characteristics,  high-
way-runoff-volumes, highway-runoff concentrations, upstream flow, upstream receiv-
ing-water  concentrations,  and  structural  best  management  practice  performance.
This information will be used to estimate the probability of concentration and loads
in receiving waters downstream of the highway outfall and it will estimate the prob-
ability of the outfall exceeding water quality standards.
Status:  The  model  is  in  preparation.  Information  on  this  project  can  be  found  at:
http://ma.water.usgs.gov/fhwa/,  along  with  the  1990  FHWA  Pollutant  Loadings
Model for Highway Stormwater Runoff.
Project: State Transportation Agency Strategies to Address NPDES Phase II

Requirements, NCHRP 25–25(16)

Contractor: Venner Consulting, GeoSyntec, and Parsons Brinckerhoff
Purpose  of  Work:  The  research  will  focus  on  determining  how  State  transportation
agencies have addressed compliance with National Pollutant Discharge Elimination
System  (NPDES)  Phase  II  requirements.  Research  will  be  directed  toward  deter-
mining  staffing  and  organizational  structure  throughout  the  entire  agency  to  ad-
dress  NPDES  Phase  II  compliance  for  construction  activities  as  well  as  the
stormwater  management  program  as  a  regulated  Municipal  Separate  Storm  Sewer
System (MS4).
Status:  The  final  draft  report  was  submitted  in  November  2006  and  the  consultant
is addressing comments from the review panel. The final report should be published
soon.
Project: Water  Quality  Analyses  for  NEPA  Documents:  Selecting  Appro-

priate Methodologies, NCHRP 25–25(35)

Contractor: Parsons, Brinckerhoff, Quade & Douglas, Inc.
Purpose  of  Work:  The  National  Environmental  Protection  Act  (NEPA)  requires  that
sponsors  of  transportation  projects  consider  the  impacts  of  those  projects  on  water
quality  and  water  resources.  There  are  numerous  methodologies  available  to  per-
form  these  analyses;  however,  there  is  little  or  no  guidance  on  selecting  the  most
effective  analytical  tool  for  the  particular  information  being  presented  for  NEPA
documentation. Some methods developed by the EPA and FHWA may be more suit-
ed for detailed project level analysis and some better suited for planning level stud-
ies  and  watershed-based  analyses.  The  objective  of  this  study  is  to  identify  those

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

water  quality  analysis  methodologies  that  are  best  suited  for  detailed  project-level
impact assessment for NEPA documents.
Status:  The  research  started  in  December  2006,  and  will  be  concluded  in  the  fall
of 2007.
Project: Quantifying the Components of Impervious Surfaces
Contractor: U.S. Geological Survey
Purpose  of  Work:  The  purpose  of  this  research  is  to  determine,  using  existing  land
use, land cover, and impervious surface data, the individual contribution of the var-
ious  components  to  impervious  surfaces,  to  the  overall  storm  water  runoff  issue.
Preliminary  results  of  this  report  for  six  case  studies  (Washington,  Virginia,  Ne-
braska,  Iowa,  Florida)  shows  that  the  percentage  of  impervious  cover  contributions
from  road  surfaces  in  these  studies  varied  between  20–35  percent.  Generally  roads
were at 28 percent, buildings at 29 percent, and parking lots at 25 percent for total
impervious areas in a watershed. As the watershed becomes more developed and the
impervious surfaces increase, the contribution from the road surfaces decreases.
Status:  Final  report  can  be  found  on  the  web  at:  http://pubs.usgs.gov/of/2007/
1008/.
Project: Guidelines  for  the  Selection  of  Snow  and  Ice  Control  Materials  to

Mitigate Environmental Impacts, NCHRP Project 6–16

Contractor: Levelton Consultants, Ltd.
Purpose  of  Work:  Every  year  considerable  quantities  of  snow  and  ice  control  prod-
ucts are applied to highways. This application involves a balancing act of maintain-
ing  safety  and  applying  what  is  needed  without  causing  environmental  impacts.
This project is looking at a way to define the selection of winter maintenance mate-
rials based on their environmental impact. They will be looking at the most common
chemical  alternatives  such  as  sodium  chloride,  magnesium  chloride,  calcium  chlo-
ride,  calcium  magnesium  acetate,  potassium  acetate,  etc.  This  project  will  develop
guidelines  for  selection  of  snow  and  ice  control  chemicals  and  abrasives,  based  on
their constituents, performance, environmental impacts, cost, and site-specific condi-
tions.  Investigators  will  look  at  the  environmental  impacts  of  the  effects  on  human
health,  aquatic  life,  flora  and  fauna,  surface-water  and  groundwater  quality,  air
quality,  vehicles,  and  physical  infrastructure  including  bridges,  pavements,  railway
electronic  signaling  systems,  and  power  distribution  lines.  In  the  past,  transpor-
tation  departments  have  focused  on  performance  and  cost  under  various  weather
conditions without evaluating their relative impacts on the environment.
Status: The final report is available upon request from NCHPR.

II. State Planning and Research Funds

The  Safe,  Accountable,  Flexible,  Efficient  Transportation  Equity  Act:  A  Legacy  for
Users  (SAFETEA–LU)  requires  that  states  set  aside  two  percent  of  the  apportion-
ments  they  receive  from  the  Interstate  Maintenance,  National  Highway  System,
Surface Transportation, Highway Safety Improvement, Highway Bridge, Congestion
Mitigation  and  Air  Quality  Improvement,  and  Equity  Bonus  programs  for  State
planning  and  research  activities.  Of  this  amount,  states  must  allocate  25  percent
for research, development, and technology (RD&T), unless the state certifies and the
Secretary  accepts  the  certification,  that  transportation  planning  expenditures  will
require more than 75 percent of the earmarked amount. These activities involve re-
search on new areas of knowledge; adapting findings to practical applications by de-
veloping new technologies; and the transfer of these technologies, including the proc-
ess of dissemination, demonstration, training, and adoption of innovations by users.
The  State  Planning  and  Research  (SP&R)  Program  is  intended  to  address  prob-
lems  identified  by  the  states.  State  Departments  of  Transportation  are  encouraged
to  develop,  establish,  and  implement  RD&T  programs  that  anticipate  and  address
transportation  concerns  before  they  become  critical  problems.  Each  state  must  de-
velop,  establish,  and  implement  a  program  that  ensures  effective  use  of  available
SP&R  funds  for  RD&T  activities  on  a  statewide  basis,  and  each  state  is  permitted
to  tailor  its  RD&T  program  to  meet  local  needs.  High  priority  is  given  to  applied
research  on  State  or  regional  problems,  transfer  of  technology  from  researcher  to
user,  and  research  for  setting  standards  and  specifications.  Major  RD&T  areas  in-
clude  infrastructure  renewal  (including  pavement,  structures,  and  asset  manage-
ment); activities relating to safety, operations, and management; environmental and
real estate planning; and policy analysis and systems monitoring.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

III. Available Reports and Publications:
Evaluation  of  Best  Management  Practices  for  Highway  Runoff  Control,
2006, NCHRP Report 565, Project 25–20(1)

This  report  focuses  on  improving  the  scientific  and  technical  knowledge  base  for
the  selection  of  best  management  practices  (BMP)  through  a  better  understanding
of  BMP  performance  and  application.  This  report  documents  an  extensive  program
of  research  on  the  characterization  of  BMPs  and  stormwater,  and  the  influence  of
factors such as land use practice, hydraulic characteristics, regional factors, and per-
formance evaluation. In addition to the report, a CD is affixed to the back cover con-
taining  three  additional  volumes  and  a  spreadsheet  model.  The  additional  volumes
are:  User’s  Guide  for  BMP/LID  Selection,  Appendices  to  the  User’s  Guide,  and  Low
Impact Development Design Manual for Highway Runoff Control.
Great Lakes Initiative—Stormwater Workshop Report

The  Great  Lakes  Regional  Collaboration  was  initiated  by  Executive  Order  (EO)
13340,  issued  in  May  2004.  This  EO  acknowledged  the  national  significance  of  the
Great Lakes and created a unique partnership of key members from Federal, State,
and  local  governments,  tribes  and  others  for  the  purpose  of  developing  a  strategic
plan  to  restore  and  protect  the  Great  Lakes  ecosystem.  EO  13340  set  up  a  Federal
Interagency Task Force and a Regional Working Group. On December 12, 2005, the
Great Lakes Interagency Task Force met to reinforce and demonstrate commitment
and  collaborative  efforts  to  promote  further  work  and  progress  in  the  Great  Lakes
area.  The  task  force  identified  existing  federal  programs  that  will  support  Great
Lakes ecosystem restoration and developed a list of action items. From this meeting
in  December,  the  Federal  Highway  Administration  committed  to  convene  a  gath-
ering  of  Great  Lakes  State  DOTs  to  collaborate,  share  information,  build  contacts,
examine  issues,  and  develop  strategies  for  dealing  with  stormwater  runoff  in  the
Great  Lakes  region.  The  workshop  was  held  in  August  2006  and  report  was  issued
on the results of this workshop. Copy of the report can be requested by calling 202–
366–4085.
Eco-Logical (2006)

Eco-Logical is a guide or process for a comprehensive management approach that
federal, State, and local partners can use to get involved in infrastructure, planning,
design,  review,  and  the  construction  of  projects  to  work  more  efficiently  and  effec-
tively  together.  The  process  integrates  infrastructure  development  with  ecosystem
management  to  advance  project  approvals  with  conservation  and  sustainable  land
development  practices.  The  guide 
is  available  on-line  at:  http://environ-
ment.fhwa.dot.gov/ecological/ecological.pdf.
Environmental  Stewardship  Practices,  Policies,  and  Procedures  for  Road
Construction and Maintenance (2005)

This report developed a compendium of environmental stewardship practices, poli-
cies, and procedures in areas of construction and maintenance. This manual can be
downloaded 
http://www.environment.transportation.org/center/prod-
ucts∼programs/environmental—stewardship.aspx.
Common Native Roadside Wildflowers (2005)

at: 

This field guide highlights 100 native forbs and grasses commonly found on high-
way  rights-of-way  in  Western  America.  All  are  native  to  the  United  States  and  do
not include plants that have been naturalized.
The Nature of Roadsides and the Tools to Work with It—2003

This  publication  discusses  the  various  tools  available  for  right-of-way  managers.
Highway corridors crisscross our nation and the management of these acres of land
is  complicated  by  many  uses:  recovery  zone  for  errant  vehicles,  utility  lines,  snow
storage,  open  space,  wetland  mitigation,  wildlife  corridors,  greenways,  signage,  and
biodiversity.  This  publication  discusses  some  of  the  methods  and  tools  available  to
protect and manage the beauty and value of our roadside biota.
The National Highway Runoff Data and Methodology Synthesis—2003
Volume I: Technical Issues for Monitoring Highway Runoff and Urban Stormwater
Volume II: Project Documentation with CD based bibliographic database of reports
Volume III: Availability and Documentation of Published Information for Synthesis
of Regional or National Highway Runoff Quality Data

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

This report evaluates the existing highway runoff quality data to determine if the
quality  and  processes  contributing  to  water  quality  constituents  in  highway  runoff
can  be  adequately  characterized  on  a  nationwide  basis  to  fulfill  the  information
needs  of  highway  practitioners.  Results  are  also  available  through  the  internet  at:
http://ma.water.usgs.gov/FHWA/.
Common Roadside Wildflowers (2003)

This field guide highlights 100 native forbs and grasses commonly found on high-
way  rights-of-way  and  other  natural  areas  across  Eastern  America.  State  Depart-
ments  of  Transportation  are  encouraging  their  use  for  many  reasons:  their  natural
beauty, adaptation to arid environments, usefulness to wildlife, addition to biodiver-
sity and land health, ability to slow water runoff, and slope stabilization.
Aquatic Ecology and Stream Restoration Video—Fall 2003

This  video  showcases  six  stream  restoration  case  studies  from  across  the  Nation
and promotes the importance of restoring our streams after road construction. This
project  documents  examples  of  a  nationwide  effort  on  stream  restoration  showing
the appropriate designs and techniques for stream relocation, fish and wildlife habi-
tat preservation, and methods to improve the water quality while providing safe, ef-
ficient roadways. The series of videos has been developed by North Carolina Depart-
ment  of  Transportation  for  Federal  Highway  Administration  and  is  now  available
and a copy can be obtained by calling 202–366–2054.
Keeping It Simple—Easy Ways to Help Wildlife Along Roads (2003)

This  brochure  highlights  more  than  100  simple,  successful  activities  that  help
make roads more wildlife friendly, from all 50 states. These success stories are also
available  at  our  web  site:  www.fhwa.dot.gov/environment/wildlifeprotection.  The
web  site  allows  users  to  search  by  State  and  by  category,  and  it  provides  contact
information  for  sending  new  ‘‘keeping  it  simple’’  success  stories  to  be  added  to  the
site.
Assessing  the  Impacts  of  Bridge  Deck  Runoff  Contaminants  in  Receiving
Waters—2002, NCHRP Report 474, Volume 1: Final Report, Volume 2: Prac-
titioner’s Handbook

This  report  presents  guidance  for  assessing  and,  if  necessary,  mitigating  the  im-
pacts  of  bridge  deck  runoff.  The  final  report  includes  findings  of  the  literature  re-
view  and  a  survey  of  highway  agency  practices,  consultation  and  testing  of  sites.
The  second  volume  or  practitioner’s  handbook  presents  the  assessment  process  as
a result of the final report.
Wet Detention Pond Design for Highway Runoff Pollution Control

The research developed a methodology for designing efficient wet detention ponds
in the highway environment. The methodology included performance characteristics,
design  guidelines,  conditions,  limitations,  and  applications  for  use.  A  comparison
was  made  between  wet  detention  ponds  and  dry  detention  ponds  in  order  to  show
the advantages and disadvantages of each system. The research is complete and the
preliminary draft final report was submitted to the technical oversight panel for re-
view.  The  unedited  final  report  for  NCHRP  Project  25–12  as  prepared  by  the  Uni-
versity  of  Washington 
loan  by  contacting  NCHRP  at
NCHRP@nas.edu.
Common Roadside Invasives (2002)

is  available 

for 

This laminated field guide identifies common and showy roadside invasive grasses
and  forbs,  all  of  which  are  on  various  State  noxious  weed  lists.  We  provide  this
guide with the expectation that it will help roadside vegetation managers and main-
tenance personnel to identify and control invasive plants in their jurisdictions.
Wildlife Habitat Connectivity Across European Highways—August 2002

The  Federal  Highway  Administration,  American  Association  of  State  Highway
and  Transportation  Officials,  and  the  National  Cooperative  Highway  Research  Pro-
gram  sponsored  an  international  technology  scan  to  learn  what  actions  are  being
taken  in  Europe  to  address  habitat  and  wildlife  issues.  As  a  result  of  the  trip,  the
team  formed  conclusions  and  recommendations  for  U.S.  application  in  the  areas  of
policy,  communication,  guidance  manuals,  and  research.  This  publication  is  avail-
able from our Office of International Programs.
Management  of  Runoff  from  Surface  Transportation  Facilities—Synthesis
and Research Plan, 2001, NCHRP Web Document 37

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

The final report has been posted at: http://onlinepubs.trb.org/onlinepubs/nchrp/
nchrp¥w37.pdf.  The  objectives  of  this  research  on  the  management  of  the  quality
and  quantity  of  runoff  waters  from  surface  transportation  facilities,  was  to  (1)  syn-
thesize  existing  knowledge  and  practice  into  a  form  usable  by  practitioners;  (2)  de-
velop  a  strategic  research  plan  to  address  gaps  in  existing  knowledge;  and  (3)  rec-
ommend  a  system  for  continued  exchange  of  information  between  practitioners  and
others interested in water-quality and runoff issues.
Guidance  Manual  for  Monitoring  Highway  Runoff  Water  Quality—June
2001

The Federal Highway Administration contracted with URS Group, Inc., to conduct
an evaluation of water quality monitoring equipment for measuring the constituents
of  highway  stormwater  runoff.  Testing  was  done  on  the  methodologies  and  use  of
these various monitoring and sampling equipment in the highway environment. The
results  are  presented  in  this  manual.  This  manual  will  assist  State  and  local  gov-
ernments  prepare  highway  stormwater  monitoring  programs  based  on  monitoring
goals.  Guidance  is  provided  to  assist  the  user  in  not  only  selecting  equipment,  but
also  with  highway  stormwater  runoff  monitoring  designs  for  a  comprehensive  plan.
Recommendations  and  field  evaluations  are  given  for  specific  equipment  and  moni-
toring  methods.  The  report  provides  recommendations  on  adaptations  necessary  for
using available off-the-shelf equipment to improve the evaluation of stormwater run-
off in the highway setting.
Wetlands Data Reporting System—Spring 2001

The  FHWA  has  developed  the  Wetlands  Accounting  Database  for  collecting  and
analyzing  wetland  mitigation  data.  The  database  is  designed  to  accumulate  data
about  wetlands  mitigation  projects.  It  collects,  correlates,  and  presents  this  data  as
useful  and  meaningful  information.  The  CD-based  software  is  available  upon  re-
quest.
Case Histories of Wetland Restoration—December 2000

This  report  highlights  four  wetland  restoration  projects  from  regionally  different
areas  within  the  United  States.  These  studies  show  that  restoration  can  result  in
highly  successful  ecological  communities  that  are  similar  in  structure  and  function
to  the  natural  ones.  The  goals,  objectives,  and  criteria  for  restoration  should  be  es-
tablished  in  relation  to  the  water  regime  of  the  drainage  basin  and  ecosystem  in
which they lie. The four projects in this publication offer some insight into what ele-
ments  lead  to  a  successful  restoration  project.  There  is  no  single  path,  but  certain
elements and themes emerge from the examination of these projects.
Environmental  Impact  of  Construction  and  Repair  Materials  on  Surface
and Ground Waters—NCHRP 25–9—June 2000

The CD–ROM based report presents a validated methodology for assessing the en-
vironmental  impact  of  highway  construction  and  repair  materials  on  surface  and
ground water under six general highway reference environments. This methodology
includes: (1) a set of comprehensive bioassay protocols that directly measure the tox-
icity  of  leachates  from  highway  construction  and  repair  materials  on  two  target  or-
ganisms,  the  water  flea,  Daphnia  magna,  and  the  freshwater  algae,  Selenastrum
capricornutum, and (2) the IMPACT model that can estimate the fate and transport
of such leachates in typical highway environments. The IMPACT model is based on
an  extensive  database  of  bioassay  toxicity  results  for  materials  ranging  from  com-
mon  construction  and  repair  products  to  waste  and  recycled  materials  proposed  for
use in highway construction.
Stormwater  Management  Practices  in  an  Ultra-Urban  Setting:  Selection
and Monitoring—May 2000

This  report  focuses  on  design  criteria  and  monitoring  studies  on  stormwater  best
management practices (BMPs) implemented in ultra-urban settings. The report pro-
vides planning level review of the applicability and use of new and more traditional
BMPs  in  ultra-urban  areas.  The  report  provides  specific  guidance  for  selecting  and
siting stormwater management technologies. Case studies are used to highlight var-
ious examples throughout the country that address ultra-urban considerations.
Critter  Crossings—Linking  Habitats  and  Reducing  Roadkill—February
2000

This  brochure  describes  the  transportation  impacts  on  wildlife  and  highlights

projects and processes that help to reduce these impacts.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

Roadside Use of Native Plants—September 1999

This  publication  is  for  use  in  making  site  specific  decisions.  The  primer  provides
a holistic background information for decision-making. It addresses basic techniques
for  using  native  plants.  The  State-by-State  section  pulls  together  native,  endan-
gered,  and  noxious  plant  lists  to  aid  in  design  and  management.  The  manual  in-
cludes  definitions,  bibliographies,  and  policy  citations  to  clarify  the  use  of  native
plants on roadsides.
Evaluation and Management of Highway Runoff Water Quality—June 1996
This manual synthesizes the results of past documentation and research on high-
way  stormwater  runoff  into  a  single-volume  user’s  manual  on  water  quality  impact
assessment  and  mitigation.  It  presents  available  and  appropriate  impact  prediction
and  mitigation  tools  for  use  during  highway  project  planning  and  development  ac-
tivities.

IV. Training Courses, Workshops, and Award Programs
Design and Implementation of Erosion and Sediment Control—NHI Course
#142054

This NHI course was developed as a joint effort between FHWA and the EPA Of-
fice  of  Water.  The  course  reflects  the  Agencies’  commitment  to  providing  education
and  training  on  planning,  design,  implementation,  enforcement,  inspection,  and
maintenance  strategies  to  control  erosion  and  sediment  on  highway  construction
projects,  as  well  as  to  ensure  that  regulatory  issues  are  addressed  accurately  and
uniformly. Each discipline involved in a highway construction project has a different
set of priorities. The course offers participants opportunities for discussion and joint
problem-solving,  through  which  they  will  gain  information  about  the  roles  and  re-
sponsibilities of other team members.
Water Quality Management of Highway Runoff—NHI Course #142047

This  NHI  course,  developed  with  EPA  Office  of  Water,  provides  an  overview  of
the basic water quality parameters and processes, along with the requirements and
guidance  on  best  management  practices  the  transportation  community  can  use  in
mitigating highway runoff impacts and protecting water quality. This course shares
approaches  and  technologies  for  the  water  quality  management  of  highway  runoff,
including the effective maintenance, inspection and evaluation of Best Management
Practices (BMPs).
Managing  Road  Impacts  on  Stream  Ecosystems:  An  Interdisciplinary  Ap-
proach—NHI Course #142048

This  NHI  course  will  introduce  and  discuss  the  basic  concepts  related  to  the  im-
pacts  that  roadways  have  on  streams  and  stream  ecosystems.  The  course  will  be
structured to first address the ecological and physical characteristics of stream eco-
systems, discuss the impacts that roadways can have on those ecosystems, and then
look  at  tools  that  the  practitioner  can  use  to  help  avoid  and  mitigate  those  effects.
Through  the  use  of  case  studies,  discussion,  and  other  techniques,  the  participants
will be afforded an opportunity to use critical thinking to identify solutions and pre-
ventative  measures  related  to  the  impacts  of  roads  on  streams  and  their  riparian
communities. The course will be available at the end of the fiscal year 2007.
International  Conference  on  Ecology  and  Transportation—May  20–25,  2007
in Little Rock, Arkansas

Multi-disciplinary,  interagency  event  conducted  biennially  to  identify  and  share
quality  research  applications  and  best  management  practices  that  address  wildlife,
habitat,  and  ecosystem  issues  related  to  the  delivery  of  surface  transportation  sys-
tems.
2007 Environmental Excellence Awards

These  awards  have  been  designed  to  recognize  outstanding  transportation
projects,  processes,  and  people  who  incorporate  environmental  stewardship  into  the
planning and project development processes using FHWA funding sources. The win-
ners  will  be  recognized  at  our  International  Conference  on  Ecology  and  Transpor-
tation in Little Rock, Arkansas on May 20–25, 2007.
Exemplary Ecosystem Initiatives (EEI)

Since  2002,  FHWA  has  designated  43  Exemplary  Ecosystem  Initiatives  in  31
States.  An  EEI  is  an  initiative  that  sustains  or  restores  natural  systems  and  their

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

functions  and  values.  EEIs  are  developed  within  a  landscape  context,  using
partnering and collaborative approaches and the best available science in ecosystem
and  habitat  conservation.  All  EEIs  are  posted  on  FHWA’s  web  site  at:  http://
www.fhwa.dot.gov/environment/ecosystems/index.htm.
Alternative Practices for Highway Stormwater Management (2006)

This previously aired four-part webcast series, which can be accessed on the Web
at  any  time,  was  presented  by  the  Izaak  Walton  League  and  sponsored  by  FHWA.
The  sessions  outline  the  latest  techniques  available  to  help  transportation  agencies
save  money,  comply  with  water  quality  and  water  supply  regulations,  and  improve
water  quality  with  context-sensitive  stormwater  management  practices,  including
low impact development techniques. These techniques also can help highway depart-
ment personnel manage stormwater quantity and quality while using existing rights
of way and providing easy access for maintenance crews. Each session includes valu-
able background information and specific guidance on how to apply these principles
for  highway  projects.  The  series  also  addresses  barriers  to  using  innovative
stormwater management techniques and how to overcome those barriers. This series
provides  valuable  information  to  design  engineers,  planners,  regulators,  students,
maintenance  supervisors,  construction  engineers,  and  consultants.  To  view  the
archived  Webcast,  go  to:  http://itre.ncsu.edu/cte/TechTransfer/Teleconferences/
iwla2006.asp.
Environmental  Factors  of  Construction  and  Maintenance  (Under  Develop-
ment)

FHWA is developing a training course on how to mitigate environmental impacts
during construction and maintenance projects. The course is intended to familiarize
State  and  contractor  construction  personnel  with  environmental  concerns  that
should be addressed as part of construction operations. These concerns include con-
struction  noise,  construction  dust,  light  pollution  from  nighttime  operations,  vibra-
tion,  alkali  runoff  from  concrete  pour/sawcut,  emissions  from  equipment  exhaust,
disruption  of  species  habitat  or  migration/ESA  commitments,  damage  to  archae-
ological or cultural resources, Stormwater Pollution Prevention Plan (SWPPP)-main-
tenance  activities,  and  hazardous  materials.  We  expect  the  course  to  be  available
sometime next year.

BIOGRAPHY FOR GLORIA M. SHEPHERD

Gloria M. Shepherd is the Associate Administrator for Planning, Environment and
Realty,  U.S.  Department  of  Transportation,  Federal  Highway  Administration
(FHWA).  She  previously  held  the  position  as  Director  of  Planning  for  the  FHWA.
She  joined  FHWA  in  1999  having  served  previously  as  the  Staff  Director  for  the
Transportation  Solutions  Group,  Maryland  Department  of  Transportation  (MDOT)
and  the  Deputy  Director  of  the  Office  of  Planning  and  Preliminary  Engineering
Maryland State Highway Administration, MDOT. She was previously Chief of Staff
for  the  Commissioner  of  the  New  York  State’s  Department  of  Transportation  (NYS
DOT).

She earned her Masters of Law degree from Georgetown University, Doctor of Ju-
risprudence  degree  from  Albany  Law  School,  and  her  Doctor  of  Arts  from  the  Uni-
versity at Albany (SUNY).

Chairman WU. Thank you very much, Ms. Shepherd. Mr. Grum-

bles, welcome to the Committee.

STATEMENT OF MR. BENJAMIN H. GRUMBLES, ASSISTANT AD-
MINISTRATOR  FOR  WATER,  U.S.  ENVIRONMENTAL  PROTEC-
TION AGENCY
Mr.  GRUMBLES.  Thank  you  very  much  Mr.  Chairman,  Congress-
man Gingrey, Congressman Ehlers, Congressman Baird. It is great
to be back before this committee.

It  is  an  honor  and  it  is  an  even  greater  opportunity  to  discuss
and  to  promote  green  infrastructure,  for  transportation  and  for
healthier watersheds, as the wave of the future for this country as
we look at the water and the transportation challenges.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

I,  too,  will  be  brief  and  summarize  my  testimony,  but  the  major
point  here  is  that  the  U.S.  EPA,  in  collaboration  with  other  agen-
cies,  such  as  the  Federal  Highways  and  also  governmental  and
nongovernmental  partners,  are  advancing  this  concept  of  green  in-
frastructure like never before, because we see, through technology,
innovation,  and  collaboration,  it  is  a  sustainable  way  forward  to
also accelerate environmental progress.

This is a very important part of our four pillars of sustainability.
When it comes to infrastructure, and that pillar of a watershed ap-
proach, the Administrator’s objective is to change the way America
views  and  values  infrastructure.  The  objective  is  to  not  ‘‘just’’  em-
phasize  the  critical  importance  of  it  but  also  find  environmentally
sensitive approaches. That is why we are so excited about green in-
frastructure. And in the transportation arena in particular, we are
very enthused about the Green Highways Partnership. EPA Region
3  and  the  Federal  Highways  and  many  partners  have  been  in-
volved over the past couple years in an innovative collaboration. In
this  collaboration  we  pursue  technologies;  porous  pavements  and
concrete;  practical  and  protective  wetlands  strategies;  and  ways  to
address  one  of  the  fundamental  challenges  and  concerns  to  water-
sheds  across  the  country,  and  that 
is  stormwater  runoff,
stormwater  contamination.  So,  we  are  very  enthused  about  green
highways and green infrastructure transportation methods.

I  want  to  just  emphasize  that  for  us,  as  you  pointed  out  in  your
statement, the term itself is not a rigid definition. For us, green in-
frastructure is systems or practices that use or mimic natural proc-
esses  to  focus  on  vegetation,  infiltration,  evapotranspiration,  rec-
lamation, and re-use of excess stormwater.

In this watershed, where we are right now in the Capitol, in the
Chesapeake  Bay  watershed,  we  know  that  over  the  last  ten  years,
population  has  increased  seven  percent,  and  the  amount  of  imper-
vious  surface  has  increased  41  percent.  We  know  that  has  adverse
environmental  impacts.  We  are  committed  to  working  together
with  you  and  other  committees,  with  colleagues  outside  of  govern-
ment,  and  with  agencies  to  advance  green  infrastructure  concepts.
What  I  want  to  mention  as  well  is  that  the  Agency  has  entered
into some significant memoranda and agreements. One of them, on
April  9,  the  Administrator  of  EPA  entered  into  an  agreement  with
the Natural Resources Defense Council, the National Association of
Clean  Water  Agencies,  the  Low  Impact  Development  Center,  and
also,  the  Association  of  State  and  Interstate  Water  Pollution  Con-
trol  Administrators  to  advance  green  infrastructure  concepts,  to
use  rain  gardens  and  green  roofs,  to  protect  wetlands,  to  come  up
with  innovative  approaches  and  different  types  of  concrete  that
help reduce concerns about stormwater pollution. And we are com-
mitted to following through on that important effort.

I  too  have  also  signaled  to  the  various  EPA  Regions  that  green
infrastructure is a priority for the National Water Program, and so,
we  are  going  to  be  taking  advantage  of  your  leadership  in  having
this  hearing  and  moving  forward  with  approaches,  ways  to  reduce
barriers.  Sometimes  the  barriers  may  be  due  to  local  regulation.
Sometimes it is just due to people not understanding that they can
have  healthier  watersheds  and  transportation  systems  by  using
these innovative technologies.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

One thing I did also want to point out, that a very important ef-
fort  that  has  been  critical  to  EPA’s  interests  in  and  approach  on
working  with  others  on  green  infrastructure  is  the  NRDC  rooftops
to  rivers  report.  One  of  the  greatest  challenges  in  this  country,  in
addition  to  stormwater  runoff  from  transportation  systems,  is
sewer  overflows  and  stormwater  pollution.  And  so,  this  report  pro-
vides  green  strategies  for  controlling  stormwater  and  combined
sewer  overflows,  and  it  identifies  various  areas  in  the  country,  in-
cluding Portland, Oregon and other cities, that are showing leader-
ship.

So,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  look  forward  to  answering  questions  that
you  and  your  colleagues  have  and  to  working  with  you  to  promote
green 
infrastructure  transportation  and  healthier  watersheds
across the country.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Grumbles follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF BENJAMIN H. GRUMBLES

I. Introduction

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  am  Benjamin  Grumbles,  As-
sistant  Administrator  for  Water  at  the  United  States  Environmental  Protection
Agency (EPA). Thank you for inviting me to discuss EPA’s programs and initiatives
on  green  infrastructure,  clean  water,  and  healthy  watersheds.  I  believe  that  there
are  many  opportunities  for  green  infrastructure  practices  to  be  applied  to  protect
water  quality  and  enhance  our  communities.  States  and  thousands  of  communities
and  transportation  agencies  across  the  Nation  face  difficult  challenges  in  meeting
stormwater  and  sewer  overflow  regulatory  requirements.  Green  infrastructure  pro-
vides  tools  for  these  communities  to  meet  regulatory  requirements  and  non-regu-
latory  needs  in  the  context  of  broader  community  goals.  EPA  believes  green  infra-
structure  has  great  potential  to  advance  environmental  protection  and  economic
prosperity through technology, innovation, and collaboration.
II. What  Is  Green  Infrastructure,  and  How  Does  It  Help  Protect  Water

Quality?

‘‘Green Infrastructure’’ is a relatively new and flexible term, and it has been used
by various speakers and writers in various contexts. Thus, to date, there is no uni-
versally established definition of the term. In addition, several other terms are often
used interchangeably with, or as aspects of, ‘‘green infrastructure,’’ such as ‘‘low im-
pact  development  (LID)’’  and  ‘‘conservation  development.’’  In  my  remarks  today,  as
well  as  in  my  March  5,  2007,  memorandum  [see  Attachment  A]  entitled,  ‘‘Using
Green  Infrastructure  to  Protect  Water  Quality  in  Stormwater,  CSO,  Nonpoint
Source and other Water Programs,’’ I have intended the term ‘‘green infrastructure’’
to  generally  refer  to  systems  and  practices  that  use  or  mimic  natural  processes  to
infiltrate,  evapotranspirate  (the  return  of  water  to  the  atmosphere  either  through
evaporation  or  by  plants),  or  re-use  stormwater  on  the  site  where  it  is  generated.
Green  infrastructure  encompasses  a  large  set  of  specific  practices.  Typical  tech-
niques  include  literally  green  practices  such  as  green  roofs,  rain  gardens,  and  bio-
swales.  However,  the  term  is  also  often  used  to  include  other  technologies,  such  as
permeable  concrete  or  rain  barrels,  that  similarly  promote  the  onsite  infiltration,
evapotranspiration,  or  re-use  of  stormwater.  At  EPA,  we  promote  all  such  onsite
practices and technologies under the green infrastructure umbrella.

Green infrastructure practices protect water quality primarily in two ways. First,
they  reduce  the  amount  of  pollutants  that  run  off  a  site  and  ultimately  are  dis-
charged  into  adjacent  waterbodies.  Second,  they  reduce  or  eliminate  the  water  that
runs  off  the  site.  Traditional  development  practices  cover  large  areas  of  the  ground
with  impervious  surfaces  such  as  roads,  driveways,  and  buildings.  The  Center  for
Watershed  Protection  (‘‘CWP’’)  has  classified  our  nation’s  development  patterns  as
‘‘habitat for cars, habitat for people, and habitat for nature.’’ Once such development
occurs, rainwater cannot infiltrate into the ground, but rather runs offsite at levels
that  are  much  higher  than  would  naturally  occur.  The  collective  force  of  all  such
rainwater scours streams, erodes stream banks, and thereby causes large quantities
of  sediment  and  other  entrained  pollutants  to  enter  the  waterbody  each  time  it
rains.  Green  infrastructure  techniques  are  designed  to  reduce  such  runoff  through

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

infiltration, evapo-transpiration and re-use, thereby helping to protect the receiving
streams as well as replenish ground-water supplies.

EPA believes that green infrastructure approaches and practices can be a signifi-
cant  component  of  states’  and  cities’  programs  to  reduce  and  control  stormwater,
combined sewer overflows, and nonpoint source pollution. They can be used by com-
munities to help meet requirements of their stormwater permits under the National
Pollutant  Discharge  Elimination  System  (‘‘NPDES’’)  permit  program  under  the
Clean Water Act, and similarly can play a significant role in the creation and imple-
mentation  of  long-term  control  plans  (‘‘LTCP’’)  to  reduce  combined  sewer  overflows.
Moreover, green infrastructure can play a critical role in the broader context of sus-
tainable  infrastructure  by  being  integrated  into  comprehensive  plans  that  simulta-
neously  address  communities’  drinking  water  supply,  wastewater  management,
stormwater  management  and  recreational  needs.  The  use  of  green  infrastructure
can  help  communities  meet  their  overall  water  resource  management  goals  and  re-
duce  the  costs  (or  free  up  funding  for  other  uses  such  as  land  purchases)  of  con-
structing  and  maintaining  engineered  infrastructure  including  pipes  and  treatment
systems.

There  are  many  green  technologies  that  can  help  protect  water  quality,  and  no
single set of practices can be identified as the best for all circumstances; approaches
should  be  tailored  to  fit  local  circumstances.  For  example,  in  a  very  heavily  devel-
oped downtown area, where space is at a premium, the placement of green roofs on
the  top  of  office  buildings  and  residential  high  rises  may  be  the  most  economical
way to retain stormwater on site. A recent study of green roofs in Portland, Oregon
demonstrated  that,  over  a  period  of  18  months  which  included  the  wettest  month
on record, five different configurations of green roof types and thickness reduced the
volume of runoff leaving the site 65 to 94 percent. On the other hand, in a suburban
setting  characterized  by  many  single-family  homes,  rain  gardens  might  provide  a
more  cost-effective  means  to  obtain  similar  results.  Similarly,  the  problems  pre-
sented  and  the  solutions  to  be  prescribed  will  differ  greatly  between  Washington,
D.C., and the arid Southwest. Thus the determination of the most appropriate tech-
nologies  will  depend  on  a  number  of  site-specific  factors,  such  as  available  space,
soil characteristics, depth of the water table, and climatic factors.
III. To  What  Extent  Are  States  and  Communities  Already  Implementing

Green Infrastructure Projects?

In  the  1990’s,  several  communities  and  nonprofit  groups  began  promoting  and
demonstrating  the  effectiveness  of  green  infrastructure  techniques.  In  2000,  Prince
George’s County, MD, authored, and EPA published, two companion books, ‘‘LID De-
sign  Strategies’’  and  ‘‘LID  Hydrologic  Analysis,’’  which  provided  detailed  guidance
for  local  communities  to  install  rain  gardens  and  other  LID  techniques  to  reduce
and  control  stormwater  runoff.  Since  that  time,  throughout  the  country,  numerous
additional documents have been published, conferences and technical seminars held,
and  local  ordinances  modified  or  enacted,  that  promote  the  incorporation  of  green
infrastructure into development practices. See, e.g., www.epa.gov/nps/lid.

A number of cities across the Nation are already investing heavily in green infra-
structure  in  order  to  manage  their  stormwater  and/or  abate  their  combined  sewer
overflows. The list includes large cities such as Portland (OR), Seattle (WA), Chicago
(IL),  and  Philadelphia  (PA),  and  smaller  jurisdictions  such  as  Lexana  (KS),  Prince
George’s  County  (MD),  Griffith  (GA),  Emoryville  (CA),  Warsaw  and  Stafford  Coun-
ties  (VA),  and  Huntersville  (NC).  This  list  is  growing  as  I  speak,  with  recent  an-
nouncements,  proposed  and  final  ordinances,  and  policy  changes  having  been  made
by  the  cities  of  Boston,  Washington,  D.C.,  and  New  York  City,  and  by  states  such
as California and New Jersey.

Many  organizations  are  currently  working  cooperatively  to  improve  our  under-
standing of the costs and benefits of green infrastructure. Nonprofit groups such as
the LID Center, Center for Neighborhood Technology, Casey Trees, CWP, and others
have  published  studies  that  estimate  the  costs,  cost  savings,  and/or  water  quality
benefits associated with various LID technologies at particular sites. Detailed stud-
ies  and  demonstration  projects  are  being  implemented  by  leading  universities
around the country, federal agencies (e.g., the Department of Defense has published
an  LID  Design  Manual  to  be  used  at  all  DOD  facilities  and  recently  FHWA  and
EPA  co-founded  a  Green  Highways  Partnership  grant  for  innovative  watershed
management  projects  within  the  Anacostia  Watershed)  and  State  and  local  govern-
ments  (e.g.,  through  funding  provided  by  EPA’s  Nonpoint  Source  Program  under
Section 319 of the Clean Water Act).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

IV. What is EPA Doing to Promote Increased Adoption of Green Infrastruc-

ture?

A. Partnerships to Promote Green Infrastructure

On  March  7,  2007,  I  issued  a  memorandum  to  all  of  EPA’s  Regional  Administra-
tors  expressing  my  strong  support  for  the  increased  development  and  use  of  green
infrastructure  in  water  program  implementation.  I  listed  the  many  benefits  that
green  infrastructure  provides,  including  cleaner  water,  enhanced  water  supplies,
cleaner  air,  reduced  urban  temperatures,  increased  energy  efficiency,  community
benefits, and cost savings. On April 19, 2007, EPA Administrator Stephen L. John-
son signed a ‘‘Green Infrastructure Statement of Intent’’ with representatives of the
National  Association  of  Clean  Water  Agencies,  Natural  Resources  Defense  Council
(‘‘NRDC’’), LID Center, and Association of State and Interstate Water Pollution Con-
trol Administrators, that formalized a collaborative effort among the signatory orga-
nizations  to  promote  the  benefits  of  using  green  infrastructure  in  protecting  drink-
ing water supplies and public health, mitigating overflows from combined and sepa-
rate  sewers  and  reducing  stormwater  pollution,  and  to  encourage  the  use  of  green
infrastructure by cities and wastewater treatment plants as a prominent component
of  their  programs.  EPA  will  work  to  include  green  infrastructure  components  and
water quality trading and watershed projects. EPA is working with these and other
key  groups  to  develop  a  multi-pronged  green 
infrastructure  strategy.  See
www.epa.gov/npdes/greeninfrastructure.

At  the  same  time,  EPA  has  partnered  with  numerous  organizations  in  a  variety
of  other  forums  to  promote  and  understand  the  benefits  of  green  infrastructure  ap-
proaches  and  practices.  We  are  working  with  non-governmental  organizations  and
associations  such  as  the  American  Institute  of  Architects  to  promote  urban  design
and  planning  to  protect  and  restore  water  resources.  We  are  participating  in  an  ef-
fort  led  by  Ladybird  Wildflower  Center  and  the  American  Society  of  Landscape  Ar-
chitects  to  develop  sustainability  metrics  to  aid  design  and  planning  professionals
in designing landscapes that are functional components of our water resource infra-
structure. To promote green building, we are working with the U.S. Green Building
Council,  the  Congress  for  the  New  Urbanism  and  NRDC  to  incorporate  metrics  for
onsite  infiltration,  evapotranspiration  and  re-use  into  a  new  Leadership  in  Energy
and  Environmental  Design  for  Neighborhood  Development  (LEED–ND)  rating  sys-
tem. As another example, working with The Conservation Fund, EPA, and the U.S.
Department  of  Agriculture  Forest  Service  has  sponsored  training  for  diverse  audi-
ences  and  participated  in  stakeholder  processes  in  the  development  of  green  infra-
structure plans at different geographic scales. There are in fact many other coopera-
tive initiatives, such as a Source Water Collaborative and a Sustainable Infrastruc-
ture  Initiative,  whereby  EPA  works  actively  with  many  partners  to  promote  green
infrastructure.

EPA has also funded and partnered with leading engineering and science organi-
zations  in  the  United  States,  and  the  Federal  Highway  Administration  (FHWA),  in
the  development  of  the  International  Stormwater  Best  Management  Practices
(BMP) Database. The database, available online at www.bmpdatabase.org, provides
a public platform for sharing information on best management practices to manage
stormwater, including LID practices.
B. Overcoming Existing Barriers to Green Infrastructure

The  future  looks  very  bright  for  green  infrastructure.  However,  we  will  need  to
overcome some long-standing barriers in order to expedite its progress. Pursuant to
the April 19, 2007, agreement that Administrator Johnson co-signed with partnering
groups,  EPA  and  its  partners  have  begun  to  work  together  to  meet  its  objectives.
These include components such as:

structure approaches.

• Continuing  research  and  development  of  green  infrastructure  management
practices  performance  and  effectiveness.  This  information  is  critical  to  in-
creasing the rate of implementation of green infrastructure practices.
• Guidance,  assistance  and  education  on  selecting  and  applying  green  infra-
• Regulatory guidance that provides direction to promote utilization of green in-
frastructure approaches in lieu of, or in combination with, gray infrastructure
approaches.  Such  guidance  could  be  issued  in  the  context  of  stormwater  per-
mits, long-term control plans for combined sewer overflows, enforcement docu-
ments, and funding programs.
• Documentation  of  the  multiple  benefits  and  relative  life  cycle  costs  of  green

infrastructure approaches as compared to more traditional technologies.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

• Publicizing,  cataloging,  and  recognizing  successful  green  infrastructure

projects and approaches.

Interestingly,  one  of  the  most  significant  barriers  to  implementing  green  infra-
structure is local regulation. Many local ordinances, written a generation or two ago,
require  wide  streets,  curbs,  gutters  and  underground  storm  sewers,  and  expansive
ratios for paved parking square footage. Others require detention ponds and in some
cases  retention  ponds,  without  giving  credit  for  onsite  practices  that  infiltrate,
evapotranspirate, or re-use stormwater. Useful books have been written about such
local  codes  and  provided  guidance  on  how  to  change  them.  An  example  includes
‘‘Better Site Design: A Handbook for Changing Development Rules in Your Commu-
nity’’  (CWP,  1988,  funded  in  part  by  EPA.  EPA  intends  to  work  with  its  partners
to  continue  to  provide  information  to  municipalities,  counties,  states,  and  others
that  explains  the  many  economic,  social,  and  environmental  advantages  that  they
can achieve by using green infrastructure alternatives in appropriate circumstances.
C. EPA Research Efforts Related to Green Infrastructure

The  EPA  Water  Quality  Research  Program  includes  studies  on  the  control  of
stormwater  pollution,  including  the  use  of  green  infrastructure  processes.  Research
specific to the transportation sector has included the ability of retention basins and
constructed wetlands, such as are installed as part of highway drainage systems for
flood  control,  to  mitigate  nutrients,  sediment,  metals,  and  bacteria.  EPA  has  also
begun  an  evaluation  of  the  effectiveness  of  swales,  commonly  used  as  a  drainage
tool along roadways where transportation right-of-ways can provide space and infil-
tration systems.

EPA’s  research  program  has  documented  and  modeled  the  performance  of  porous
surfaces  in  controlling  stormwater  runoff.  The  research  program  is  now  installing
and  evaluating  porous  pavement  parking  and  a  modular  block  system.  These
projects  will  allow  evaluation  of  changes  in  the  technology  over  time.  Demonstra-
tions have also been undertaken to examine the ability of green roofs to reduce the
effect  of  roof-top  impervious  area  with  respect  to  hydrology  and  selected  stressors.
EPA will continue to evaluate these and other low impact development technologies
in the future.

EPA plans to publish a new study within the next few months that will examine
about  a  dozen  LID  and  green  infrastructure  projects.  The  vast  majority  of  these
projects have been found to cost less money than a more traditional hard infrastruc-
ture  project  would  have  cost.  Cost  savings  often  result  from  site  design  techniques
such  as  narrower  streets,  smaller  storm  sewer  pipes,  and  elimination  or  reduction
of  detention  basins,  which  can  more  than  offset  the  increased  costs  of  adding  some
LID practices.

Consideration of additional factors, such as the energy savings achieved by green
roofs or the increased sales value of a home with a rain garden and reduced imper-
viousness, could tip the cost-benefit balance even more in favor of green infrastruc-
ture.
V. Green Infrastructure and Transportation

Transportation,  ranging  from  super-highways  to  unpaved  county  roads,  con-
stitutes  a  significant  component  of  our  national  infrastructure.  As  such,  it  presents
similar  opportunities  for  the  incorporation  of  green  infrastructure  techniques,  such
as  diverting  flows  onto  medians  and  rights-of-way,  where  the  flows  may  be
evapotranspirated and/or infiltrated.

EPA  cooperates  with  federal  agencies  (e.g.,  Department  of  Transportation,  U.S.
Department  of  Agriculture  Forest  Service,  and  Bureau  of  Land  Management),  the
National Association of County Engineers, the National Association of Counties, the
American Public Works Association, and State and local governments to promote en-
vironmentally  sound  LID  designs  and  maintenance  practices  for  low  volume  and
rural  roads.  Working  together,  we  have  collectively  developed  a  guidance  manual,
a  website  to  promote  environmentally  sound  maintenance  practices  for  dirt  and
gravel  roads  (http://www.ltapt2.org/resources/ruralresources.php),  and,  through
DOT’s  Local  Transportation  Assistance  Program  (LTAP),  a  clearinghouse  and  elec-
tronic discussion list-serve focused on environmental considerations relating to low-
volume  roads.  In  addition,  EPA  staff  actively  participates  in  Transportation  Re-
search  Board  (‘‘TRB’’)  committees  on  low  volume  roads,  ecology  and  transportation,
and  environmental  analysis  in  transportation,  and  have  worked  with  the  Federal
Highway  Administration  (FHWA)  to  develop  training  courses  on  water  quality/
stormwater  management  and  erosion  and  sediment  control  for  highway  engineers
and public works staff.

An  essential  aspect  of  any  green  infrastructure  strategy  is  comprehensive  plan-
ning.  Watershed  planning  should  be  integrated  with  transportation  planning  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

other  local  and  regional  community  planning  efforts.  EPA  participated  on  a
workgroup chaired by FHWA that wrote Eco-Logical: An Ecosystem Approach to De-
veloping  Infrastructure  Projects.  Eco-Logical  emphasizes  integrated  planning  ap-
proaches. EPA has worked with FHWA and groups such as the National Association
of Regional Councils to promote integrated planning to protect water resources. Ap-
proaches  such  as  Context  Sensitive  Solutions  help  communities  plan  the  placement
and  design  of  transportation  facilities  that  are  safe  and  meet  a  community’s  trans-
portation  needs  while  preserving  scenic,  aesthetic,  historic  and  environmental  re-
sources.
A Transportation Model: The Green Highways Partnership

EPA  is  very  proud  to  be  a  primary  sponsor  of  the  Green  Highways  Partnership,
a  voluntary,  public/private  collaboration  in  the  Mid-Atlantic  region  with  an  expan-
sive  list  of  partners  from  the  environmental,  transportation  and  industry  sectors.
Green  Highways,  like  Green  Infrastructure,  is  not  a  defined  term  of  art.  However,
some characteristics of green highways are that they are:

• built  with  permeable  materials  that  provide  superior  watershed-driven
stormwater  management,  thus  preventing  metals  and  toxins  from  leaching
into streams and rivers;

• constructed with recycled materials, thereby reducing landfill usage; and
• designed  using  cutting-edge  technologies  to  protect  critical  habitats,  water-
ways, and ecosystems from the adverse impacts and encroachment of highway
infrastructure.

The  Green  Highways  Partnership  is  demonstrating  the  opportunities  that  exist
through  integration  of  environmental  and  transportation  planning,  using  the  green
infrastructure  approach.  Through  concepts  such  as  regulatory  flexibility  and  mar-
ket-based  rewards,  Green  Highways  seeks  to  incorporate  environmental  stream-
lining  and  stewardship  into  all  aspects  of  the  highway  lifecycle.  Green  Highways
looks  for  opportunities  to  design  roadways  using  cutting-edge  technologies,  like
those which support green infrastructure, including LID practices, to protect critical
habitats,  waterways,  and  ecosystems  from  the  adverse  impacts  and  encroachment
of  highway  infrastructure;  build  roadways  with  permeable  materials  that  provide
superior  watershed-driven  stormwater  management,  thus  preventing  metals  and
toxins from leaching into streams and rivers; and construct roadways with recycled
materials,  thereby  reducing  landfill  usage.  The  outcome  is  sustainable  transpor-
tation  infrastructure  that  is  ‘‘beyond  compliance’’  and  leaves  the  environment  and
communities ‘‘better than before.’’

While  examples  and  practices  are  occurring  throughout  the  Mid-Atlantic  region,
the Partnership is actively engaged in several demonstrations in Maryland and DC.
The U.S. Highway 301 Waldorf Transportation Improvements project is working to-
wards  becoming  the  Nation’s  first  truly  green  highway  by  incorporating  the  prin-
ciples  of  the  Green  Highways  Partnership  and  green  infrastructure  in  its  earliest
planning stages.

Through Green Highways, EPA has partnered with FHWA, State Departments of
Transportation,  and  county  planning  organizations  to  map  the  natural  resources  in
a geographic area and conduct green infrastructure assessments to inform and com-
plement  the  comprehensive  transportation  plan.  For  example,  the  U.S.  301  Project
team is working on updating the regional green infrastructure assessment to aid in
decision-making  at  every  level  of  the  project:  location,  design,  stormwater  manage-
ment,  and  mitigation.  Similarly,  the  District  of  Columbia  DOT  has  developed  its
own  design  standards  to  create  an  infrastructure  to  support  the  sustainable  eco-
nomic  and  environmental  health  of  the  region  and  the  creation  of  livable  commu-
nities. As an example, the District DOT has implemented a bioretention cell, which
has reduced pollutant loads by more than 90 percent.
Conclusion

We have made and are continuing to make major investments in the implementa-
tion  of  programs  and  practices  to  protect  and  restore  waters  that  are  impacted  or
may  be  impacted  by  stormwater,  urban  runoff,  and  combined  sewer  overflows.
Green infrastructure can be both a cost-effective and an environmentally preferable
approach  to  reduce  stormwater  and  other  excess  flows  entering  combined  or  sepa-
rate  sewer  systems  in  combination  with,  or  in  lieu  of,  centralized  hard  infrastruc-
ture solutions. We will continue to work with this committee, our federal colleagues,
and the many partners, stakeholders, and citizens who want to promote green infra-
structure to achieve our water quality goals as well as to promote more livable com-
munities. This concludes my prepared remarks; I would be happy to respond to any
questions you may have.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

BIOGRAPHY FOR BENJAMIN H. GRUMBLES

Benjamin  H.  Grumbles  was  confirmed  by  the  United  States  Senate  on  November
20,  2004,  as  Assistant  Administrator  for  the  Office  of  Water  at  the  U.S.  Environ-
mental  Protection  Agency.  Prior  to  being  appointed  Acting  Assistant  Administrator
in  December,  2003,  Mr.  Grumbles  served  as  Deputy  Assistant  Administrator  for
Water and Acting Associate Administrator for Congressional and Intergovernmental
Relations.

Before coming to EPA in 2002, Mr. Grumbles was Deputy Chief of Staff and Envi-
ronmental Counsel for the Science Committee in the U.S. House of Representatives.
For  over  fifteen  years,  he  served  in  various  capacities  on  the  House  Transportation
and  Infrastructure  Committee  staff,  including  Senior  Counsel  for  the  Water  Re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

sources  and  Environment  Subcommittee,  and  focused  on  programs  and  activities  of
the EPA and the Army Corps of Engineers.

From 1993 to 2004, he was an adjunct Professor of Law at the George Washington
University  Law  School,  teaching  a  course  on  the  Clean  Water  Act,  Safe  Drinking
Water Act, Ocean Dumping Act, and Oil Pollution Act.

His  degrees  include  a  B.A.,  Wake  Forest  University;  J.D.,  Emory  University;  and
LL.M.  in  Environmental  Law,  from  the  George  Washington  University  Law  School.
Ben was born and raised in Louisville, Kentucky. He currently lives in Arlington,

Virginia, with his wife, Karen, and two children.

DISCUSSION

Chairman WU. Thank you very much, Mr. Grumbles.
We  have  just  been  notified  of  a  series  of,  a  long  series  of  votes,
and  I  understand  that  one  or  more  of  the  government  witnesses
may  have  to  leave  at  3:30,  so  I  am  going  to  seek  unanimous  con-
sent to ask the first two witnesses questions. And hearing no objec-
tions,  so  ordered.  Mr.  Grumbles,  I  am  going  to  confine  myself  to
one  or  two  questions,  and  then  turn  it  over  to  my  colleague,  Dr.
Gingrey.

I  very  much  appreciate  your  memorandum  written  this  March,
supporting  green  streets  and  green  efforts,  and  I  want  to  ask  you
what other guidance can or does EPA Office of Water provide to its
Regions,  to  communities  interested  in  green  transportation  infra-
structure  development,  and  how  does  your  Office  collaborate  with
regional EPA offices?

Mr. GRUMBLES. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
The National Water Program is excited about a couple opportuni-
ties  in  particular,  one  is  what  we  are  learning  in  the  Mid-Atlantic
on  the  Green  Highways  Program,  this  unique  collaboration  with
Federal  Highways  and  with  other  State  and  local  government  and
private sector entities. We are looking to share with other EPA Re-
gions through guidance or different materials. We are also very fo-
cused on working with our Enforcement and Compliance Assistance
Office, as they look at communities that have sewer overflow chal-
lenges, or stormwater problems, and looking for opportunities to in-
corporate  various  practices  that  reflect  a  green  infrastructure  ap-
proach.

It  is  also  very  important  to  the  National  Water  Program  that  it
becomes  an  important  component  of  our  overall  strategy  on  wet-
lands  protection  that  gaining,  not  simply  maintaining,  wetlands  in
the  United  States  is  a  critically  important  part  of  the  infrastruc-
ture. And then, of course, as this committee knows and has focused
on,  the  importance  of  technology  and  continuing  to  evaluate  dif-
ferent  technologies  and  approaches.  It  is  important  to  us  to  work
with  our  Research  Office  and  with  the  private  sector  and  other
agencies to advance the science and improve the environmental re-
sults  of  so  many  of  these  exciting  green  infrastructure  transpor-
tation technologies.

Chairman WU. Well, Mr. Grumbles, if there is anything that this
Congress, this committee, or this subcommittee can do to assist you
in  a  more  uniform  acceptance  of  a  green  streets  approach  across
the Regions, we would be delighted to do that.

And  with  that,  I  would  like  to  turn  over  time  to  my  colleague,

Dr. Gingrey, from Georgia.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

Mr.  GINGREY.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you,  and  in  the  interests  of
Mr.  Grumbles’  time,  in  particular,  and  also,  I  will  ask  Ms.  Shep-
herd  a  question,  and  then,  hopefully,  we  will  get  to  hear  from  the
other witnesses and question them as well.

My staff was briefing me on the hearing earlier today, and were
telling me about some of the technologies and things that could be
done. I have said well, gee, you know, I don’t think that will work.
And it was, Mr. Grumbles, in regard to the issue of regular mainte-
nance of things like porous pavement, and taking care of the vege-
tation in the bioswales, you know.

And so, my question is, because I am concerned, and then, there
is  a  recurring  criticism  of  some  of  the  green  transportation  prac-
tices, is the need for this regular maintenance, and I mentioned the
vacuuming  of  porous  pavement,  or  attending  to  the  vegetation  in
the  bio-swales.  When  you  are  reviewing  technologies  like  this  for
potential  inclusion  into  the  best  management  practices,  are  O&M
estimated by the EPA?

Do  you  look  at  these  things  and  say,  well,  what  will  it  cost  to
maintain it, and in fact, even if it is put in place, will the coopera-
tion  be  there?  I  mean,  if  you  have  got  to  vacuum  concrete  once
every  couple  of  years,  or  dig  out  and  replant  the  vegetation  every
five  years,  are  State  and  local  folks  going  to  do  that,  and  what  is
the cost to comply?

Mr. GRUMBLES. Your question is just right on target, about what
are the practical aspects and ramifications of some of these emerg-
ing technologies, and I would just say a couple things.

One, EPA is focused on environmental results more than on par-
ticular  technologies,  and  we  don’t,  through  our  ETV  program,  cer-
tify  particular  technologies.  We  do  evaluate  them,  and  our  goal  is
to  get  out  the  best  information  on  various  technologies  and  work
with others and work at the grassroots level to give them the infor-
mation, so that they can choose which technologies are the most ef-
fective and practical.

And you are exactly right that as communities, and as EPA, look
at  the  range  of  options,  because  there  is  no  one  size  fits  all,  it  de-
pends  on  the  local  circumstances  and  climate  and  geographic  fac-
tors  and  community  needs.  It  is  important  to  give  the  biggest  pos-
sible  list  and  options  and  then  provide  information.  You  are  right.
Sometimes,  as  we  move  towards  greater  vegetated  green  ap-
proaches in some areas it may not be as practical given the terrain
or the climate. But some of the experts who are on the panel, who
have  real  hands-on  experience  about  some  of  the  different  tech-
nologies, are informing us and everyone else.

Mr.  GINGREY.  Sure.  Well,  it  is  intriguing,  and  I  have  to  say,  I
mean, the highway departments in the various states, and mine in
particular,  you  know,  they  are  concerned  about  repainting  the
lines, and making sure the shoulders are safe, and things like that.
So,  even  if  you  put  some  of  these  things  in  place,  you  worry  about
the O&M.

Ms.  Shepherd,  the  training  and  technology  transfer.  In  the  end,
the  implementation  of  these  technologies  is  going  to  require  the
local  developers  and  the  planning  boards  to  accept  their  use.  It  is
kind  of  in  the  same  line  of  reasoning  that  I  had  with  Mr.  Grum-
bles.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

Ms.  Shepherd,  in  your  testimony,  you  mentioned  two  programs
that  provide  training  and  technical  assistance  for  individuals,  the
National  Highway  Institute  and  the  Local  Technical  Assistance
Program.  How  many  individuals  actually  participate  in  these  pro-
grams during the course of the year, and what are the two key dif-
ferences in these programs?

Ms. SHEPHERD. The NHI, the National Highway Institute, is the
training  arm  of  the  Federal  Highway  Administration.  That  par-
ticular  part  of  the  organization  offers  and  develops  training  based
on  the  specific  subject  matter  discipline.  So,  in  this  area,  it  would
be  the  environment  and  stormwater  management  specifically,  and
for  your  question,  it  would  be  related  to  things  like  O&M  and  all
the things that are associated with stormwater management.

We are developing a course now on environmental considerations
in  the  construction,  meaning  stormwater  management,  area.  We
work  with  the  states  to  host,  and  the  states  are  welcome  to  invite
the  local  governments  to  participate  in  that  training,  so  the  states
actually sponsor the training in connection with our National High-
way  Institute.  And  they  are  free,  because  the  states  are  actually
supporting the training. They are actually able to open up seats to
that training to their local partners, their local governments within
that state.

In  addition,  there  is  the  Local  Technical  Assistance  Program
(LTAP). There are 58 in the country, and that includes Puerto Rico.
There  are  multiple  LTAPs  in  a  number  of  states.  And  there  are
seven  LTAPs  throughout  the  country,  mostly,  obviously,  located  in
the western part of the country. And a lot of them are through the
university  systems  and  some  of  them  are  through  the  State  high-
way administrations.

Those programs are well attended, because what they do is they
actually  reach  out  to  the  locals,  the  grassroots  organizations,  the
local  State  highway  administrations  and  their  transportation  pro-
fessionals.  They  find  out  what  the  needs  of  the  specific  areas  are
and try to gear training and technical assistance, technical deploy-
ment,  based  on  what  those  local  governments  say  their  priorities
are. So, it is very much a hands-on approach with the local govern-
ments.

Mr. GINGREY. Ms. Shepherd and Mr. Grumbles, thank you. I am
sorry, Mr. Chairman. I took way beyond my five minutes, but I talk
slow. It wasn’t their fault.

Chairman WU. Now, we appreciate the gentility of the gentleman
from  Georgia,  and  we  are  down  to  about  three  minutes  before  the
vote,  but  I  understand  that  Dr.  Ehlers  has  a  question,  and  we
would  like  to  get  this  done  before  we  take  a  potentially  significant
break.

Mr. EHLERS. Well, I am from Michigan. We don’t talk much fast-
er  than  Georgia,  but  I  just  very  quickly  want  to  make  a  point.  I
am on the Transportation Committee, too. When we did the last re-
authorization,  SAFETEA–LU,  I  was  chairing  this  subcommittee,
and we fought very, very hard to get more research money into the
Department of Transportation. We did not succeed very well.

And I am wondering, since you are involved in this area, I found
it totally absurd that we have a multi-billion dollar industry, so to
speak. I don’t know of any other multi-billion dollar industry in the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

world that spends so little on research as the Department of Trans-
portation  does.  Have  things  improved  at  all?  Are  you  dedicating
more funding to research or not?

Ms.  SHEPHERD.  What  we  do  is,  since  you  acknowledge  that,
though transportation research funds were not there, as they were,
as they have been historically, what we have done is we have tried
to  do  a  lot  more  cooperative  efforts  with  our  partners,  like  the
states or AASHTO, for example, the American Association of State
Highway Transportation Officials.

As you know, sir, the states are required, through the State plan-
ning and research programs, that two percent of all the major cat-
egories  in  SAFETEA–LU  are  set  aside  for  research.  Furthermore,
we passed that to the states. Of that money, the states have to set
aside  25  percent  of  that  money  that  can  only  be  spent  on  research
and development. So, what we do is we try to pool, albeit, our lim-
ited  funding,  with  the  states  and  their  funds,  to  try  to  address
their  priority  areas.  We  also  try  to  work  with  the  Transportation
Research  Board  through  their  National  Cooperative  Highway  Re-
search Program and a number of other efforts.

So,  what  we  have  done  is,  because  of  the  limitations,  we  have
learned  to  reach  out  and  try  to  pool  funding  together  to  address
some of these major issues, by trying to increase the flexibilities for
moving funding around, given the limited amount of research reve-
nues.  So,  you  are  right.  There  is  a  significant  shortage  of  funding
that is dedicated to research, but we try to make the best use that
we can of what we have.

Mr. EHLERS. Well, thank you for this slight bit of encouragement,
and I am going to leave it up to you to raise the funds even more.
Thank you very much.

Mr. GRUMBLES. Could I just add something?
Chairman  WU.  Well,  Mr.  Grumbles,  perhaps  we  could  take  your
additional  comment  in  the  record.  We  are  somewhat  under  30  sec-
onds  for  this  first  of  five  votes,  and  I  want  to  apologize  to  all  the
witnesses  and  the  attendees.  We  will  have  to  step  away  for  how-
ever  long  it  takes  us  to  cast  these  five  votes,  and  then  we  will  re-
convene.

The Committee is in recess.
[Whereupon, at 2:58 p.m., the Subcommittee was recessed, to re-

convene at 3:48 p.m., the same day.]

Chairman  WU.  I  want  to  thank  the  forbearance  of  the  witnesses
and  the  attendees,  and  at  this  point,  I  would  like  to  recommence
testimony, with Commissioner Sam Adams. Sam, please proceed.

Panel 2:

STATEMENT OF MR. SAM ADAMS, COMMISSIONER OF PUBLIC

UTILITIES, CITY OF PORTLAND, OREGON

Mr.  ADAMS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chair,  and  Ranking  Member,  and
Committee  Members,  for  the  opportunity  to  share  with  you  some
of the lessons learned, and barriers that stand in the way, and un-
certainties that stand in the way of further application in the City
of  Portland.  And  in  talking  to  my  colleagues  in  other  cities  and
local  governments  across  the  United  States,  selectively,  sort  of  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

challenges that they have told me, in terms of greater implementa-
tion of green transportation technology.

I  also  want  to  acknowledge  your  leadership  on  this  issue,  not
only just here in Congress but also your willingness to go out with
us,  as  Transportation  Commissioner,  and  see  the  projects  up  close
and  personally.  We  are  very  grateful.  Thank  you  for  your  leader-
ship.

The  City  of  Portland  gets  37  inches  of  rain  annually,  and  that
translates  into  about  17  billion  gallons  of  transportation-related
stormwater  runoff.  In  Oregon,  Portland  specifically,  it  rains  many
days  of  the  year,  but  the  number  of  inches,  and  the  amount  of
stormwater  produced  by  the  transportation  system,  is  commensu-
rate  with  a  lot  of  cities  across  the  United  States.  Sometimes,  it
comes  in  thundershowers,  sometimes  in  snow,  but  many  cities
across the United States have the challenge or opportunity to deal
with stormwater.

In  the  City  of  Portland,  starting  in  1994,  when  we  came  under
the  jurisdiction  of  the  State  Department  of  Environmental  Quality
and  the  EPA  for  sewer  overflow  discharges  into  the  Willamette
River,  we  have  been  working  very  aggressively  to  do  the  research
and  development  and  the  experimentation,  and  the  proving  of
transportation-related  green  stormwater  approaches.  It  really  took
a  changing,  not  only  just  of  technology,  but  really,  of  outlook,  that
up  to  that  point,  stormwater  had  largely  been  treated  as  a  waste
product  or  ignored.  Stormwater  was  either  piped  directly  in
through the treated system, or directly into the river, which means
if it hit the river, it was warm, it was dirty, and it was fast-moving.
It  was  not  the  kind  of  stream  inflows  to  the  Willamette  River,
which is our major river, that we were looking for.

Instead,  sort  of  trying  to  turn  things  around,  and  doing  it  in  a
way  that  could  save  money  to  local  ratepayers.  Instead,  our  goal
was to get stormwater to percolate into the ground as much as pos-
sible. Thirty percent of our main river and most of our watersheds
come up from below, and if the water comes up from below, it tends
to  be  cool,  clean,  and  it  recharges  the  river  in  the  most  beneficial
way.

A  couple  of  examples  of  just  pictures  of  the  kinds  of  stormwater
technologies  that  mimic,  as  you  heard  from  Mr.  Grumbles,  that
mimic  the  natural  environment.  This  is  a  curb  extension,  all  three
of  these  examples  are  retrofits  of  the  existing  system  in  the  City
of  Portland,  in  which  we  have  4,000  miles  of  streets  and  roads.
That  is  a  curb  extension  in  a  residential  area.  This  is  actually  a
sidewalk  planter.  That  is  in  use  in  downtown  Portland,  taking  a
very narrow, a narrow part of the sidewalk in the street, and turn-
ing it into a functioning swale. And then, the third one is an exam-
ple of pervious pavers. Your next witness is going to talk about per-
vious  concretes.  I  don’t  want  to  steal  any  of  his  thunder,  but  we
use  that  as  well.  These  are  pervious  pavers  in  the  parking  strip.
In  terms  of  what  stands  in  the  way  of  more  application  of  these
things,  it  has  been  touched  upon,  but  it  really  is  when,  like  me,
when you are running a local government agency. In my case, I am
responsible  for  transportation.  As  you  mentioned,  environmental
services  is  a  euphemism  for  the  sewer  agency.  We  don’t  have  the
luxury  of  taking  risks  that  can  come  with  unclear  federal  regula-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

tions. In the City of Portland, we push further than most, but most
cities  won’t  do  that.  So,  some  of  the  barriers  that  we  have  faced,
and  that  I  hear  from  my  colleagues  around  the  country,  is  a  lack
of alignment of regulatory policies, with green infrastructure initia-
tives within EPA, and with the transportation agencies on the fed-
eral level.

There  has  been  some  positive  forward  motion,  in  terms  of  im-
proving  green  technologies  for  inclusion  into  federally  funded
projects,  but  as  detailed  in  my  testimony,  we  feel  like  there  is  a
long  ways  to  go.  Because  there  is  a  lack  of  federal  standards,  it
means  that  a  lot  of  the  local  governments  simply  will  not  choose
to  try  to  build  the  green  stormwater  facilities  simply  because  they
don’t  know  what  the  rules  of  success  are.  Even  though  in  the  City
of  Portland,  we  are  achieving  between  a  20  and  60  percent  reduc-
tion  in  green  stormwater  facilities,  than  if  we  had  tried  to  treat
that  same  amount  of  stormwater  through  a  traditional  drainpipe
method.

So, I appreciate the opportunity to testify. I look forward to ques-

tions and answers.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Adams follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF SAM ADAMS

Chairman Wu, Members of the Subcommittee:

It’s an honor to discuss with you the challenges and opportunities of green trans-

portation technologies.

I am Sam Adams, a member of the City Council for the City of Portland, Oregon,
and  the  Commissioner-in-Charge  of  Portland’s  Office  of  Transportation  and  Bureau
of Environmental Services.

Portland  is  a  city  of  563,000  residents,  inhabiting  145  square  miles,  spread  over
five watersheds at the confluence of the Columbia and Willamette Rivers. The City’s
transportation system consists of 4,000 miles of local streets and arterials. The sani-
tary sewer and stormwater utilities operate 2,400 miles of sanitary, stormwater and
combined sewers, 9,000 stormwater sumps and two wastewater treatment plants.

Portland  receives  37  inches  of  precipitation  per  year,  producing  17  billion  gallons
of  transportation-related  stormwater  runoff.  Historically,  we  have  treated  this
stormwater  as  a  waste  product:  channeled  to  a  sewer  or  piped  directly  to  the  Wil-
lamette  River.  This  approach  simultaneously  deprived  the  river  of  clean,  cool
groundwater  from  below,  while  flooding  it  with  warm  and  dirty  surface  runoff.  We
are committed to reverse this approach and begin to value stormwater runoff as an
asset for watershed health. To that end, I am pleased to report that Portland is the
first  city  in  the  Nation  to  adopt  comprehensive  green  street  policies  to  address  the
interrelated challenges of street design and stormwater management.

I  appear  before  you  today  to  provide  the  following  recommendations  on  the  ways
the  Federal  Government  can  promote  the  further  development  and  use  of  green
transportation infrastructure:
1. Align Regulatory Policies with Green Initiatives.

I would like to recognize Representatives Ehlers and Honda of this Subcommittee,
and  Ben  Grumbles  of  the  Office  of  Water  at  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency
(EPA) for promoting green technologies at the federal level.

The Congressional Statement of Support for Green Infrastructure sends an impor-
tant  signal  to  Members  of  Congress  about  the  need  for  a  new  approach  to  public
works. And EPA’s Green Infrastructure Statement of Intent establishes an important
partnership  with  the  National  Association  of  Clean  Water  Agencies  (NACWA)  and
Natural Resources Defense Council (NRDC) to expand the use of green technologies
nationally.

Now that a national policy consensus is taking shape, it is time for EPA and other
federal  agencies  to  align  their  regulatory  policies  accordingly.  Existing  policies  and
rules must be reviewed and updated to reflect the green revolution that is occurring
in the environmental sciences and civil engineering.

Portland is currently dealing with two issues where EPA’s regulatory policies are

frustrating our efforts to use green technologies:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

• In  2001,  Portland  attempted  to  get  regulatory  approval  for  a  comprehensive
plan  to  eliminate  combined  sewer  overflows  (CSOs),  advance  our  compliance
with the Endangered Species Act, and improve watershed health. Our ‘‘Clean
River  Plan’’  called  for  integrated  watershed  planning,  green  technologies  and
multi-purpose  infrastructure  investments  applied  over  a  20-year  period.  Un-
fortunately,  our  Plan  failed  to  get  support  from  the  Oregon  Department  of
Environmental Quality and EPA. In fact, EPA said our 2001 efforts were the
root cause of enforcement actions that Portland is dealing with now six years
later. Both agencies favored traditional engineered solutions that assured reg-
ulatory  compliance  within  a  tightly  constrained  timetable.  Neither  agency
was  willing  to  provide  additional  time  for  Portland  to  pursue  more  sustain-
able,  cost  effective  and  affordable  strategies  that  also  promoted  comprehen-
sive  watershed  health.  Had  Portland  spent  more  time  over  the  past  several
decades developing green technologies, we would have been able to reduce the
size and expense of traditional technologies.
• Green technologies incorporate stormwater quality protections to produce dis-
charges that are an asset to watershed health. These discharges more closely
emulate  the  natural  water  cycle  and  provide  multiple  ecosystem  benefits.
EPA  considers  these  treated  discharges  as  a  waste  product  and  a  potential
risk  to  groundwater.  This  interpretation  produces  regulations  that  make  it
cumbersome, costly and risky to use surface infiltrating green technologies by
requiring green technologies to be equipped with redundant filtering systems.
The  expanded  use  of  green  technologies  will  be  significantly  hindered  if  EPA
does  not  revise  its  current  policy  on  stormwater  infiltrating  through  sumps
and  drywells.  Municipalities  and  private  developers  will  not  take  advantage
of such technologies as flow-through planters and street swales that use spe-
cially designed landscaping to filter, detain and reduce stormwater runoff be-
fore it is discharged to a sewer, outfall or sump.

2. Incorporate  Green  Technologies  into  Federal  Transportation  Policies  and  Pro-

grams.
Federal  and  State  highways  traverse  Portland,  discharging  about  five  billion  gal-
lons of stormwater runoff per year. These discharges contain heavy metals, solvents,
chemicals,  particulates,  heat  and  other  pollutants  that  find  their  way  into  our
groundwater, rivers and streams. Investments in the upgrade, replacement and ad-
dition of new transportation infrastructure must include provisions for green trans-
portation  technologies.  As  with  the  EPA,  we  strongly  recommend  that  the  U.S.  De-
partment  of  Transportation  and  State  transportation  agencies  adopt  the  use  of
green  technologies  wherever  practical,  and  coordinate  their  stormwater  manage-
ment  improvements  with  those  of  municipalities.  In  addition,  federal  and  State
agencies should be required to compensate municipalities for the costs of managing
stormwater discharges from federal and State highways.
3. Support Research and Development of Green Technologies.

Developing  new  technologies  is  an  expensive  and  risky  business.  A  national  pro-
gram  of  innovative  design  and  product  development  will  help  jump  start  the  use  of
green  transportation  infrastructure,  and  promote  the  creation  of  green  economies
throughout the country. Such a program should be coordinated with EPA, National
Association  of  Clean  Water  Agencies  (NACWA),  Natural  Resource  Defense  Council
(NRDC),  State  environmental  agencies,  universities  and  municipalities.  A  national
technology  development  program  fits  nicely  into  EPA’s  Green  Infrastructure  State-
ment of Intent and the Congressional Statement of Support for Green Infrastructure.
4. Support Research on the Appropriate Placement and Performance of Green Tech-

nologies.
Developing new green technologies is not enough. Many states and municipalities
are  trying  to  determine  which  green  technologies  provide  the  most  benefits  given
specific  site  characteristics  and  watershed  conditions.  Research  on  the  performance
of  green  technologies  needs  to  become  a  national  priority  if  we  are  serious  about
their effective use. Coincidentally, compliance with current Clean Water Act require-
ments  for  the  application  of  stormwater  best  management  practices  (BMPs)  to  the
maximum  extent  practicable  (MEP)  is  also  reliant  on  a  solid  demonstration  of  the
effectiveness of those BMPs. As with technology development, research on ‘‘BMP ef-
fectiveness’’  must  be  coordinated  with  the  EPA,  NACWA,  NRDC,  State  environ-
mental  agencies,  universities  and  municipalities.  The  research  must  be  sensitive  to
the  regional  variations  of  hydrology,  climate,  plant  biology,  soils  and  other  factors
that impact the effectiveness of green technologies. The research should include on-
going  and  statistically-significant  monitoring  to  determine  the  long-term  effective-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

ness of green technologies. And the research must be transferable to and among the
end users such as municipalities, State agencies, private developers, and EPA.
5. Support Research on the Costs and Benefits of Green Technologies.

It  is  difficult  for  policy-makers  and  the  public  to  see  the  full  costs  of  environ-
mental  degradation  and  the  full  value  of  green  technologies  to  restore  watershed
health.  As  a  society,  we  have  not  developed  a  comprehensive  method  of  accounting
for  the  full  costs  and  benefits  of  stormwater  management.  We  have  not  placed  an
economic  value  on  stormwater  that  incorporates  the  full  costs  of  old  technologies
and the full value of ecosystem benefits. If we are going to begin to make decisions
in  the  best  long-term  interests  of  society  and  the  planet,  this  must  change.  A  na-
tional research program of economic research into the costs and benefits of different
stormwater management technologies is an essential companion to research on BMP
effectiveness. Solid economic analysis will support State and local efforts to develop
fair,  equitable  and  adequate  funding  mechanisms  for  public  stormwater  manage-
ment, and provide the necessary basis for the development of new market-based ini-
tiatives.
6. Support the Development of Information Technologies and Systems Modeling.

Portland  has  spent  more  than  a  decade  and  millions  of  dollars  developing  geo-
graphical  information  systems  (GIS),  watershed  characterization  techniques  and
planning  tools  needed  to  make  informed  decisions  about  capital  investments  in
stormwater  and  sanitary  sewer  infrastructure.  Our  systems  are  well  tested  and  ac-
curate  at  a  localized  level  of  planning.  We  developed  these  tools  out  of  necessity,
in support of our CSO response, in a watershed context. Soon we will add new tools
to manage our capital assets and further inform our decisions about facilities main-
tenance and replacement. We have learned that such tools are indispensable to com-
prehensive  and  integrated  watershed  planning.  Any  national  program  to  promote
green  technologies  must  include  programs  to  deliver  planning  tools  and  training  to
municipalities and states.

These recommendations are offered based on nearly two decades of ground-break-
ing  work  on  green  technologies  by  the  City  of  Portland.  I  believe  Portland  comes
by  its  leadership  position  on  green  transportation  honestly.  After  years  of  experi-
mentation,  we  have  embraced  green  technologies  as  a  core  value  to  manage
stormwater runoff from all City streets. We have designed and installed award win-
ning  street  planters,  rain  gardens  and  swales  that  integrate  seamlessly  into  the
urban  landscape.  These  green  technologies  take  pressure  off  our  combined  sewer
system,  soften  the  streetscape  and  infiltrate  stormwater  to  recharge  our  streams
and  rivers.  When  coupled  with  trees  and  native  vegetation,  our  green  streets  in-
crease  evapotranspiration  and  carbon  sequestration,  reduce  the  urban  heat  island
effect,  provide  traffic  calming,  and  add  landscape  amenities  for  adjacent  private
property. These benefits are not possible with traditional approaches to street drain-
age.
Examples of Green Transportation Technologies

Consider  the  following  three  examples  of  cost-effective  and  sustainable  green

transportation technologies:

• Portland  has  found  very  simple  ways  to  turn  traditional  streets  into  green
streets without spending substantial sums for planning, design and engineer-
ing.  Simple  street  swales  capture,  filter  and  infiltrate  stormwater  runoff  be-
fore it has a chance of getting into traditional combined or separated sewers.
These swale are carved out of the existing street along the curb immediately
upstream of a sewer inlet. Abutting property owners participated in the selec-
tion of native plants and help with simple maintenance.
• Portland  has  developed  award-winning  infiltration  planters  that  collect  and
infiltrate  street  runoff  within  the  tight  dimensions  of  an  urban  streetscape.
The  planters  are  sunken  below  the  level  of  the  sidewalk  and  receive
stormwater through grated curb cuts. Some designs allow stormwater to flow
in  and  out  of  multiple  planters  during  heavy  rain  events.  Native  vegetation
and trees facilitate drainage and provide multiple ecosystem benefits.
• Porous  pavement  and  pervious  pavers  offer  another  type  of  green  technology
that  provides  a  way  for  stormwater  to  filter  into  soils  rather  than  flow  into
sewers, streams and rivers. Portland uses both types of green paving depend-
ing  on  site  conditions,  land  uses  and  traffic  patterns.  In  the  case  of  pervious
pavers,  Portland  uses  traditional  asphalt  paving  for  the  heavily-used  trav-
eling  lanes  of  neighborhood  streets.  Pervious  pavers  are  concentrated  in  the
parking areas where runoff can be captured and filtered into the ground. Spe-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

cial soils are used to facilitate infiltration. The project takes stormwater run-
off  out  of  local  combined  sewers,  and  increases  groundwater  recharge  for  the
benefit  of  local  streets.  The  street  design  is  very  well  received  by  local  resi-
dents.

Integrating Green and Traditional Technologies

Portland’s  stormwater  systems  reflect  the  evolution  of  science,  engineering  and
regulation  over  the  City’s  156-year  life.  For  most  of  our  history,  we  conveyed
stormwater  as  quickly  as  possible  to  our  streams  and  rivers  without  much  thought
about the consequences. As we developed into an urban center, we added combined
sewers,  separated  stormwater  sewers,  sumps,  and  pollution  reduction  facilities.
Today,  we  pursue  comprehensive  strategies  that  treat  stormwater  as  an  asset  for
watershed  health.  We  incorporate  natural  functions  into  our  infrastructure  to  com-
plement, enhance and strengthen our watersheds. Portland will always have a com-
plex  and  overlapping  system  of  older  sewers  and  newer  green  technologies.  Our
challenge  and  our  opportunity  are  to  align  and  integrate  the  older  and  newer  tech-
nologies in ways and at locations that maximize their benefit to our watersheds.
Lessons Learned

In  Portland,  we  have  fundamentally  redefined  ‘‘technology’’  and  ‘‘infrastructure’’
in  order  to  capture  the  full  potential  of  green  streets  and  sustainable  stormwater
management.  To  do  otherwise  would  have  perpetuated  our  reliance  on  traditional
infrastructure  that  is  ineffective,  unsustainable  and  works  in  opposition  to  natural
systems.

Portland  has  moved  beyond  traditional  transportation  engineering  principles  to
embrace  a  comprehensive  and  multi-disciplinary  approach  to  infrastructure  based
on natural systems, soils, hydrologic function, biology, chemistry and plant sciences.
We  view  stormwater  as  an  asset  rather  than  a  liability.  We  look  for  opportunities
to seamlessly integrate man-made structures into the urban landscape in ways that
enhance and strengthen the natural functions of our watersheds.

As  with  any  new  technology  or  innovation,  our  early  efforts  required  additional
investments  in  research,  planning  and  design.  However,  after  more  than  a  decade
of  experience,  our  recent  green  street  projects  are  increasingly  cost-effective.  Our
most recent pre-design for green street projects identify design and construction sav-
ings of 20 percent to 63 percent over traditional storm sewer systems. These savings
are  calculated  without  accounting  for  the  value  of  improved  air  and  water  quality,
increased natural habitat, and other ecosystem benefits.
In Closing

A  transition  from  traditional  to  green  technologies  is  unavoidable.  We  must  has-
ten the change by expanding our definition of technology and infrastructure to inte-
grate  built  and  natural  environments.  Green  technologies  marry  together  science,
engineering  and  design  to  construct  green  infrastructure  that  is  seamless,  sustain-
able and cost effective. We need a partnership with federal and State agencies, uni-
versities  and  others  to  affect  a  fundamental  change  to  green  transportation  tech-
nologies.  This  subcommittee  can  take  an  important  first  step  by  giving  careful  con-
sideration to my recommendations:

grams

• Redefine Technology and Infrastructure
• Align Regulatory Policies with Green Initiatives
• Incorporate Green Technologies into Federal Transportation Policies and Pro-
• Support Research and Development of Green Technologies
• Support Research on BMP Effectiveness and Performance Measures
• Support Research into the Economic Value of Stormwater Management
• Support the Development of Information Technologies and Systems Modeling
Thank  you  for  your  attention  and  interest.  I  will  gladly  entertain  any  questions.

BIOGRAPHY FOR SAM ADAMS

Sam  Adams  was  elected  to  the  Portland  City  Council  in  2005.  Commissioner
Adams oversees the Office of Transportation and the Bureau of Environmental Serv-
ices.  Upon  receiving  the  two  assignments,  he  immediately  seized  upon  the  oppor-
tunity to develop a citywide greenstreets policy, which requires greenstreet develop-
ment for all newly constructed or reconstructed roadways unless technically infeasi-
ble.  The  comprehensive  greenstreets  policy  follows  the  city  council  passage  of  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

comprehensive Watershed Management Plan, the Nation’s first citywide urban nat-
ural resource baseline and plan for sustainable resource management. Still not sat-
isfied  with  his  environmental  leadership,  Commissioner  Adams  has  now  directed
the Bureau of Environmental Services to development a Green City Strategy, which
aims to manage all the city’s stormwater in a sustainable manner.

Portland’s sustainable management initiatives are necessary to complement a fed-
eral court-mandated $1.4 billion investment in underground sewer infrastructure to
mitigate combined sewer overflows.

Commissioner  Adams  is  a  strong  advocate  for  the  environment  and  has  used  his
role at the City of Portland to pursue strong policies that reduce our impact on the
naturescape  and  seek  alternatives  to  traditional  transportation  and  sewer  infra-
structures.

Prior  to  serving  a  City  Commissioner,  Sam  Adams  served  as  Chief  of  Staff  to
Mayor Vera Katz for 11 years. In the Mayor’s office he helped lead projects to revi-
talize  the  Willamette  River  and  expand  light  rail  service  to  the  Portland  Inter-
national Airport.

Commissioner  Adams  started  his  political  career  with  Representative  Peter  De
Fazio, who represents the Fourth District of Oregon. Sam Adams earned a Bachelor
of Arts in Political Science from The University of Oregon.

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you  very  much.  Mr.  Huffman,  welcome  to

the Committee.

STATEMENT  OF  MR.  DANIEL  J.  HUFFMAN,  MANAGING  DIREC-
TOR, NATIONAL RESOURCES, NATIONAL READY MIXED CON-
CRETE ASSOCIATION
Mr.  HUFFMAN.  Thank  you.  Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Wu,  and
Ranking  Member  Gingrey,  and  Congressman  Ehlers.  Mr.  Chair-
man,  as  a  resident  of  your  district,  I  am  especially  pleased  to  ap-
pear before you today to discuss the environmental benefits of per-
vious concrete pavements.

My  testimony  will  provide  a  brief  overview  of  the  properties  of
pervious  concrete,  some  real  world  applications,  and  industry  ef-
forts to enhance its broad utilization. Pervious concrete is a leading
edge infiltration technology. Its limited use in the United States in
pavement began about 25 years ago, and primarily, in Florida.

Pervious concrete can be a major element of low impact develop-
ment,  and  could  provide  for  substantial  water  harvesting.  It  al-
ready  has  been  accepted  by  EPA  as  a  recommended  best  manage-
ment practice (BMP), and the U.S. Green Building Council’s LEED
Program  allows  the  use  of  pervious  concrete  to  contribute  towards
certification.

Pervious  concrete  is  a  performance  engineered  structural  mate-
rial  used  in  the  constituents  of  conventional  Portland  cement  con-
crete,  only  with  little  or  no  sand  in  the  mixture,  allowing  for  a  15
to  30  percent  air  void  factor.  Taking  advantage  of  the  decreased
density,  pervious  concrete  is  incredibly  permeable  while  still  able
to  provide  a  quality  structural  pavement.  The  use  of  pervious  con-
crete  pavement  supports  the  many  positives  of  infiltration  tech-
nology,  including  both  groundwater  recharge  and  attempts  to  con-
trol increasing aquifer depletion.

Because a picture says a thousand words, I would like to provide
some visualization. Represented on the left is a sample of pervious
concrete, such as this one with me today. You can see the moisture
falling  onto  the  top  of  the  pervious  concrete,  immediately  passing
through, and immediately coming out the bottom. The schematic on
the  right  demonstrates  how  moisture  falls  onto  a  slab  of  pervious
concrete,  represented  by  the  gray  solid  material  on  the  top.  The

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

moisture  is  filtered,  as  it  moves  through  the  concrete,  and  then
passes through the granular base reservoir, where it is temporarily
stored,  before  it  is  percolated  into  the  subgrade,  where  in  addition
to  providing  groundwater  recharge,  it  also  provides  substantial
moisture  to  the  root  systems  of  surrounding  vegetation  as  if  no
hardscape ever existed.

This is a Sam’s Club Discount Store parking lot in Atlanta, Geor-
gia. On your left, you can see moisture accumulated on the surface
of  conventional  asphalt  pavement  immediately  following  a  rain
event. On the same site, the photo on the right shows the pervious
concrete slab that was later constructed, and you can see the com-
parison at the same time. This is a parking lot of a Wal-Mart store
in  Denver,  Colorado.  In  the  background,  you  can  see  conventional
asphalt  during  a  rain  event,  with  the  expected  standing  water  in
many  places,  while  in  the  foreground  is  a  test  section  of  pervious
concrete, which appears to show no effects of moisture at all.

The Safeway grocery store on the left has a complete parking lot
of  pervious  concrete,  and  is  shown  as  it  looked  on  April  11,  2005,
the following morning after a 12 inch snowfall had closed the Den-
ver  airport.  The  parking  lot  was  plowed  the  night  before,  and  as
soon  as  the  sun  appeared,  most  of  the  remaining  moisture  quickly
melted,  and  passed  through  the  pervious  concrete.  The  photo  on
the  right  was  taken  at  the  same  time,  and  represents  the  conven-
tional  pavement  immediately  across  the  street,  which  was  later
turned to ice when the sun went down. The temperatures dropped,
and the moisture standing on the surface refroze.

This  is  the  parking  lot  of  Finley  Field  at  the  University  of  Ten-
nessee  at  Chattanooga.  The  aerial  view  shows  pervious  concrete,
the light stripes or strips that you see there, surrounded by conven-
tional  asphalt.  This  shows  just  one  means  of  using  pervious  con-
crete for water harvesting, as the moisture trapped in the granular
base  system  immediately  beneath  the  pervious  concrete  is  pumped
over  to  the  pinkish  roof  building  on  the  left,  which  was  converted
into  a  cistern.  From  the  cistern,  the  water  is  used  to  water  all  the
vegetation  of  the  surrounding  areas  of  the  parking  lot  and  the
nearby  baseball  field.  This  building  was  built,  or  the  project  was
built about 12 years ago, and is still in very good condition.

And  finally,  this  is  a  pervious  concrete  street  in  Portland,  Or-
egon,  which  demonstrates  the  ability  to  use  pervious  concrete  also
on  roadways.  I  took  a  look  at  the  street  just  the  other  night,  Mr.
Chairman,  and  to  me,  it  looked  even  better,  as  shown  in  this  pic-
ture.  I  can  declare  it  as  what  we  would  project  to  be  a  20  to  30
year  pavement.  Here  you  can  see  pervious  concrete  being  poured
onto  a  slab,  where  concrete,  the  moisture  is  expected  to  infiltrate
at  a  rate  in  excess  of  200  inches  per  square  foot  per  hour,  which
is typical of what we get with pervious concrete.

NRMCA  recognizes  that  sustainable  development  and  environ-
mentally  friendly  pavement  technologies  are  balancing  human
needs  with  the  Earth’s  capacity  to  meet  them.  Concrete  offers  a
wide  range  of  capabilities  to  help  achieve  this  balance.  In  par-
ticular,  pervious  concrete  offers  a  compelling  solution  to  the  many
stormwater  challenges  confronted  by  communities  around  the  Na-
tion. NRMCA is a lead participant in the development of guideline
specifications  for  the  design  and  use  of  pervious  concrete  through

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

its  participation  on  the  American  Concrete  Institute’s  Technical
Committee  focused  on  this  technology.  In  addition,  NRMCA  spon-
sors  a  national  program  for  the  certification  of  concrete,  pervious
concrete contractors that is delivered regionally and locally, and re-
sulting in 1,200 certifications in the last 18 months.

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  statement.  I  would  be  pleased
to  answer  any  questions  you  or  any  of  the  Members  of  the  sub-
committee may have.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Huffman follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF DANIEL J. HUFFMAN

The National Ready Mixed Concrete Association (NRMCA) appreciates this oppor-
tunity to share its views on green transportation infrastructure technologies and the
challenges  that  exist  to  incorporating  these  technologies  into  current  infrastructure
projects.

NRMCA  is  a  national  trade  association  representing  producers  of  ready  mixed
concrete and those companies that provide materials, equipment, and support to the
ready  mixed  concrete  industry.  Our  association  has  been  working  vigorously  over
the past several years to promote the broader use of concrete materials as an envi-
ronmentally  friendly  technology.  These  technologies  exist  within  the  realm  of  con-
crete  materials  being  broadly  produced  today  especially  as  it  relates  to  concrete
pavements.  Pervious  concrete  pavement  is  just  one  of  many  forms  of  concrete  that
are  especially  beneficial  for  environmental  transportation  related  applications.  In
addition, there is a vast range of highly significant environmental qualities that con-
ventional  concrete  contributes  to  transportation  and  all  other  environmental  appli-
cations depending upon the targeted goal (i.e., urban heat island mitigation, energy
savings, use of re-cycled materials, etc.)
GREEN PAVEMENT TECHNOLOGIES
Pervious Concrete

Material  known  as  pervious  concrete  is  especially  compelling  as  a  leading  edge
green  building  technology.  It  was  reportedly  first  used  in  Europe  more  than  100
years  ago  for  non-pavement  applications,  its  limited  use  in  the  United  States  in
pavement began only 20–25 years ago and primarily in Florida. In addition to offer-
ing  the  opportunity  to  deploy  a  major  element  of  Low  Impact  Development  (LID)
and  even  initiate  substantial  Water  Harvesting,  pervious  concrete  already  has  es-
tablished  acceptance  by  the  U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency  (EPA)  as  a  rec-
ommended Best Management Practice (BMP) means of stormwater management on
a local basis. However, it has recently garnered much attention due to increasingly
stringent  Clean  Water  Act  stormwater  management  guidelines  and  particularly  in
response  to  the  National  Pollution  Discharge  Elimination  System  (NPDES)  Phase
II  Stormwater  Program.  Among  other  modifications,  Phase  II  applied  guidelines  to
commercial  projects  sites  of  one  acre  or  more  and  combined  with  the  increasing
focus on LID have greatly stimulated interest in infiltration technology, which is es-
sentially what pervious concrete provides.

Pervious concrete is a performance-engineered structural material using the usual
constituents  of  conventional  portland  cement  concrete,  only  with  little  or  no  sand
in  the  mixture,  allowing  for  a  15–30  percent  air  void  factor.  Taking  advantage  of
the corresponding decreased density, pervious concrete is incredibly permeable while
still  able  to  provide  a  quality  structural  pavement.  Instead  of  moisture  (i.e.,  rain/
snow melt) running off the surface horizontally, virtually all stormwater falling onto
the pavement is immediately infiltrated directly through the pavement and eventu-
ally  into  the  subgrade.  In  most  places  in  the  United  States,  placed  immediately
below  the  pavement  is  an  even  more  porous  aggregate  base  layer  that  functions  as
a  stormwater  reservoir  accommodating  all  the  precipitation  necessary  for  a  design
storm event. The depth and volume of the aggregate base layer is calculated relative
to  the  percolation  rate  of  the  native  soils  along  with  the  expected  rates  of  moisture
that need to be infiltrated over time. Where there are poor percolating soils or other
hydrology  challenges,  outfall  designs  and  supplementary  drainage  may  be  required
for  which  perforated  piping  systems  and  other  devices  exist.  Pavement  design
thicknesses  are  adjusted  to  meet  the  necessary  load  bearing  capability  for  a  broad
range  of  applications.  Properly  designed  and  placed  pervious  concrete  usually  re-
sults  in  a  pavement  that  can  pass  water  at  a  rate  in  excess  of  200  inches  of  rain
per  hour  thus  exceeding  the  requirements  of  almost  any  design  storm  event.  The
use  of  pervious  concrete  supports  the  many  positives  of  infiltration  technology  in-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

cluding both groundwater recharge and attempts to control increasing aquifer deple-
tion.
Pervious Concrete—Benefits and Costs

Pervious  concrete  provides  many  environmental  and  some  cost  benefits  by  reduc-
ing stormwater volume, limits the amount of pollutants being carried away by run-
off into our waterways, lakes, and oceans. However, in addition to improving overall
water  quality  by  reducing  the  volume  of  runoff,  pervious  concrete  performs  effec-
tively  as  a  filter  of  the  moisture  it  infiltrates.  The  complex  matrix  of  aggregate,
hardened cementitious paste, and air voids retains at least 80 percent of the pollut-
ant  solids.  With  the  aid  of  naturally  occurring  microorganisms  also  within  the  ma-
trix  of  the  pavement,  a  substantial  level  of  treatment  of  the  retained  solids  takes
place which are only further enhanced by exposure to the elements over time (vary-
ing temperature and sun, etc.) It is generally accepted that what pollutants do pass
through the pervious concrete system (including the granular base layer) are further
converted  by  native  soils  and  the  total  affect  on  groundwater  is  positive  in  terms
of water quality and level of replenishment.

Far and away the most common application of pervious concrete is for commercial
parking  lots.  Also,  its  use  in  residential  street  applications  is  slowly  growing  as  is
that  for  major  pedestrian  areas  of  all  types,  and  there  is  increasing  interest  even
for the largest of retail shopping centers. Unlike so many other green building tech-
nologies that may come with increased cost, most major utilizations of pervious con-
crete  technology,  such  as  for  commercial  parking  lots,  benefit  from  a  lowered  first-
cost of construction when considered on an overall project site basis. While hard cost
data  is  often  difficult  to  obtain,  that  relating  to  the  experience  of  one  residential
housing developer is perhaps representative of how the optimization of pervious con-
crete  can  lower  the  first-cost  of  construction  and  also  provide  additional  revenue
through increased site optimization:

In  2006,  owner/developer  Craig  Morrison  of  CMI  Homes  in  Bellevue,  WA,  com-
pleted  the  construction  of  a  20  home  residential  subdivision  in  Sultan,  WA,  called
Stratford  Place.  100  percent  of  the  subdivision’s  original  general  hardscape  was
built with pervious concrete—roadway, driveways, and sidewalks. CMI has provided
cost data supporting the cost savings resulting from the conversion from a site esti-
mate  using  conventional  asphalt  pavement  and  traditional  on-site  stormwater  de-
tention  to  one  where  pervious  concrete  was  actually  used.  While  the  developer  is
rather  detailed  in  his  calculations  showing  a  net  savings  overall  of  approximately
$264,000, he could also have projected increased net revenue relating to the develop-
ment of two additional home sites he was able to add resulting from the elimination
of the traditional stormwater treatment system.

The  CMI  case  demonstrates  that  progressive  owners  and  developers  see  the  use
of  a  green  technology  like  pervious  concrete  as  a  public  relations  opportunity  and
have  been  rewarded  by  some  agencies  in  the  permitting  process  for  proposing  and
building  with  green  technologies.  NPDES  Phase  II  regulations  requiring  the  treat-
ment of runoff prior to it leaving a site presents very attractive cost and site optimi-
zation  dynamics  to  an  owner  who  deploys  pervious  concrete.  The  site  optimization
dynamic  is  not  always  easy  to  quantify  in  financial  terms  but  it  is  frequently  per-
ceived by some owners as highly valuable. The positive for pervious concrete in this
respect  is  that  it  has  the  ability  to  provide  a  multi-functional  facility  that  to  a
stormwater  professional  will  function  as  stormwater  treatment  system  yet  to  a  fa-
cilities owner it is a parking lot.

Moreover, traditional stormwater management devices such as retention/detention
ponds,  swales,  and  similar  devices  are  greatly  lessened  and  in  most  cases  totally
eliminated  where  pervious  concrete  is  deployed  on  a  major  scale.  In  some  cases,
pressures are so great on major big box retailers to be responsive to stormwater reg-
ulations yet with the perceived increasing lack of ‘‘good sites’’ in most major metro-
politan  areas  they  sometimes  spend  millions  of  dollars  per  major  big  box  store  to
construct  underground  stormwater  treatment  systems  to  accommodate  an  accept-
able  minimum  amount  of  on-site  parking.  With  the  optimization  of  pervious  con-
crete,  an  owner  could  instead  eliminate  the  conventional  devices  (which  may  con-
sume  10–20  percent  of  a  site)  and  maintain  or  expand  the  area  of  his  parking  lot,
possibly increase the footprint of his building, or use the increased optimization for
some  other  revenue  generating  or  aesthetic  purpose.  The  bottom  line  economics
strongly  suggest  that  it  is  usually  less  costly  to  build  with  pervious  concrete  on  an
overall site basis compared to all that relates to traditional stormwater device utili-
zation.  Indeed,  the  financial  benefits  of  increased  site  optimization  are  potentially
highly  significant  and  for  a  high  volume  big  box  retailer  could  be  paramount  de-
pending on other site location dynamics.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

Pervious  concrete  also  has  a  number  of  other  important  benefits.  Like  conven-
tional  concrete  it  is  a  ‘‘hard-riding’’  surface  that  provides  less  resistance  and  there-
fore greater fuel efficiency. Pervious concrete can have a substantial effect on sound
mitigation.  Much  of  the  sound  of  tires  rolling  on  pavement  relates  to  the  way  air
is  compressed  and  released  ‘‘as  the  rubber  hits  the  road.’’  The  open  graded  surface
of  pervious  concrete  diminishes  this  sound  effect  as  it  does  much  to  allow  air  not
to  become  trapped  beneath  moving  vehicle  tires.  Instead,  air  can  move  relatively
easily within the upper layers of the pervious concrete void matrix thereby muffling
any  road  noise.  There  is  also  strong  evidence  that  in  many  places  in  the  country
subjected  to  snowfall,  snowmelt  actually  leaves  the  surface  of  pervious  concrete
much  faster  than  that  of  conventional  pavement  because  the  moisture  has  a  place
to  go—directly  down.  This  rapid  removal  of  snowmelt  greatly  limits  the  likelihood
of  ice  formation  on  pavement  due  to  snowmelt  refreezing  when  day  time  sun  and
ambient  temperatures  may  convert  snow  to  liquid  but  then  subjects  it  to  becoming
ICE when night falls, temperatures drop and it refreezes.
Pervious Concrete Contributes to Environmental Protection

A  largely  untapped  and  potentially  huge  opportunity  exists  for  society  to  HAR-
VEST STORMWATER. This could especially be of interest in the very dry climates
of the far west and other areas of the country with increasing pressure on the water
supply.  While  the  strategy  focused  on  green  roof  technology  to  harvest  stormwater
is sound and getting a large amount of attention, we are barely scratching the sur-
face on the potential to broadly harvest stormwater through the technology pervious
concrete  represents.  The  amount  of  hardscape  that  is  non-roof  material  offers  vast
potential.  Taking  the  example  of  many  retail  shopping  centers,  the  surface  area  of
on-grade parking is generally considered to be three to four times that of the build-
ings  it  is  serving.  Why  not  use  pervious  concrete  to  harvest  water  for  gray  water
re-use?  The  technology  to  do  that  already  exists  and  is  relatively  simple.  12  years
ago at Finely Stadium, a sports venue at the University of Tennessee (Chattanooga),
a parking lot was constructed using pervious concrete in all the parking spaces. The
water  passing  through  the  pervious  concrete  into  the  granular  base  reservoir  is
piped  to  an  existing  site  adjacent  building  that  was  modified  to  become  a  cistern.
The  water  that  otherwise  would  have  been  pollutant  carrying  runoff  12  years  ago
has  been  used  instead  as  gray  water  for  watering  not  only  the  vegetation  directly
on the site but also a nearby baseball field.

Other  important  environmental  benefits  supporting  the  use  of  pervious  concrete
include  its  potential  to  save  energy.  Like  conventional  concrete,  portland  cement
and other supplementary cementitious materials are used in pervious concrete pave-
ment and are much LIGHTER in color than the binder used by their respective pe-
troleum based counterparts. Concrete is vastly superior in light reflectivity, increas-
ingly  evaluated  by  Solar  Reflectance  Index  (SRI),  so  the  amount  of  night  illumina-
tion  and  its  corresponding  energy  could  be  greatly  reduced  where  some  concrete
pavements are deployed. Additionally, concrete’s superior position as a pavement to
enhance  urban  heat  island  mitigation  is  well  documented  by  the  EPA  and  other
study  groups.  The  decreased  density  of  pervious  concrete  also  has  a  positive  effect
on  heat  island  dynamics  because  of  the  way  it  simply  absorbs  less  heat  in  the  first
place, a quality that may not specifically relate only to its superior SRI. As it relates
to  temperature  dynamics,  and  beyond  that  directed  primarily  at  the  cost  of  energy,
the  concern  for  stormwater  runoff’s  thermal  pollution  is  also  benefited  through  the
use of pervious concrete. Unlike other man-made pavements, pervious concrete does
not  share  the  heat  retaining  properties  that  contribute  to  thermal  pollution  Less
than optimally controlled levels of stormwater runoff are known to increase the tem-
perature of streams, rivers, lakes, and perhaps may have some effect on ocean tem-
peratures. This thermal pollution of waterways negatively effects the survival of fish
and various riparian life.
Energy Savings & Urban Heat Island Mitigation

While  energy  savings  and  urban  heat  island  mitigation  are  clearly  not  tech-
nologies, due to their critical roles in the battle to combat global warming, concrete’s
great  potential  to  benefit  in  that  battle  must  be  addressed.  While  in  the  context  of
pervious  concrete,  energy  savings  was  briefly  discussed;  conventional  concrete  may
be even more underutilized as a means of providing impressive energy savings. The
Solar Reflectance Index (SRI) data supporting the benefit conventional concrete pro-
vides due to its potential to lessen the need for night illumination is only one aspect
of energy savings.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

The U.S. Green Building Council’s LEED green building rating system recognizes
the  value  of  the  albedo  or  reflectivity  dynamic  and  allows  credit  toward  LEED  cer-
tification  relative  to  SRI  capability.  The  differences  in  pavement  materials  in  night
lighting  situations  is  even  more  pronounced  in  wet  weather  conditions  when  ‘‘dark
wet  roads’’  seem  to  absorb  the  light  given  off  by  vehicle  headlights  which  are  only
compounded  when  ‘‘puddles’’  and  pot  holes  also  exist.  At  least  one  extensive  study
documents  that  a  35  percent  reduction  in  the  amount  of  lighting  required  is  war-
ranted  where  conventional  concrete  is  used  instead  of  the  most  commonly  used
pavement  material.  Another  means  of  taking  advantage  of  concrete’s  superior  SRI
would  not  save  energy  but  would  improve  public  safety.  That  is,  allow  for  the  use
of  concrete  pavement’s  increased  brightness  while  not  eliminating  the  additional
light poles required of the other type of pavement so as to provide better night driv-
ing  conditions  on  roadways  and  parking  lots,  and  to  improve  pedestrian  safety
through  increased  night  visibility.  The  option  also  exists  for  improved  security  in
high  crime  areas  due  to  increased  brightness.  Possibly,  the  best  option  is  to  take
advantage  of  concrete’s  reflectivity  to  seek  the  middle  ground  in  energy  reduction
and  safety  consideration  relative  to  the  specific  environment—the  best  of  both
worlds.

The energy savings issue and conventional concrete’s superior SRI are also closely
linked  to  urban  heat  island  mitigation  dynamics.  Where  higher  SRI  materials  are
used,  they  are  holding  and  generating  less  heat  which  in  warmer  climates  would
result  in  a  corresponding  energy  savings  especially  as  it  relates  to  air  conditioning
utilization.  Where  some  major  urban  areas  are  thought  to  have  ambient  tempera-
ture  increases  of  up  to  eight  degrees  F.  due  to  heat  island  effects,  the  potentials  to
mitigate  with  the  expanded  utilization  of  concrete  pavements  presents  significant
impact  potentials  not  only  on  the  immediate  amount  of  energy  consumption  but  as
it relates to the negative health effects of ozone and smog, etc.
MEASURING ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT

Answering  the  question  of  what  makes  a  product  environmentally  friendly  is  dif-
ficult  and  complex.  It  is  important  that  there  is  a  predictable  and  reliable  process
for  answering  this  question  because  both  citizens  and  their  elected  representatives

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

are concerned about the environmental consequences of producing and using various
materials and products and they are demanding ‘‘green’’ products. This is the result
of  a  societal  awareness  that  consumption  of  manufactured  products  have  an  effect
on  resources  and  the  environment.  These  effects,  which  can  be  direct  or  indirect,
occur  at  every  stage  in  a  product’s  life  cycle—from  the  extraction  of  the  raw  mate-
rials  from  the  ground  through  the  processing,  manufacturing,  and  transportation
phases, ending with use and disposal or recycling. One methodology increasingly in
use  today  is  life  cycle  assessment  (LCA),  which  attempts  to  quantify  these  direct
and indirect effects of products and processes.

LCA  has  the  potential  to  have  a  significant  impact  on  determining  the  true
‘‘greenness’’ of a material. Standards organizations such as the American Society of
Testing  and  Materials  (ASTM)  and  the  International  Standards  Organization  (ISO)
have worked to develop consistent LCA methods and procedures in order to quantify
environmental  impacts.  Notwithstanding  these  efforts,  LCA  continues  to  receive
both  positive  and  negative  comment  on  its  utility  as  a  process  to  evaluate  environ-
mental impact. Part of the difficulty rests in the inability to define a common meth-
odology  to  determine  the  life  cycle  environmental  cost  of  a  material.  Another  dif-
ficulty lies in locating reliable data on the performance of the material and the asso-
ciated  maintenance  costs  that  occur  over  time.  Indeed,  despite  all  the  activity  in
standards  organizations  and  elsewhere,  there  is  still  debate  within  the  LCA  practi-
tioner community as to whether a scientific basis exists for applying impact assess-
ment  techniques  to  the  data  derived  from  an  LCA  process  analysis.  Nonetheless,
many standards LCA processes demonstrate that concrete’s thermal mass, combined
with an optimal amount of insulation, saves energy over the life of a building, thus
reducing energy consumption in the building sector which accounts over 40 percent
of greenhouse gas emissions from fossil fuels. However, NRMCA is not aware of any
rigorous  applications  of  LCA  pavements  to  concrete  pavements,  pervious  or  other-
wise.

However,  environmental  friendliness  can  be  reasonably  well  determined  through
analysis  and  some  level  of  reliance  on  existing  green  building  rating  systems  such
as  the  U.S.  Green  Building  Council’s  LEED  rating  system,  the  Green  Building  Ini-
tiative’s  Green  Globes  program,  or  by  EPA’s  Energy  Star  system.  As  it  relates  to
general  building,  it  could  be  noted  that  the  U.S.  General  Services  Administration
and  the  Department  of  Defense  (among  other  federal  entities)  have  produced  state-
ments  perceived  as  favorable  toward  LEED  in  particular.  The  basic  focus  areas  of
the  LEED,  Green  Globes,  and  similar  programs  seem  to  be  much  the  same.  There
is  consistent  emphasis  on  ‘‘Sustainable  Sites,’’  ‘‘Water  Efficiency,’’  Energy  and  At-
mosphere’’ and ‘‘Indoor Environmental Quality.’’

It an open question as to whether LEED, Green Globes, or Energy Star are really
suited  to  meet  the  needs  of  green  pavement  technologies.  In  this  respect,  leading
members  of  the  green  community  have  concluded  that  the  answer  to  the  question
of what is environmentally friendly is most apparent when actual use is considered.
In  the  case  of  pervious  concrete  among  the  reasons  it  can  be  considered  environ-
mentally  friendly  is  because  it  provides  an  effective  means  of  improving  overall
water  quality,  it  offers  substantial  support  to  Low  Impact  Development,  it  is  in-
cluded  among  the  EPA’s  Recommended  Best  Management  Practices  as  an  element
of stormwater management on a local/regional basis, and green building rating sys-
tems  such  as  LEED  and  Green  Globes  clearly  allow  it  to  contribute  to  the  credits
registered projects can accumulate for certification.
BARRIERS TO BUILDING GREEN

The  barriers  to  the  acceptance  and  utilization  of  both  established  and  developing
environmental  technologies  by  private  enterprise  are  many.  While  the  improved
public  relations  opportunities  and  other  values  associated  with  green  building  are
increasingly  of  interest,  off-setting  the  perceived  increases  in  first  costs  are  still
greatly  at  issue.  Owners  and  their  consultants  are  frequently  challenged  in  their
awareness  of  green  building  technologies.  While  organizations  like  the  EPA  are
working  to  educate  designers  and  builders,  the  lack  of  understanding  by  various
agencies and especially at the local and State levels does not encourage the process.
It is not that agencies and regulators are so often taking a position that overtly de-
nies  the  utilization  of  a  technology  like  pervious  concrete,  or  LID  for  that  matter,
it  is  more  likely  that  their  Best  Management  Practices  (BMPs)  just  don’t  address
such.

NRMCA has a National Accounts program which I direct on a national basis and
includes  a  team  of  technical/promotional  professionals  who  operate  primarily  from
various  regional  bases  and  are  focused  accordingly.  Our  mission  is  to  provide  tech-
nology transfer relative to the use of concrete to the entities both public and private
that have the opportunity to influence the selection of particular building materials.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

Though  primarily  focused  on  private  enterprise  we  attempt  to  cover  the  bases  with
federal agencies as well. Among the largest facilities owners we have established re-
lationships with are the big box builders and the largest commercial developers oth-
erwise, and a large number of consultant organizations to those builders and devel-
opers.

A challenge for us comes in the ability to gain acceptance of a technology like per-
vious concrete and other technologies such as insulating concrete wall systems that
have  the  potential  to  save  as  much  as  35  percent  in  the  cost  of  heating/cooling  a
home.  While  regulations  and  codes  that  simply  do  not  address  pervious  concrete
technology  are  certainly  barriers  to  acceptance,  some  of  the  challenge  is  simply
‘‘human.’’  When  presented  with  an  unfamiliar  LID  technology,  the  difficulty  that
some  people  have  with  pervious  concrete  is  not  that  it  is  LID,  but  that  it  is  not  an
existing,  established  convention.  The  relatively  simple  concept  of  allowing  moisture
to  fall  to  Earth,  pass  immediately  through  the  filtration  process  pervious  concrete
provides  and  then  infiltrated  in  most  applications  without  additional  conveyance
and  process  is  difficult  for  some  to  accept.  That  is  not  to  say  that  there  cannot  be
legitimate  concerns  about  various  soils  related  dynamics  and  other  aspects  of  hy-
drology.  However,  numerous  designers  and  acknowledged  experts  in  the  field  such
as Bruce Ferguson, Franklin Professor and former Director of the School of Environ-
mental  Design  at  the  University  of  Georgia,  and  author  of  the  book,  Porous  Pave-
ments,  suggests  that  it  is  usually  within  the  capability  of  sound  engineering  and
hydrological  design  professionals  to  overcome  many  of  those  perceived  obstacles.
Professor Ferguson goes on to say, ‘‘The observed, measured, documented, scientific
fact  is  that  properly  designed,  installed,  and  maintained  pervious  concrete  is  struc-
turally  durable  and  environmentally  beneficial.  Proven  facts  allow  us  to  discard
blindly  uniform  convention,  and  to  select  the  most  appropriate  technology  for  each
separate site-specific situation.’’
FEDERAL INCENTIVES TO BUILD GREEN

Federal  support  to  innovative  building  technologies  can  come  through  a  variety
of  means.  States  and  local  governments  are  proving  that  modest  tax  credits  can
stimulate  market  interest  in  green  building  practices  by  offsetting  any  additional
up-front  costs  such  as  energy  modeling  and  commissioning.  Tax  credits  should  be
tied  to  green  building  technologies  that  deliver  promised  results  and  speed  overall
market  transformation.  Such  tax  credits  should  apply  to  both  the  commercial  and
residential markets.

Funding programs that are focused on increased awareness of existing data, most
of  which  is  highly  supportive  of  the  technology  would  not  have  to  be  very  costly  as
perhaps the largest challenge is the awareness and acceptance of existing data. Em-
pirical data already exists that is the result of research grants or was developed by
a  host  of  universities  and  other  researchers  across  the  country.  Much  of  this  data
suffers from lack of circulation perhaps because it is generated primarily by private
enterprise. The American Concrete Institute’s Technical Committee—522—Pervious
Concrete  perhaps  collates  such  data  more  than  anyone  else,  but  communication  of
this  technology  may  not  exist  by  any  formal  means  to  government  agencies  at  any
level. Federal funding to insure such data is transferred on an appropriate basis and
broadly distributed would do much to move awareness of existing data forward.

Funds  specifically  earmarked  for  agency  personnel  to  attend  national,  regional,
and  local  programs  that  are  increasingly  available  on  specific  innovative  tech-
nologies like pervious concrete would also be highly beneficial. In the spring of 2006,
a  major  national  symposium  on  pervious  concrete  took  place  in  Nashville,  TN,  was
sponsored  by  NRMCA  with  a  call  for  technical  papers  widely  advertised.  While  the
private  sector  sent  people  from  all  parts  of  the  country  attendance  by  agency  per-
sonnel  was  limited.  On  an  on-going  basis,  NRMCA  sponsors  regional  seminars  (10
or  more  in  2007)  charging  moderate  prices  and  are  presented  by  some  of  the  top
technologists in the industry. These would be excellent venue for agency officials to
pick-up existing technology on pervious concrete.

Increased  research  grants  and  tax  incentives  for  building  that  would  deploy  tar-
geted new technologies would be of huge benefit. A positive model currently funded
and  under  final  development  relates  to  the  cooperative  effort  and  partnership  be-
tween  EPA’s  Region  III  and  NRMCA  where  strong  leadership  and  support  by
Dominique Lueckenhoff, Associate Director for Water Quality, has led to a research
grant  for  Villanova  University  to  evaluate  the  water  quality  and  other  capabilities
of  competing  porous  pavement  systems,  in  this  case,  pervious  concrete  and  porous
asphalt pavements. The grant funding has come from EPA and assistance from the
RMC Research and Education Foundation.

Positive  programs  supportive  of  new  technology  also  exist  at  the  State  and  local
level  that  would  be  highly  worthy  of  federal  support.  One  fine  example  of  such  re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

lates  to  Snohomish  County,  Washington’s  goal  of  implementing  Low  Impact  Devel-
opment.  Snohomish  County,  WA,  is  one  of  a  very  few,  and  the  first  in  the  State  of
Washington to do so. Ref: Snohomish County Ordinance 06–044, adopted July, 2006.
This  ordinance  creates  staff  leeway  to  approve  methods  which  they  determine  to
meet the County’s storm water management goals, and provides incentives to devel-
opers who use LID methods and materials. These incentives are in the form of expe-
dited  permit  processing,  which  results  in  real  monetary  incentive  to  the  developer,
who  gets  to  shorten  his  development  period,  and  get  properties  to  market  sooner.
A  technology  like  pervious  concrete  has  a  much  better  opportunity  to  be  utilized  in
this  environment  and  meets  the  environmental  goals  of  a  highly  environmentally
sensitive area such as the Puget Sound Area of Washington.

NRMCA appreciates the opportunity to present this statement for the record.

BIOGRAPHY FOR DANIEL J. HUFFMAN

Based  in  Portland,  Oregon,  Dan  is  the  Managing  Director  of  National  Resources
for  the  National  Ready  Mixed  Concrete  Assn.  (NRMCA)  a  Silver  Spring,  MD,
headquartered non-profit national trade association. For more than 25 years he has
worked throughout the west and nationally with owners, designers, contractors, and
concrete  producers  while  employed  by  various  concrete  materials  companies  includ-
ing  those  producing  ready  mixed  concrete  and  aggregate,  concrete  paving,  portland
cement,  fly  ash  pozzolan,  and  various  admixtures  for  the  modification  of  concrete.
Dan is a member of the American Concrete Institute’s (ACI) Board Advisory Com-
mittee on Sustainable Development, and is a voting member of ACI’s technical com-
mittees  on  ‘‘Pervious  Concrete’’  and  ‘‘Design  &  Construction  with  Insulating  Con-
crete Forms.’’ Most of Dan’s focus is now on technology transfer relating to sustain-
able  construction  and  the  potential  for  advancement  of  ‘‘green  building  with  con-
crete’’  technologies—and  a  national  team  of  Resource  Directors  employed  by
NRMCA in every region of the country report to Dan.

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Huffman.  Mr.  Kassoff,  welcome

to the Committee.

STATEMENT OF MR. HAL KASSOFF, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT
FOR SUSTAINABLE DEVELOPMENT, PARSONS BRINCKERHOFF
Mr.  KASSOFF.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee.  My  name 
is  Hal  Kassoff,  with  PB,  Parsons
Brinckerhoff,  a  global  engineering  consulting  firm,  and  I  also
served  for  12  years  as  State  Highway  Administrator  in  the  State
of Maryland. I very much appreciate the opportunity to be here.

Five  years  ago,  while  with  PB,  I  was  asked  by  a  colleague,  who
was  leading  a  company-wide  sustainability  initiative  for  buildings
and  transportation,  whether  I  thought  the  case  could  be  made  for
highways  as  a  net  contributor,  rather  than  a  net  detractor,  in
terms  of  sustainable  development.  I  took  on  the  assignment,  and
began  researching,  writing,  and  speaking  about  what  I  called  Sus-
tainable Highways: Oxymoron or Opportunity.

I  define  sustainable  highways  as  improvements  which  achieve
better  than  before  outcomes,  not  only  for  highway  purposes,  such
as  safety,  mobility,  and  structural  integrity,  but  also  for  broader
environmental and societal goals.

While  not  as  advanced  in  sustainable  development  as  buildings,
and  not  as  inherently  sustainable  as  public  transportation,  there
are  several  underlying  reasons  why  the  concept  of  sustainable
highways  is  an  idea  whose  time  has  come.  The  first  is  that  an  in-
creasingly demanding and politically active customer base, the peo-
ple we serve, want improved transportation and a healthy environ-
ment. They are not willing to sacrifice one for the other.

Second  is  that  over  90  percent  of  highway  improvements  are  on
existing,  rather  than  new  facilities,  a  radical  change  from  the  re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

cent  era  of  interstate  highway  construction.  This  offers  a  unique
opportunity to improve communities and the environment by virtue
of  a  second  generation  of  highway  projects  that  must  adhere  to
much  more  stringent  requirements,  such  as  for  air  quality,  noise,
wetlands,  water  quality,  endangered  species,  historic  preservation,
just to name a few.

The  third  factor  is  that  for  the  past  seven  or  eight  years,
AASHTO,  the  American  Association  of  State  Highway  and  Trans-
portation  Officials,  has  advanced  the  concept  of  environmental
stewardship,  accepting  responsibility  for  the  environment  as  af-
fected  by  transportation  improvements.  Perhaps  even  more  impor-
tantly,  seeking  practical  and  affordable  ways  to  enhance  it.  By  ac-
tively  approaching  and  promoting  an  approach  to  project  develop-
ment  called  context  sensitive  solutions,  AASHTO  provides  the  sin-
gle  most  important  tool  to  fulfill  environmental  stewardship  and
sustainability  goals.  And  more  recently,  AASHTO  initiated  a  proc-
ess  to  define  and  advance  a  vision  for  sustainable  transportation
throughout  this  country,  with  the  assistance  of  a  national  panel  of
professionals, which I had the privilege and honor of chairing.

A  fourth  factor  is  that  sustainable  highways  makes  good  busi-
ness  and  good  economic  sense  from  several  perspectives.  On  a
project  level,  they  contribute  to  economic  efficiency,  since  context
sensitive and sustainable highway improvements are more likely to
be  supported  and  implemented  much  faster  than  less  contextual
and  less  sustainable  alternatives,  which  are  more  likely  to  lan-
guish. Also, from a life cycle asset management perspective, invest-
ing  in  increased  durability  and  preventive  maintenance  means
lower  life  cycle  costs,  less  consumption  of  nonrenewable  resources,
and  reduced  economic  losses  to  shippers  and  travels,  who  are  de-
layed  less  frequently  by  repairs  and  reconstruction.  And  let  us  not
forget the role of highways in an ever expanding recycling industry,
which is second to none.

There  are  many  opportunities  for  sustainable  highway  practices,
from the earliest phases of planning, where land use and conserva-
tion  and  transportation  decisions  can  be  better  coordinated,  as  en-
couraged by SAFETEA-LU legislation, to technologies for fast track
construction,  managing  traffic,  and  reducing  impacts  during  and
after  construction.  These  opportunities  are  articulated  in  a  series
of  tools,  with  which  we  were  associated,  including  a  compendium
of environmental stewardship practices in construction and mainte-
nance,  and  a  30-page  highway  sustainability  checklist,  which  cov-
ers planning all the way to operations. These opportunities are un-
derscored by the cooperative Green Highways Partnership that you
have already heard about from EPA and Federal Highways.

Perhaps  the  greatest  barrier  to  sustainable  highways  lies  with
motor vehicles that use these highways, and in particular, the car-
bon footprint and related air quality and climate change issues that
arise.  A  sustainable  highways  concept  that  ignores  motor  vehicle
issues represents just part of the puzzle.

The second barrier has to do with the land use decisions that can
exploit  and  ultimately  degrade  highway  service  and  the  quality  of
life  through  strip  development  and  sprawl,  problems,  by  the  way,
that  Portland,  Oregon  is  noted  for  having  overcome  in  your  home
district, and I congratulate Portland in that regard.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

Finally,  as  a  way  to  simultaneously  induce,  as  well  as  measure
sustainability  outcomes  in  infrastructure,  we  can  apply  a  frame-
work  known  throughout  the  world  of  sustainable  development.
Mostly  outside  the  United  States,  as  the  Triple  Bottom  Line,  a
framework  to  set  targets,  measure  progress,  and  evaluate  whether
and  to  what  extent  the  so-called  better  than  before  outcomes  are
indeed achieved as we pursue a robust economy, a healthy natural
environment,  and  an  enhanced  quality  of  life,  which  we  all  cer-
tainly  want.  The  Triple  Bottom  Line  has  the  potential  to  offer  in-
centives  and  inducements  to  public  as  well  as  private  sector  deci-
sion-makers  to  pursue  sustainability  strategies  and  initiatives
without mandating the details of how to achieve these desired out-
comes. I would strongly recommend research into the best ways to
apply this Triple Bottom Line tool in the United States.

In sum, the goal of sustainable highways may, at first, sound like
an oxymoron, but in reality, represents an opportunity whose time
has come. Thank you.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Kassoff follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF HAL KASSOFF

Sustainable Highways: Oxymoron or Opportunity

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  my  name  is  Hal  Kassoff.  I  am  a
Senior Vice President and Highway Market Leader with PB, a global infrastructure
consulting  firm  with  200  offices  worldwide.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  share
these thoughts with you today.

Five  years  ago  I  was  asked  by  a  colleague  who  was  leading  a  company-wide  sus-
tainability  initiative  for  buildings  and  transportation  whether  I  thought  the  case
could  be  made  for  highways  as  a  net  contributor  rather  than  a  net  detractor  in
terms of sustainable development. I took on the assignment and began researching,
writing and speaking about what I called ‘‘Sustainable Highways: Oxymoron or Op-
portunity.’’

I define sustainable highways as improvements which achieve ‘‘better than before’’
outcomes, not only for highway purposes such as safety, mobility and structural in-
tegrity, but also for broader environmental and societal goals.

While not as advanced in sustainable development as buildings, and not as inher-
ently sustainable as public transportation, there are several underlying reasons why
the concept of sustainable highways is an idea whose time has come.

1) The  first  is  that  an  increasingly  demanding  and  politically  active  customer
base  is  expecting  more  of  us.  Our  customers  want  improved  transportation
and  a  healthy  environment.  They  are  not  willing  to  sacrifice  one  for  the
other.

2) Second  is  that  over  90  percent  of  highway  improvements  are  on  existing
rather than new facilities—a radical change from the recent era of Interstate
highway  construction.  This  offers  a  unique  opportunity  to  improve  commu-
nities  and  the  environment  by  virtue  of  a  second  generation  of  highway
projects  that  must  adhere  to  more  stringent  requirements,  such  as  for  air
quality,  noise,  wetlands,  water  quality,  endangered  species,  and  historic
preservation, to name just a few.

3) The  third  factor  is  that  for  the  past  seven  or  eight  years,  AASHTO  (the
American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials) has ad-
vanced  the  concept  of  environmental  stewardship—accepting  responsibility
for the environment as affected by transportation improvements, and seeking
practical  and  affordable  ways  to  enhance  it.  By  actively  promoting  an  ap-
proach  to  project  development  called  Context  Sensitive  Solutions,  AASHTO
provides  the  single  most  important  tool  to  fulfill  environmental  stewardship
and  sustainability  goals.  And  more  recently,  AASHTO  initiated  a  process  to
define  and  advance  a  vision  for  sustainable  transportation  with  the  assist-
ance  of  a  diverse  panel  of  professionals  which  I  have  had  the  honor  of
chairing.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

4) A  fourth  factor  is  that  sustainable  highways  make  good  business  and  eco-
nomic  sense  from  several  perspectives.  On  a  project  level,  they  can  con-
tribute  to  economic  efficiency  in  that  context  sensitive,  sustainable  highway
improvements  are  more  likely  to  be  supported  and  implemented  than  less
contextual  and  less  sustainable  alternatives  which  are  more  likely  to  lan-
guish  in  controversy.  Also,  from  a  life  cycle  asset  management  perspective,
investing  in  increased  durability  and  preventive  maintenance  means  lower
life  cycle  costs,  consumption  of  fewer  non-renewable  resources,  and  reduced
economic losses to shippers and travelers delayed by less frequent repair and
reconstruction  cycles.  And,  it  should  not  be  overlooked,  the  role  of  highways
in an ever expanding recycling industry is becoming second to none.

Opportunities  for  sustainable  highway  practices  abound,  from  the  earliest  phases
of planning where land use, conservation, and transportation decisions can be better
coordinated, as encouraged by SAFETEA–LU, to construction, maintenance and op-
erations where new technologies for fast-track construction, managing traffic, reduc-
ing noise, controlling emissions, and suppressing dust offer an array of possibilities.
These  opportunities  are  articulated  in  a  variety  of  tools  such  as  the  Compendium
of  Environmental  Stewardship  Practices  in  Construction  and  Maintenance  to  a  30-
page highway sustainability checklist from planning to operations—in both of which
I  am  proud  to  say  PB,  and  I  personally,  have  been  involved.1 They  are  evidenced
by  the  cooperative  Green  Highways  Partnership  advanced  by  EPA  and  FHWA  as
well as several State DOTs.

Clearly  the  state-of-the-art  is  advancing  at  a  rapid  pace  as  demands  for  kinder

and gentler infrastructure projects increasingly prevail.

Perhaps the greatest barrier to sustainable highways lies with the motor vehicles
that  use  them  and  in  particular,  the  carbon  foot  print  and  related  air  quality  and
climate change issues that arise. A sustainable highways concept that ignores motor
vehicle issues represents just part of the puzzle.

A  second  barrier  involves  land  use  decisions  that  exploit  and  ultimately  degrade
highway  service  and  quality  of  life  through  strip  development  and  sprawl  that  dis-
courage  walking  and  use  of  alternative  modes.  Land  use  planning,  zoning  and  util-
ity  location  decisions  must  be  made  in  conjunction  with  transportation  to  shape  a
more coherent and sustainable approach to growth.

Finally, as a way to simultaneously induce as well as measure sustainability out-
comes we can apply a framework known throughout the world of sustainable devel-
opment  (mostly  outside  the  United  States)  as  the  ‘‘Triple  Bottom  Line’’—a  frame-
work  to  set  targets,  measure  progress,  and  evaluate  whether  and  to  what  extent
better  than  before  outcomes  are  indeed  achieved  as  we  pursue  a  robust  economy,
a  healthy  natural  environment,  and  an  enhanced  quality  of  life.  The  triple  bottom
line  has  the  potential  to  offer  incentives  and  inducements  to  public  as  well  as  pri-
vate  sector  decision-makers  to  pursue  sustainability  strategies  and  initiatives  with-
out mandating the details of how to achieve desired outcomes. I would strongly rec-
ommend research into the best ways to apply this tool in the United States.

In sum the goal of sustainable highways may at first sound like an oxymoron, but

in reality represents an opportunity whose time has come.

BIOGRAPHY FOR HAL KASSOFF

Hal  Kassoff  is  a  Senior  Vice  President  with  PB  responsible  for  providing  leader-
ship  in  emerging  highway-related  practice  areas.  Mr.  Kassoff  has  guided  the  devel-
opment  of  a  workshop  on  Sustainable  Highways  which  he  has  delivered  to  clients
and  PB  professionals  worldwide.  He  also  led  the  team  that  produced  the  NCHRP
Compendium  of  Environmental  Stewardship  Practices  in  Construction  and  Mainte-
nance,  and  was  recognized  by  AASHTO  with  an  award  for  developing  a  Highway
Sustainability Checklist. Mr. Kassoff led a team that produced PB’s reference guide
for  Concepts  in  Contextual  Highway  Design  as  well  as  a  training  seminar  in  Con-
text Sensitive Solutions.

Prior to joining PB, Hal spent 25 years with the Maryland Department of Trans-
portation,  including  six  years  as  Director  of  Planning  and  Preliminary  Engineering
and  12  years  as  State  Highway  Administrator.  During  Hal’s  tenure,  the  Environ-

1 The  referenced  compendium  is  a  research  report  under  the  National  Cooperative  Highway
Research  Program  (NCHRP  25–25  (4) )  and  can  be  found  on  the  website  of  AASHTO’s  Center
for  Environmental  Excellence  at:  http://environment.transportation.org/environmental¥issues/
construct¥maint¥prac/compendium/manual/  The  referenced  checklist  was  developed  by  PB
and recognized by AASHTO in its 2007 National Competition Award for Transportation Profes-
sionalism. The checklist may be accessed by contacting Hal Kassoff at kassoff@pbworld.com

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

mental  Design  Division  was  established  and  SHA  was  recognized  for  its  aesthetic
and environmentally sensitive bridges and highway designs.

Hal has been a frequent speaker and has published a number of articles on Con-

text Sensitive Solutions and Sustainable Highways.

DISCUSSION

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Kassoff.  Now  comes
the  time  for  questions,  and  the  Chair  recognizes  himself  for  five
minutes.

Commissioner Adams, you mentioned that there are several chal-
lenges  faced  by  the  City  of  Portland  in  implementing  its  green
streets  initiative,  and  I  would  like  you  to  line  out,  or  lay  out  for
us what some of those challenges are, how the green streets initia-
tive would interact with existing stormwater management systems,
and that if the green streets initiative could have been fully imple-
mented,  what  the  impact  would  have  been  on  stormwater  runoff,
both in terms of costs and effectiveness.

Mr.  ADAMS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chair,  Members  of  the  Committee.
Starting in 1994, and for a series of years, including up to the last
years  that  I  have  been  Commissioner  in  charge  of  transportation
and  environmental  services,  we  have  sought  partnerships  with  the
EPA on a number of green stormwater-related projects, and indeed,
we  have  achieved  some  of  those  partnerships  with  EPA.  But  I
would personally characterize the partnerships as, the green trans-
portation  partnerships  as,  in  addition  to  the  normal  requirements
of the grey pipe solutions.

So, for instance, our sewer retrofit, which is a $1.4 billion digging
up  of  the  sewers,  big  pipes,  and  everything  else,  when  we  asked
them to supplement some of that grey pipe solution for some green
stormwater  solutions,  they  said  no,  and  in  fact,  used  that  as  the
impetus,  one  of  the  impetuses  for  a  six  year  investigation  of  the
City  that  is  still  open  and  ongoing  today.  So,  there  are  parts  of
EPA  that  I  find  to  be  very  interested  in  the  partnerships  around
green stormwater, especially related to streets, and there are other
parts of the Agency where we have experienced quite the opposite.
I  understand  the  reluctance  to  put  too  much  reliance  on  green
stormwater  solutions  that  don’t  have,  you  know,  the  stamp  of  ap-
proval  of  the  EPA,  but  I  would  hope  that  the  most  recent  good
words  that  we  have  heard  from  the  EPA  on  green  stormwater
would have happened sooner.

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you.  You  referred  in  your  testimony  to  an
unclear regulatory environment, and that there might be a long se-
ries  of  steps,  so  that  more  municipalities  or  local  jurisdictions
would  enact  green  streets  approaches  to  stormwater.  What  are
some of the steps that you think are necessary, and what are some
of  the  clarifications,  from  a  regulatory  perspective,  that  you  think
are  necessary  to  promote  green  technologies  in  stormwater  treat-
ment?

Mr.  ADAMS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chair,  Members  of  the  Committee.
I  think  one  key  issue  is,  to  get  to  those  standards,  is  to  support  a
national program of research and development around green infra-
structure  technology  and  specifically  around  green  transportation
stormwater  technologies.  A  national  technology  development  pro-
gram,  I  think,  builds  on  the  EPA’s  recent  green  infrastructure

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

statement  of  intent,  and  your  Congressional  statement  of  support
for green infrastructure.

Local  governments,  again,  need  to  know  what  the  measures  of
success are. Mr. Grumbles talked about we are not going. The EPA
is  not  going  to  dictate  the  solutions,  but  we  need  to  know,  you
know,  what  the  measures  of  success  are,  the  results  that  they  are
looking for, and projects that we can then go after.

The  other  is  that  the  specific  green  transportation  stormwater
tools  for  Portland  should  and  will  be  different  than  the  same  tools
in other parts of the United States that have different terrains, dif-
ferent  climates,  different  weather  patterns.  So,  as—if  the  EPA
would help work with local governments and State governments to
develop  some  standards  and  approaches,  they  need  to,  in  my  opin-
ion, they need to do it based on the different kinds of terrains that
exist in the United States.

The  other  is,  as  mentioned  by  my  fellow  witnesses  up  here,  and
this is to really put some rigor to the costs and benefits around the
green  transportation  technology.  We  would  welcome  that.  We  are
seeing savings, and there are parts of our city, like a lot of the cit-
ies  around  the  United  States,  where  the  existing  sewer  infrastruc-
ture,  the  pipes  are  too  small,  or  where  there  is  new  development,
or an expansion of the city, where new pipes have to be laid. What
we  are  experiencing  is  significant  savings  by  not  having  to  go  in
and put in bigger pipes, but implement green stormwater solutions,
that keep the stormwaters out of the pipe; therefore, we don’t have
to  dig  them,  and  we  realize  significant  savings  in  terms  of  where
the city is expanding and not having to put the pipes in under the
street  in  the  first  place  to  deal  with  that  stormwater  runoff  from
the streets saves money for everybody.

Again,  we  want  to  feel  assured  that  what  we  are  doing  is  going
to  meet  with  EPA’s  approval  in  the  future.  So,  those  standards,  I
think, are really key, and agreement among the Federal, State, and
local  governments  around  some  cross  benefit  methodologies  would
be incredibly useful.

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you,  Commissioner.  My  time  has  expired,
but at some point in the future, if there are records of, or estimates
of  what  potential  cost  savings  might  be  achieved,  the  Committee
would be very, very interested in that information.

And with that, I turn to the Ranking Member, Dr. Gingrey.
Mr.  GINGREY.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you.  We  touched  on  this  a
little bit before we had to break for votes, but this is, of course, ex-
tremely, extremely interesting testimony.

And  I  think  my  question  before  was,  pertained  to  best  manage-
ment practices, depending on the environment, and where you are,
and  how  much  rainfall,  but  not  just  the  total  quantity  per  year.  I
am not really sure that Oregon gets that much more, maybe Geor-
gia  has  average  rainfall  is  closer  to  50  inches  per  year.  So,  it  is
more,  I  think  you  said  37  for  Oregon.  But  it  comes  in  a  different
way. I am sure we get a lot more thunderstorms, and you get a lot
more  gentle,  steady  rain  that  everybody  likes,  and  likes  to  hear  at
night,  particularly,  if  you  have  got  a  tin  roof  on  your  house.  But
Florida and Georgia are a little bit different.

And  so,  I  guess  the  point,  and  any  one  of  the  three  of  you  can
address  this,  because  Mr.  Huffman,  obviously,  is  in  the  business,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

and Mr. Kassoff, in his testimony, is very knowledgeable about this
as  well,  different  strokes  for  different  folks,  I  guess  is  what  I  am
talking  about.  I  know  we  were  recently  in  Hamburg,  Germany,
looking  at  all  these  windmills,  and  the  discussion  was  well,  you
know,  this  is  great,  and  this  is  the  Germans  talking,  German  sci-
entists,  in  regard  to  renewable  energy  sources,  and  they  said  well,
these  windmills  are  great  up  here  in  Hamburg  on  the  North  Sea,
but  they  wouldn’t  do  a  whole  lot  of  good  on  the  equator,  whereas
the solar panels would probably be very, very efficient on the equa-
tor, but those windmills wouldn’t get you a lot of bang for the buck.
So,  it  is  this  issue  of  best  management  practices,  depending  on
where you are, and clearly, one size will not fit all, and if the Fed-
eral  Government,  and  our  two  previous  witnesses,  Ms.  Shepherd
and Mr. Grumbles, of course, of the EPA and the Federal Highway
Department, the bureaucracy tends to want to try to squeeze a one
size fits all mantra.

Talk  about  that  for  us  a  little  bit,  and  how  we  can  approach  it,
and  Mr.  Huffman  in  particular,  the  pervious  concrete,  I  think,  is
very  interesting,  the  pictures  or  the  slides  that  you  showed,  ex-
tremely  interesting,  and  how,  what  does  that  do  to  the  strength  of
the concrete, you know, over the old, traditional, rock solid concrete
with  rebars  and  all  that  stuff,  and  I  am  looking  at  something  I
have  never  seen  before.  Maybe  you  could  explain  that  to  us,  and
whether  or  not  that  would  be  applicable,  also,  to  asphalt  surfaces.
Mr. HUFFMAN. Thank you, Ranking Member Gingrey, and Mem-

bers of the Committee.

As it relates to concrete and the one size fits all, the bigger prod-
uct  area  that  is  sometimes  cast  upon  us  relates  to  porous  pave-
ments generally, and within that, there is certainly a difference be-
tween  pervious  concrete  and  some  other  porous  or  pervious  mate-
rials. For example, pervious concrete, like its counterpart on the as-
phalt side of the industry, takes large stone and sand from our con-
ventional  technologies  of  conventional  concrete,  that  is  also  used
with  Portland  cement  binder,  which  provides  a  very  rigid  binding
material.  We  take  the  sand  out,  and  we  create  a  void  structure.
The competing material, which is a petroleum-based product, which
is  frequently  referred  to  by  highway  engineers  as  flexible  pave-
ment, uses asphalt as a binder. They have large rocks in their con-
ventional product, and they also take the sand out, so basically, the
products are much the same in terms of larger rocks and a binder,
with little or no sand.

The benefits of concrete in that situation, especially, to be distin-
guished from a competing material, is that the rigid binder is ideal-
ly  situated,  or  positioned,  to  allow  for  a  voided  product,  with  15  to
30 percent void factors, and stays rigid. In respect to your question
about  strength,  yes,  it  is  true,  as  we  take  the  voids  out,  and  allow
for  decreased  density,  the  product  does  lose  some  compressive
strength.  We  compensate  for  that  by  increasing  the  depth  of  the
structure,  typically  by  about  a  50  percent  factor.  So  in  a  parking
lot,  for  example,  typically,  a  conventional  concrete  parking  lot  is
four inches in thickness, and with pervious concrete, because of the
decreased density, we increase the thickness to six inches. So, that
is the way the technology works.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

Mr.  GINGREY.  Is  it  cheaper,  and  I  am  not  sure  exactly  how  you
measure  it  and  how  you  price  it,  but  is  it  more  expensive,  and  I
am assuming the answer is yes, to put in your product for the long-
term benefit? A lot of times, you have got developers who are devel-
oping strip shopping centers and that sort of thing, and the cost is
obviously a factor. Do you get resistance from that?

Mr. HUFFMAN. We get resistance because in first costs, certainly,
the  use  of  a  product  like  pervious  concrete,  versus  a  conventional
pavement  material,  is  going  to  be  somewhat  higher.  The  offset,
that  it  greatly  advantages  the  environment  and  the  concept  of
using  this, 
is  that  because  we  will  eliminate  conventional
stormwater  detention  on  most  applications,  such  as  parking  lots,
we will actually save in the first costs of construction when we use
a  material  like  this.  For  that  reason,  many  big  box  builders  and
major shopping mall developers, anybody building big parking lots,
see this very favorably.

Mr.  KASSOFF.  Ranking  Member  Gingrey,  I  would  like  to  address
your point about the one size fits all issue, in terms of how the gov-
ernment  might  approach  this  issue  of  sustainability  and  sustain-
able highways.

First,  I  think  we  have  all  learned  over  the  years  that  specifying
outcomes, desired end results, and then, leaving flexibility to other
parties,  states,  local  governments,  private  industry,  to  figure  out
how  to  achieve  those  outcomes,  works  better  than  specifying  de-
tailed  methods,  because  we  are  such  a  diverse  country,  and  what
works in one place doesn’t necessarily work in another.

And  then,  extending  that  idea,  and  we  have  given  an  awful  lot
of  thought  to  this  idea,  of  whether  you  could  legislate  or  regulate
sustainability into effect. In the highway business, and I sense that
you  have  some  familiarity  with  how  that  works,  you  can  call  your
commissioner,  Former  President  of  AASHTO  by  the  way,  and  one
of the leading transportation officials in the country.

The  principle  that  has  been  established  for  the  past  20  to  30
years  under  NEPA.  NEPA  is  actually  older  than  that,  but  what
had evolved is this idea that when impacts are created by transpor-
tation  facilities,  the  first  order  is  try  to  avoid  them,  the  second  is
to  try  to  minimize  them,  and  the  third  is  with  whatever  impacts
are  minimally  necessary,  you  must  mitigate  those  impacts,  which
means  a  restoration  idea.  And  it  engenders  an  avoidance  of  harm,
and then, a compensation for harm by trying to draw even through
mitigation. What sustainability, and that, by the way, has found its
way  into  regulation,  and  it  is  appropriate,  if  we—I  like  to  use  the
term,  if  we  create  a  mess,  our  obligation  is  to  clean  it  up  and  fix
it.

There  are  serious  questions  whether  that  approach  alone  will
move  us  towards  sustainability,  especially  since  we  have  started
with, as you pointed out, some damage to the environment, just by
the works we have accomplished over the years. We are very proud
of these works, but there have been these unavoidable impacts.

The  sustainability  idea,  founded  on  environmental  stewardship,
which is better than before, transforms the mentality from avoiding
a  negatives  approach  into  a  create  positives.  And  the  create
positives approach, I think, can come about through, more likely to
come  about  through,  a  series  of  initiatives  and  steps  that  the  Fed-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

eral  Government  can  take,  other  than  regulation  and  hard  legisla-
tion. It could be incentivized, for example. It can be recognized that
as the Mid-Atlantic Region EPA Region has demonstrated through
their  green  highways  initiative,  that  through  cooperation  they  are
much  more  likely  to  achieve  a  faster  turnaround  and  a  better  end
result than by just riding the minimums.

So,  I  think  what  we  are  looking  for  is  performance  outcomes
rather than methods. In the first instance, a level playing field for
minimum  requirements  to  avoid,  minimize,  mitigate,  and  then,  an
incentivization through articulation of principles and policies, right
down  to  some  form  of  recognition  that  by  going  the  extra  step,
there are benefits to be achieved.

Mr. GINGREY. Thank you. Thank all of you.
Chairman WU. I would like to recognize Dr. Ehlers for five min-

Mr. EHLERS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and I have to say it real-
ly  warms  my  heart  to  hear  the  testimony.  Many  years  ago,  when
I  was  a  county  commissioner,  I  also  chaired  the  County  Board  of
Public  Works,  and  tried  to  introduce  the  ideas  of  sustainability  in
a  number  of  ways,  met  tremendous  resistance,  particularly  from
the engineers, who said you know, just another do-gooder trying to
mess  up  our  profession.  Fortunately,  I  am  a  physicist,  so  I  could
tend to argue them down sometimes, but not all the time.

And  also,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  have  to  note,  since  I  am  a  scientist,
I  always  try  to  correlate  data  I  observe,  and  I  have  noticed  some-
thing amazing about this committee. A very disproportionate num-
ber of the witnesses tend to come from Portland, Oregon.

Chairman WU. It is means as a forward thinking.
Mr.  EHLERS.  Yeah.  I  am  having  trouble—I  haven’t  quite  deter-

utes.

mined the correlation yet, but I will figure it out.

I  just  want  to  comment,  the  examples  you  have  given  are  pri-
marily  from  Portland,  and  Mr.  Gingrey  talked  about  Georgia  and
so  forth,  but  what  about  the  frozen  North?  Michigan  has  a  par-
ticular  problem,  and  I  am  from  Michigan.  We  are  even  worse  off
than  Minnesota  and  Wisconsin,  which  are  to  the  west,  because
there,  it  freezes  and  it  stays  frozen  for  four  months,  and  then
thaws. In Michigan, it freezes and thaws every couple of weeks. We
have an incredible amount of freeze-thaw cycle, which really weak-
ens our systems, and leads to a lot of maintenance problems.

How  does  pervious  material  work  in  a  constant  freeze-thaw
cycle?  And  in  particular,  if  you  have  a  roadway  get  a  lot  of  water
in, it freezes very hard at night, and may stay that way for several
days,  what  does  that  do  to  the  permeable  surface,  or  the  pervious
surface, I should say? Any comments?

Mr.  HUFFMAN.  I  definitely  have  a  comment,  Congressman

Ehlers, and Members of the Committee, thank you.

The  American  Concrete  Institute  and  other  organizations  have
done  extensive  studies  to  determine  the  freeze-thaw  durability  of
previous  concrete,  in  particular,  and  we  have  mostly  empirical
data,  but  there  are  laboratories  at  universities  across  the  country
that  are  evaluating  it  also  under  laboratory  conditions.  And  their
findings are very supportive of its use for freeze-thaw durability cli-
mates.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

I  can  assure  you  that  before  major  big  box  builders  went  in  to
a city like Denver, which they claim to have more cycling than any-
body  in  the  country,  but  there  are  some  other  places  that  would
make the same claim, they looked very carefully at this technology,
and  with  their  consultants,  they  determined  that  the  data  that  we
presented was sufficient, and it is being well proven in the field in
a number of, in all applications that we know of, and after probably
more  than  ten  years  at  various  locations  around  the  country,  we
are  not  aware  of  any  suspected  deterioration  anywhere  due  to
freeze-thaw cycling with pervious concrete.

Mr. EHLERS. Up in Eastern Michigan?
Mr.  HUFFMAN.  I  think  on  a  very  limited  basis,  that  would  be
driveways  and  sidewalks  and  such,  nothing  that  would  be  a  well
documented commercial application.

Mr.  EHLERS.  I  would  be  very  interested  to  see.  Denver,  in  spite
of  the  fact  they  claim  everything,  certainly  has  big  swings  in  the
freeze-thaw  cycle,  but  they  have  far  less  frequent  freeze-thaw  cy-
cles  than  the  Upper  Midwest  does,  so  well,  when  you  find  some
data,  or  you  find  some  people  in  Michigan,  I  would  be  very  inter-
ested, if you encounter that some time in the future.

Mr. HUFFMAN. Yes, sir.
Mr. EHLERS. With that, Mr. Chairman, I yield back.
Chairman  WU.  Thank  you.  Mr.  Huffman,  let  me  follow  up  on
that  research,  or  research  and  development  question,  and  with  re-
spect  to  high  traffic  or  high  use  areas.  Are  there  further  areas  of
research that are necessary before permeable pavements are used?
The  examples  that  you  showed  earlier  are  very  impressive,  but
those tend to be in parking lot settings. What about high use envi-
ronments like highways?

Mr.  HUFFMAN.  Yeah.  You  are  absolutely  right.  There  isn’t  yet
enough  data  to  support  the  use  in  highway  applications,  in  par-
ticular. It is the speed of traffic, it is not necessarily the loads that
are  carried  in  terms  of  18  wheelers  and  such.  We  have  actually
been  able  to  handle  those  loads  in  parking  lot  applications  well
with  pervious  concrete.  But  more  study  is  definitely  required  rel-
ative to highways.

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you.  And  Mr.  Huffman  and  Mr.  Kassoff,
are there some challenges in acceptance of this technology by build-
ings  and,  you  know,  the  construction  industry?  Are  there  further
steps  that  need  to  be  taken,  either  in  the  public  or  private  sector,
for faster takedown of these technologies?

Mr. KASSOFF. The national organization that all of the State De-
partments  of  Transportation  belong  to,  AASHTO,  we  have  men-
tioned it several times, has a national testing program. Each state
has its own laboratories, but they have a more efficient, integrated
approach  in  recent  years  for  industry  to  bring  products  for  testing
and evaluation, and I think as, again, we look for outcomes and we
leave  industry  with  flexibility,  the  need  for  those  testing  programs
is even greater. The mechanisms are definitely there.

There is no question that more research into the hard technology
is needed, as well as the application of the institutional framework
of  Triple  Bottom  Line  that  we  mentioned  earlier.  But  yes,  that
would  all  contribute  to  advancing  sustainability  in  infrastructure
more rapidly.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

Mr.  HUFFMAN.  Chairman  Wu,  thank  you.  I  would  like  to  add
that  the  major  owners  in  private  enterprise  are  generally  sup-
portive  of  this  technology,  and  what  happens  is  when  they  move
down to the regional and local level, they very often are faced with
regulators  who  just  are  not  yet  aware  of  the  technology,  in  spite
of  the  fact  that  it  is  an  EPA  best  management  practice  for  first-
flush  pollution  mitigation,  and  the  EPA  is  very  supportive.  Many
of  these  agencies  don’t  have  BMPs  relating  to  low  impact  develop-
ment,  much  less  pervious  concrete,  and  as  they  transition  in  that
direction,  we  will  expect  that  they  will  find  the  means  to  become
knowledgeable enough to be positively responsive.

Chairman  WU.  So,  that  local  level  of  regulation  is  also  very  im-

portant in the takedown of this technology.

Mr. HUFFMAN. Absolutely, sir.
Mr.  KASSOFF.  And  I  would  just  add,  that  in  addition  to  regula-
tion,  I  think  part  of  what  Mr.  Huffman  is  talking  about,  and  I
would  second,  is  education.  It  is  a  broadening  of  the  horizons  of
what  is  possible,  so  that  the  engineers  that  Congressman  Ehlers
encountered in the future are engineers who are seeking out these
alternatives  and  have  places  to  go  for  referents  to  find  that  they
do work.

Chairman  WU.  Commissioner  Adams,  you  showed  me  some  resi-
dential  developments,  which  were  truly  outstanding,  and  the
thoughtfulness with which they planned out the disposition and the
flows  of  groundwater.  Some  developers  do  that,  some  developers
don’t do that. What are some of the factors that go into that private
sector  developer  decision,  and  what  can  we  do  to  encourage  more
residential development that uses green street concepts?

Mr.  ADAMS.  Thank  you  Mr.  Chair.  I  think  we  in  the  local  level
in Portland, as I touched on earlier, have been first doing our own
research  and  development,  so  that  we  can  prove  to  ourselves  and
the  private  sector  that  the  green  stormwater  approach  works,
whether it is on the public right of way or on the private side.

We  also  regulate.  We  have  a  stormwater  development  manual
that,  for  new  construction,  establishes  that  minimum  amount  of  a
minimum green stormwater approach to new development or major
renovation of existing buildings. But then, we also try to—we don’t
like  to  rely  just  on  regulations.  Our  preference  is  to  be  partners
with the private sector, because it can be a win-win.

When  a  developer  develops  in  a  manner  that  takes  existing
stormwater off the system, that saves us money. In the short-term
it  saves  us  money  because  many  of  our  pipes  are  80,  90  years  old,
and therefore, inadequate or too small to handle the increased den-
sity  of  the  City  of  Portland.  We  will  also  partner  with  developers
by  paying  them  a  portion  of  the  cost  to  do  a  green  stormwater  de-
velopment  or  treatment  of  their  parking  lots  and  of  the  develop-
ment  that  they  are  looking  at,  because  we  actually  make  it  back
in  savings  over  a  very  defined  and  a  pretty  quick  period  of  time.
So,  in  some  ways  we  have  actuarial  sort  of  experience  now  with
how  much  we  can  incent  the  private  sector  to  do  the  right  thing,
and  when  we  will  get,  when  the  ratepayers,  the  city’s  ratepayers
for the sewer agency actually will get that benefit back.

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you  very  much.  Dr.  Ehlers,  further  ques-

tions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

Mr.  EHLERS.  Just  a  follow  up,  and  then,  I  think  we  will  all  be

wrapped up here.

Mr.  Kassoff,  you  have  gotten  off  relatively  free  so  far.  I  just
wanted  to  pick  your  brain  about,  since  you  have  a  lot  of  back-
ground  in  State  DOTs  and  AASHTO.  I  would  like  some  idea  from
about, first of all, what kind of barriers do you run into when advo-
cating  these  new  approaches?  Can  you  also  tell  the  Committee
about  how  these  group  efforts  that  we  are  talking  about  here  play
into the green highway R&D and implementation efforts?

Mr.  KASSOFF.  I  think  the  principal  barrier  is  one  of  lack  of
awareness  and,  in  some  cases,  leadership.  When  we  have  leader-
ship that says we are going to be green, and we are moving in the
direction  of  sustainability,  and  we  are  going  to  challenge  you,  the
engineers in our agency, to come up with different ways to achieve
that,  the  juices  start  flowing.  Actually,  people  move  out  of  their
comfort zone and create solutions.

And we have seen this in case after case. Oregon is a State that
is  a  leader  in  this  regard,  as  is  Washington  State,  New  York,  and
my  home  State  of  Maryland.  So,  it  is  very  much  a  cultural  and
leadership  type  of  issue.  And  it  is  a  matter  of  comfort  zone.  It  is
a matter of where the central tendency is, as a physician, and you,
as  a  physicist  I  should  say,  you  understand  that.  If  the  central
tendency is to just repeat what you have been doing in the past in
your  comfort  zone,  that  is  where  you  remain,  but  if  the  central
tendency,  because  it  is  part  of  the  organization’s  culture,  is  to  ex-
periment,  to  try  to  fulfill  a  broader  purpose,  such  as  sustainability
outcomes,  or  green  outcomes,  then  that  is  the  way  the  engineers
will want to move.

Engineers  are  problem-solvers,  and  I  think  they  thrive  on  chal-
lenges. Just going back to the same old manuals and the same old
practices,  which  don’t  achieve  these  new  expectations,  is  not  the
height of engineering to most professionals.

Mr.  EHLERS.  My  personal  experience,  most  of  the  opposition
came  not  so  much  from  the  engineers,  once  they  understood  what
was happening to the field, but from local government leaders, who
are afraid of headlines about this wonderful new project that came
in  25  percent  over  budget,  et  cetera,  and  that  is  the  big  fear.  And
so,  it  tends  to  spread  rather  slowly,  but  the  best  thing  is  to  have
success, present papers at national conferences, the National Asso-
ciation of Counties, the Municipal League, et cetera, and that then
convinces them.

I have no further questions, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman  WU.  Well,  I  thank  you  for  that  comment,  and  I  am
glad  that  Commissioner  Adams  has  had  a  platform  to  talk  about
some  local  successes.  Unless  Dr.  Gingrey  comes  back  from  the
Floor in the next few minutes, or unless Dr. Ehlers has any further
questions,  I  only  have  one  further  inquiry,  and  that  is  for  Mr.
Huffman and Mr. Kassoff.

What  sources  of  federal  support,  if  any,  whether  it  is  grants  or
technical assistance, or other forms, have been of assistance to you
in  developing  green  streets  technology  and  permeable  pavement
technology,  and  how  can  we  adjust  those  federal  efforts  to  be  best
supportive?  And  Commissioner  Adams,  if  you  want  to  take  a  shot
at that also, you are very welcome to.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

Mr.  HUFFMAN.  I  am  not  sure  where  I  have  seen  the  benefit  di-
rected  directly  from  the  funding,  but  what  we  do  need,  as  Mr.
Kassoff  said  earlier,  is  that  it  needs  to  focused  on  education,  and
the primary barrier is just that people don’t understand. The regu-
lators  are  not  necessarily  taking  negative  positions.  They  are  just
not aware of the technology, and so, the technology is unaddressed.
So,  for  an  owner  making  a  proposal  for  a  project,  he  sees  it  as  a
challenge  to  the  permitting  process  to  be  allowed  to  use  any  new
technology, and it is just easier not to submit.

Mr.  KASSOFF.  The  Federal  Highway  Administration  has  a  num-
ber  of  sources,  and  I  have  to  say  that  in  recent  years,  they  have
been in tune with this idea of environmental stewardship and con-
text  sensitive  solutions,  both  of  which  are  key  components  of  what
we are talking about here, green infrastructure.

On  the  research  end,  they  have  supported  research  into  this
area.  On  the  educational  end,  they  work  with  universities.  They
have  the  Council  of  University  Transportation  Centers  that  they
offer  grants  to.  We  would  like  to  see  the  universities  picking  up
more on what we call context sensitive solutions. Civil engineering
programs  around  the  country  have  definitely  moved  in  the  green
direction,  since  someone  as  old  as  I  am  went  to  civil  engineering
school.  So  that  has  been  a  positive  development.  But  this  idea  of
contextual  design,  that  the  one  size  does  not  fit  all,  and  we  have
to  achieve  these  sustainable  outcomes  by  applying  our  most  cre-
ative  engineering  tools,  that  is  something  that  needs  to  be  edu-
cated.

Finally,  in  the  regular  Federal  Highway  Program,  the  Federal
Highway  Administration,  through  initiatives  like  the  Green  High-
way  Partnership,  is  saying  funding  is  available  for  this  kind  of
thing.  The  Green  Highways  Partnership  has  adopted  a  pilot
project, actually not 25 miles from where we are sitting. It happens
to be U.S. 301 in Southern Maryland. It is a corridor in great need
of  some  improvement  and  has  now  become  the  testbed  for  green
highways  and  Green  Highways  Partnership  to  see  if  the  State
DOT,  which  in  Maryland,  has  been  extremely  progressive.  The
EPA,  which  has  been  a  leader  in  this  regard,  Federal  Highways,
who  has  put  funding  into  this  Green  Highways  Partnership  and
has  been  very  supportive,  and  local  governments,  all  in  combina-
tion with the private sector, can make it work.

So,  we  are  keeping  our  fingers  crossed  that  we  will  have  a  suc-
cessful  outcome  in  that  regard,  but  they  have  made  their  funding
available,  and  of  course,  there  is  not  sufficient  funding  overall  to
accomplish all of these objectives. That is for sure.

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Kassoff,  and  Commissioner

Adams, you may have the last word, if you so choose.

Mr.  ADAMS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chair.  Just  to,  I  think,  reiterate
some  points  that  were  touched  on  in  your  opening  comments,  and
that I sought to underscore in my testimony, and as well, has been
mentioned by the other witnesses.

The  effort  at  green  transportation  infrastructure  has  really  been
in  a  research  and  development  phase,  a  piloting  phase,  and  that
has  been  very  necessary.  What  I  hope  happens  is  that  we  go  from
there  to  the  strategies  and  the  investment  to  make  it  as  a  way  of
doing  business.  In  terms  of  local  governments,  what  they  really

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

need to see from the federal regulators is very explicit green lights
that  this  is  not  just  okay  to  experiment  with,  but  this  is  okay  to
begin  to  have  as  part  of  the  way  of  doing  business  and  managing
the transportation system.

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you  very  much,  and  I  want  to  thank  all
the  witnesses  for  your  testimony,  and  also,  for  your  forbearance
with  the  interaction  of  the  Committee  schedule  and  the  Floor
schedule.

The  record  will  remain  open  for  additional  statements  from  the
Members and for questions and answers to any follow-up questions
the Committee may ask of the witnesses.

The witnesses are excused, and the hearing is now adjourned.
[Whereupon, at 4:45 p.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(65)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Gloria M. Shepherd, Associate Administrator, Office of Planning, Envi-
ronment,  and  Realty,  Federal  Highway  Administration,  U.S.  Department  of
Transportation

Questions submitted by Chairman David Wu
Q1. How  does  FHWA  coordinate  with  the  EPA  to  ensure  that  new  technologies  fit
into the existing regulatory framework for stormwater management? Does FHWA
provide  testing  and  evaluation  results  that  can  be  used  to  demonstrate  a  tech-
nology’s  compliance  with  EPA’s  performance-based  standards?  Do  you  coordi-
nate with EPA to identify research needs and information gaps?

A1. FHWA and EPA coordinate at the national level through initiatives, such as the
International  Best  Management  Practices  (BMPs)  Database,  which  contains  care-
fully  screened  BMPs  and  information  on  the  appropriate  circumstances  for  their
use. We are working with a coalition of organizations to fund and manage the data-
base,  providing  data  analysis,  and  developing  protocols  for  integrating  low  impact
development  techniques  into  the  database.  The  work  is  ongoing  and  the  database
is currently accessible at the web site: http://www.bmpdatabase.org.

At  the  State  level,  State  departments  of  transportation  (DOTs)  coordinate  with
State water quality agencies, as well as EPA regional offices, to determine if newly
developed  technologies  will  meet  regulatory  standards.  FHWA  and  the  State  DOT,
in  consultation  with  State  and  federal  water  quality  regulators,  determine  if  the
technology will be appropriate for use in a highway setting. Safety and engineering
considerations also help to determine whether a particular technology is appropriate
for  use  on  a  project.  For  example,  many  current  low-impact  development  tech-
nologies,  such  as  rain  gardens,  may  be  appropriate  for  low  volume  residential
streets,  but  cannot  safely  handle  the  requirements  of  stormwater  removal  for  an
urban highway.

FHWA coordinates research needs at the national level with EPA through profes-
sional organizations, such as the Transportation Research Board (TRB) and the Na-
tional Cooperative Highway Research Program (NCHRP). There are several studies
done  through  NCHRP  that  are  coordinated  with  EPA.  One  report  of  such  a  study
is  ‘‘Evaluation  and  Best  Management  Practices  for  Highway  Runoff  Control,
NCHRP  25–20(1).’’  This  report  focuses  on  improving  the  scientific  and  technical
knowledge  base  for  the  selection  of  BMPs  through  a  better  understanding  of  BMP
performance and application. It documents the extensive research on the character-
ization of stormwater BMPs and the factors that influence runoff, such as land use
practice, hydraulic characteristics, regional factors, and performance evaluation. An-
other report is entitled ‘‘State Transportation Agency Strategies to Address NPDES
Phase  II  Requirements,  NCHRP  25–25(16).’’  This  report  looks  at  how  State  trans-
portation departments are addressing compliance with National Pollutant Discharge
Elimination  System  (NPDES)  Phase  II  requirements.  The  research  looked  at  staff-
ing  and  organizational  structure  throughout  the  entire  agency  regarding  NPDES
Phase  II  compliance  for  construction  activities,  as  well  as  the  stormwater  manage-
ment  program,  as  regulated  under  the  Municipal  Separate  Stormwater  Sewer  Sys-
tem  (MS4).  The  report  also  examines  inspection  systems  and  environmental  man-
agement systems, as well as recent trends concerning enforcement and methods for
achieving compliance.

We also coordinate our proposed research initiatives under the Surface Transpor-
tation Environment and Planning Cooperative Research Program (STEP) with other
federal agencies, including EPA. Research comments from other federal agencies are
given the highest priority in establishing our STEP research goals. FHWA is work-
ing  with  EPA  on  the  Mid-Atlantic  Green  Highways  Partnership  and  the  Great
Lakes  Initiative,  both  of  which  have  a  stormwater  research  and  technology  compo-
nent.  FHWA  also  supports  the  work  of  the  American  Association  of  State  Highway
and  Transportation  Officials’  (AASHTO)  Transportation  Environmental  Research
Ideas  data  base,  which  is  a  repository  for  ideas  on  needed  environmental  research.
We  are  encouraging  other  federal  agencies,  including  EPA,  to  contribute  ideas  to
this data base.

Another way that we are coordinating with EPA is through the Eco-Logical grant.
FHWA currently has an open solicitation that will provide $1,050,000 in grant funds
to  support  pilot  projects,  which  exemplify  integrated  planning  and  ecosystem-based
approaches to developing transportation infrastructure. EPA will be participating in
the technical review of the pilot project proposals, along with FHWA and represent-
atives from other agencies that participated in writing the publication entitled Eco-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

Logical:  An  Ecosystem  Approach  to  Developing  Infrastructure  Projects.  It  is  antici-
pated  that  this  joint  review  will  identify  additional  research  gaps  and  will  provide
incentive for other agencies to join FHWA in funding future Eco-Logical grants.
Q2. Of  the  State  Planning  and  Research  program  funding,  how  much  is  spent  spe-
cifically  on  green  transportation  infrastructure  R&D?  Does  FHWA  work  with
states to help them identify potential research opportunities in the field of green
transportation infrastructure?

A2. Section  505  of  title  23,  United  States  Code,  requires  that  States  set  aside  two
percent  of  the  apportionments  they  receive  from  the  Interstate  Maintenance,  Na-
tional  Highway  System,  Surface  Transportation,  Highway  Bridge,  Congestion  Miti-
gation  and  Air  Quality  Improvement,  Highway  Safety  Improvement  Program,  and
Equity  Bonus  programs  for  State  planning  and  research  (SP&R)  activities.  Of  this
amount,  states  must  allocate  25  percent  for  research,  development,  and  technology
transfer activities relating to highway, public transportation, and intermodal trans-
portation systems.

States select research projects to be funded with SP&R funds to address State and
local  needs.  However,  FHWA  Division  Office  staffs  have  a  continuing  relationship
with State research staffs and may provide advice and guidance as they develop the
projects  and  carry  out  their  research  program.  FHWA  encourages  States  to  use
some of their SP&R funds to participate in national research efforts, such as Trans-
portation  Research  Board  (TRB)  workshops.  In  addition,  FHWA  also  has  helped  to
bring  States  together  to  address  regional  research  needs.  The  Mid-Atlantic  Green
Highways Partnership (GHP) is one example of such FHWA coordination.

State  departments  of  transportation  have  used  SP&R  funds  for  substantial  re-
search into environmental issues, including regional stormwater issues and develop-
ment of best management practices suitable for the particular issues in that locality
or  state.  At  least  20  states  currently  have  active  projects  related  to  stormwater
management.  One  example  of  ongoing  research  related  to  stormwater  at  the  State
level is an ‘‘Investigation of Stormwater Quality Improvements Utilizing Permeable
Pavement  and/or  Porous  Friction  Courses,’’  which  is  being  sponsored  by  the  Texas
DOT  using  SP&R  funds.  The  Wisconsin  Department  of  Transportation  is  engaged
in  a  cooperative  research  project  with  the  U.S.  Geological  Survey  to  evaluate
stormwater treatment devices. The Oregon Department of Transportation is funding
a  project  to  develop  water  quality  monitoring  methods  or  testing  protocols  for  dif-
ferent  types  of  water  quality  facilities.  Also,  the  District  of  Columbia  DOT  is  also
conducting an evaluation of best practices for the reduction of transportation-related
stormwater pollution in Washington, DC.
Q3. In  your  testimony,  you  discussed  FHWA’s  Infrastructure  Research  and  Tech-
nology  program,  which  supports  R&D  for  innovative  highway  technologies.  For
those  technologies  considered  ‘‘green,’’  what  criteria  did  you  use  to  determine
that the technology is environmentally friendly? How do life cycle environmental
costs  affect  whether  a  technology  is  considered  ‘‘green’’?  What  do  you  consider
to  be  included  in  life  cycle  costs?  What  are  FHWA’s  plans  for  future  research
in this area?

A3. FHWA  characterizes  infrastructure  technologies  as  environmentally  friendly,  if
the  technology  will  mitigate  environmental  impacts  or  contribute  to  environmental
improvements.  For  example,  FHWA  considers  cantilever  construction  an  environ-
mentally  friendly  technology,  because  it  can  reduce  the  amount  of  ground,  water,
and  river  bed  disturbance,  as  well  as  minimize  noise,  dust,  and  erosion.  Cantilever
construction  also  can  reduce  construction  time,  which  minimizes  the  environmental
impacts of a project.

Life  cycle  cost  analysis  compares  the  life  cycle  costs  of  two  or  more  alternatives
for a project, enabling the lowest overall cost alternative to be identified. Under life
cycle cost analysis, selection of a design alternative is not based solely on the lowest
initial  costs,  but  also  considers  all  the  future  costs  (appropriately  discounted)  over
the project’s usable life. Generally, the costs associated with construction, rehabilita-
tion,  and  maintenance  activities  of  each  alternative  being  compared  are  identified,
monetized, and then discounted to their present value. Life cycle cost analysis typi-
cally does not affect whether a particular technology is considered green.

However,  through  the  Highways  for  LIFE  program,  FHWA  is  seeking  ways  to
build  highways  and  bridges  faster  and  safer  (both  design  and  construction),  to  im-
prove quality, and to reduce costs. Decreasing the time a project takes to construct,
while using environmentally sensitive methods and increasing the longevity of a sec-
tion of highway or bridge, means there should be fewer adverse impacts to the envi-
ronment  resulting  from  construction  or  reconstruction  work.  In  this  way,  FHWA  is

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

promoting  longer  lasting  technologies,  which  in  turn  can  reduce  environmental  im-
pacts. Currently, there are 10 projects funded under Highways for LIFE.

FHWA’s  infrastructure  research  and  technology  programs  are  examining  a  num-
ber  of  technologies  with  potential  positive  environmental  benefits.  For  example,
FHWA  is  studying  numerous  technologies  to  optimize  pavement  performance  and
improve the quality of system performance and surface characteristics that are like-
ly to reduce adverse environmental impacts. This research includes innovative pave-
ment  technologies,  long-term  pavement  performance,  ‘‘warm  mix’’  technologies,
quieter  pavement  technology,  and  the  use  of  recycled  materials  in  pavement.  We
also  are  assessing  prefabricated  technologies  and  other  accelerated  construction
technologies  (such  as  cantilever  construction),  which  reduce  environmental  impacts
by moving much of the construction process to controlled environments and reducing
the  time  of  construction.  Research  on  reducing  the  frequency  and  duration  of  con-
struction work zones likely will have environmental benefits as well.

Questions submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey
Q1. Can  you  describe  FHWA’s  role  in  the  Green  Highway  Partnership?  How  did
your  agency  get  involved  in  this  activity  and  what  do  you  expect  your  role  to
be  in  future  years?  Will  FHWA  request  funding  for  this  partnership  beyond  the
current fiscal year?

A1. FHWA  is  one  of  the  original  partners  in  the  development  of  the  Mid-Atlantic
Green Highways Partnership, along with Region 3 of the EPA. FHWA provided the
initial funding for the initiative. To date, we have dedicated $825,000 to this effort,
along  with  staff  participation  in  initial  workshops  and  development  of  the  concept.
We  also  participate  on  the  sub-teams  of  recycling  and  reuse,  stormwater,  and  con-
servation  planning.  FHWA  employees  from  both  headquarters  and  Division  Offices
in the Mid-Atlantic region are engaged in the Green Highways Partnership.

In  2004,  EPA  Region  3  and  FHWA’s  Maryland  Division  Office  began  discussions
about hosting a regional forum on streamlining, stewardship, and watershed protec-
tion.  These  discussions  resulted  in  June  2005  executive  planning  meeting  in  Phila-
delphia,  PA,  where  50  senior-level  executives  from  the  public  and  private  sectors
came together to define and establish a vision for Green Highways. The initial orga-
nizing  efforts  culminated  with  a  Green  Highways  Forum  held  on  November  8–10,
2005,  in  College  Park,  MD.  The  forum  brought  together  several  hundred  federal,
State,  and  local  transportation  and  environmental  officials,  as  well  as  professionals
from  the  private  sector  and  trade  associations.  A  formal  Green  Highways  Partner-
ship resulted from the forum.

FHWA  expects  to  continue  its  co-leadership  role  in  the  Mid-Atlantic  Green  High-
ways  Partnership.  Our  goal  is  to  evaluate  if  such  a  partnership  can  improve  both
environmental  review  and  project  timeframes.  The  ongoing  Green  Highways  Part-
nership  pilot  project  on  Maryland  301  should  provide  us  with  more  information  to
determine  if  better  integrated  planning,  improved  recycling  and  reuse,  and  the  use
of  the  most  current  technologies  on  a  project  can  lead  to  the  regulatory  flexibility
needed to make a partnership of this nature a benefit to the transportation commu-
nity,  as  well  as  to  the  environment.  If  the  Mid-Atlantic  Green  Highways  Partner-
ship  provides  such  a  benefit,  our  future  role  may  be  to  work  with  EPA  to  extend
the partnership to other regions.

FHWA  intends  to  continue  our  financial  and  staff  support  of  the  Mid-Atlantic
Green Highways Partnership in FY08 through the Surface Transportation Environ-
ment and Planning Cooperative Research Program (STEP).
Q2. In his testimony, Mr. Kassoff urged federal officials to consider how they might
promote a focus on improving environmental quality rather than mitigating po-
tential  damage.  What  incentives  does  FHWA  have  in  place  for  projects  to  im-
prove  overall  environmental  quality  rather  than  simply  meet  regulations  meant
to avoid harm?

A2. Environmental  considerations  beyond  regulatory  requirements  are  reflected  in
transportation plans and projects based on the interests of the community, coordina-
tion with environmental groups and State and federal agencies, and input from the
public. FHWA has made a significant investment in programs to promote integrated
planning and context sensitive solutions to both avoid impacts to sensitive resources
and  to  design  transportation  facilities  that  are  compatible  with  the  important  re-
source and community needs in an area.

FHWA  works  to  showcase  important  ecosystem-based  mitigation  and  enhance-
ment projects through initiatives such as the Exemplary Ecosystem Initiatives (EEI)
program. FHWA currently has 43 designated EEIs, with a goal of 50 EEIs for 2007.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

EEIs clearly demonstrate how an ecosystem approach (e.g., watershed-based mitiga-
tion)  will  generate  benefits,  such  as  greater  predictability  in  transportation  project
timelines,  ability  to  address  multiple  project  impacts  in  a  comprehensive  manner,
more effective habitat conservation, and elimination of temporal loss of wetland and
riparian  areas.  To  be  designated  as  an  EEI,  the  scope  of  the  ecosystem  initiative
must be clear with respect to:

and enhance them;

• the  resources  in  question  and  the  need  for  innovative  solutions  to  preserve
• the overall goals, both from an ecosystem perspective and a highway perspec-
• the methodology used to bring about the solution (e.g., effective use of stake-

tive, that were met by the solution; and

holder involvement, innovative partnerships, and funding mechanisms).

FHWA  also  sponsors  the  biennial  Environmental  Excellence  Awards  for  eco-
system-based  mitigation  and  conservation.  Additionally,  FHWA  is  funding  the  Eco-
Logical  pilot  projects  grant,  the  purpose  of  which  is  to  support  pilot  projects  that
exemplify integrated planning and ecosystem-based approaches to developing trans-
portation infrastructure.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Benjamin H. Grumbles, Assistant Administrator for Water, U.S. Envi-

ronmental Protection Agency

Questions submitted by Chairman David Wu
Q1. How  does  EPA  determine  if  a  technology  fits  into  the  definition  of  green  trans-
portation  infrastructure?  How  do  life  cycle  environmental  costs  affect  whether  a
technology is considered ‘‘green’’? What do you consider to be included in the life
cycle costs?

A1. ‘‘Green Infrastructure’’ is a relatively new and flexible term, and has been used
by various speakers and writers in various contexts. EPA has recently defined green
infrastructure  as  a  way  to  protect  surface  waters  and  drinking  water  supplies,  re-
duce drinking water and stormwater treatment costs, reduce urban heat island im-
pacts, and provide more sustainable water resource management.

Similarly,  ‘‘green  transportation  infrastructure’’  is  not  yet  a  defined  term  of  art.
However,  EPA’s  Green  Highways  Partnership  has  focused  on  projects  that  go  be-
yond minimum standards set by environmental laws and regulations and integrates
transportation  functionality  and  ecological  health  to  provide  a  net  increase  in  envi-
ronmental functions and values of a watershed, while improving upon sustainability
for both the environment and transportation.

Green  highways  may  employ  a  number  of  practices  towards  achieving  this  out-
come,  including  the  use  of  permeable,  low-impact  practices  that  provide  high  per-
formance in reducing stormwater impacts, thus preventing stream bed scouring, ero-
sion and sedimentation and toxic pollutant runoff into streams and rivers; construc-
tion  with  recycled  materials,  thereby  reducing  landfill  usage;  and  design  using  cut-
ting-edge  technologies,  such  as  wildlife  corridors  and  strategic  conservation  to  pro-
tect  critical  habitats  and  ecosystems  from  the  encroachment  of  highway  infrastruc-
ture.

At  this  time  EPA  is  working  with  several  organizations  to  improve  our  under-
standing  of  the  costs  and  benefits  of  these  technologies,  including  their  operation
and  maintenance  needs  and  constraints  due  to  local  ordinances  and  building  codes.
While  some  of  this  work  is  being  conducted  through  research  opportunities,  EPA  is
also  participating  in  data  gathering  and  analysis  through  demonstration  pilots  and
benchmarking  studies  with  our  State  and  local  government,  non-government,  aca-
demic and industry partners. Some elements that are being examined include appli-
cation,  planning,  production,  operation,  and  maintenance  costs  for  these  tech-
nologies, as well as regulatory acceptance, market-based incentives and the benefits
derived  through  cleaner  water  and  air,  reduction  in  energy  consumption,  and  in-
creased economic growth.
Q2. How is data gathered on the effectiveness of particular transportation infrastruc-
ture  technologies  for  protecting  water  quality  or  managing  runoff?  How  does
EPA  use  the  data  and  information  produced  by  the  Federal  Highway  Adminis-
tration  to  determine  whether  a  technology  is  environmentally  beneficial?  What
additional data is needed, and which organizations or agencies are best situated
to  perform  additional  testing  and  evaluation?  How  do  these  technologies  con-
tribute to the Administration’s overall energy use reduction goals?

A2. Much of the data EPA has regarding the effectiveness of green technologies and
green  infrastructure  practices  has  been  the  result  of  research  and  intensive  moni-
toring conducted by a variety of Federal, State and local government agencies, aca-
demic institutions, non-profit and industry organizations and citizens. The data that
is  collected,  by  the  Federal  Highway  Administration  (FHWA)  and  other  entities,  is
shared  publicly 
International
Stormwater  Best  Management  Practices  Database  and  assorted  publications.
Through  sharing  information  and  data  on  best  practices,  EPA  is  promoting  the  use
of green technologies, where appropriate, throughout the country.

through  various  mechanisms, 

EPA  recognizes  the  importance  of  sound  science  in  the  decision-making  process,
including  the  decision  to  use  green  technologies.  We  are  supporting  a  robust  re-
search  program  to  study  the  efficacy  of  many  green  practices  in  varied  settings.  As
indicated above, EPA is working with several entities to improve our understanding
of  the  costs  and  benefits  of  these  technologies.  We  believe  that  the  information  de-
rived from this, and other independent research efforts, will demonstrate the energy
savings  achieved  from  green  infrastructure  projects  such  as  green  roofs  and  in-
creased tree cover, therefore placing even greater emphasis on the use of these tech-
nologies.  In  addition,  EPA  believes  there  is  great  potential  for  green  infrastructure

including 

the 

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

practices to reduce cooling costs and reduce pumping and treatment costs associated
with  managing  stormwater.  Still,  there  is  always  more  that  could  be  done  and  the
role  that  other  organizations  can  play  in  the  development  of  this  research  is  limit-
less.

In order to achieve successful outcomes in the evaluation, application, and under-
standing  of  green  transportation  infrastructure  technologies,  significant  collabora-
tion is needed to piece together aspects of a wide variety of regulations, procedures,
procurement  methods,  and  specification  requirements.  A  functioning  partnership  is
essential  to  develop  a  myriad  of  timely  solutions,  particularly  given  the  need  for
broader  outreach  and  awareness.  A  current  focus  of  the  Green  Highways  Partner-
ship is to implement pilot projects that demonstrate the concepts of green transpor-
tation infrastructure practices visibly and tangibly. Pilot projects will inform and in-
spire  the  implementation  of  practices  and  products  that  are  innovative,  efficient,
cost  effective,  and  environmentally  sound.  The  anticipated  outcome  of  the  pilots  is
to  demonstrate  sustainable  solutions.  Pilots  also  will  serve  to  improve  partnerships
and  research  efforts,  while  broadening  the  body  of  knowledge  on  green  transpor-
tation technologies.

Ouestions submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey
Q1. Can  you  describe  EPA’s  role  in  the  Green  Highway  Partnership?  How  did  your
agency  get  involved  in  this  activity  and  what  do  you  expect  your  role  to  be  in
future  years?  Will  EPA  request  funding  for  this  partnership  beyond  the  current
fiscal year?

A1. EPA  is  the  primary  sponsor  of  the  Green  Highways  Partnership  (GHP).  The
roots of the Green Highway Partnership run back to 2002, when the Federal High-
way  Administration  (FHWA)  named  environmental  stewardship  and  streamlining
one  of  three  ‘‘vital  few’’  goals.  This  marked  the  beginning  of  a  new  era;  substantial
FHWA investments and improved coordination with EPA resulted in a wave of envi-
ronmentally-focused  programs  and  documents  such  as  Context  Sensitive  Solutions,
the Exemplary Ecosystem Initiative, and Ecological: An Ecosystem Approach to De-
veloping  Infrastructure  Projects.  Recognizing  the  need  to  consolidate  the  myriad  of
aspects involved in the ‘‘greening’’ of U.S. highways, EPA set out to forge a new and
lasting  partnership  with  FHWA  and,  thus,  the  Green  Highways  Partnership  was
formed.

Providing  much  of  the  leadership,  conceptual  design,  organizational  support,  and
vision for this multi-disciplinary effort, EPA is committed to progress in the develop-
ment  of  green  highways,  not  only  in  the  Mid-Atlantic  but  in  other  regions  across
the  Nation.  EPA  has  committed  over  $1.4  million  to  this  innovative  program.  The
success  of  the  Partnership,  however,  has  not  been  the  result  of  any  one  individual
effort. EPA has combined its resources with that of our partners to leverage approxi-
mately $20 million dollars to reach the program’s goal of ‘‘beyond compliance, better
than  before.’’  Through  EPA’s  green  infrastructure  and  sustainable  infrastructure
strategies,  we  intend  to  continue  focusing  attention  on  greening  our  nation’s  high-
ways.  To  this  end,  EPA  will  pursue  all  opportunities  to  support  the  advancement
of this effort.
Q2. In  your  testimony  you  emphasized  the  need  for  cooperation  among  academia,
private industry, and the EPA Research Office to compile data regarding the ef-
ficacy of green technologies in various contexts. Does a coordinating mechanism
currently exist to guide this research?

A2. Certainly  there  is  a  need  for  cooperation  among  the  numerous  entities  with  a
stake  in  implementing  green  technologies.  Through  the  GHP,  EPA  has  been  work-
ing  cooperatively  with  a  variety  of  public  and  private  entities,  including  FHWA,  to
ensure  that  our  research  efforts  complement  one  another.  While  EPA  will  make  its
research  priorities  known  through  our  website,  many  times  we  reach  out  to  our
partners to seek their counsel and coordinate our efforts. In turn, agencies and orga-
nizations, such as FHWA and the American Association of State Highway Officials,
provide  EPA  with  notice  to  submit  proposals  for  environmental  research  ideas  and
opportunities  to  collaborate  on  research  needs.  Generally,  with  EPA,  much  of  this
activity is conducted via the web. However, through the network of Green Highways
partners,  we  have  expanded  data  and  information  gathering  efforts  through  which
to share and evaluate green technologies and their performance in supporting water
quality improvements and other environmental benefits. This venue includes, but is
not  limited  to  the  following:  monthly  and  quarterly  conference  calls  and  meetings,
design charrettes, workshops, conferences, newsletters and other published articles,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

webcasts,  web-based  training,  student-supported  programs  and  internships  (college/
university), and jointly-funded studies.
Q3. In  his  testimony,  Mr.  Adams  asked  federal  regulators  to  provide  ‘‘very  explicit
green  lights  that  this  is  not  just  okay  to  experiment  with,  but  this  is  okay  to
begin to have as part of the way of doing business.’’ Your written testimony and
the March 5th memo to the Regional Administrators assert EPA’s acceptance of
these  approaches.  Does  the  EPA  plan  further  actions  to  increase  awareness  of
green infrastructure approaches and there use?

A3. EPA  is  providing  clarification  to  regional  offices  and  State  NPDES  programs
that  green  infrastructure  technologies,  may,  in  the  appropriate  circumstances,  be
used  in  lieu  of  more  traditional  wastewater  treatment  collection  and  control  tech-
nologies  for  meeting  water  quality  objectives  in  permits  and  settlements.  As  with
any regulatory program, the necessary accountability provisions will be needed (e.g.,
Do  models  or  data  reasonably  predict  that  standards  will  be  met?  Are  appropriate
monitoring or evaluation provisions in place?).

In  addition,  EPA  is  developing  model  municipal  separate  storm  sewer  system
(MS4)  language  that  can  be  used  to  provide  permitting  authorities  and  permittees
alternatives  to  traditional  stormwater  management  measures.  We  are  also  docu-
menting examples of permits, combined sewer overflow long-term control plans, and
enforcement agreements that have included green infrastructure provisions. We are
also drafting some general information on how the permitting and enforcement proc-
esses  can  more  easily  facilitate  more  wide-spread  use  of  green  infrastructure.  EPA
is actively encouraging all permitting and enforcement authorities to harness oppor-
tunities  where  green  infrastructure  approaches  are  appropriate  and  effective  solu-
tions to water quality issues.
Q4. In  his  testimony,  Mr.  Kasoff  urged  federal  officials  to  consider  how  they  might
promote a focus on improving environmental quality rather than mitigating po-
tential  damage.  What  incentives  does  EPA  have  for  projects  to  improve  overall
environmental  quality  rather  than  simply  meet  regulations  meant  to  avoid
harm?

A4. EPA agrees with Mr. Kasoff that we should strive not only to mitigate potential
damage but also to improve environmental quality. As EPA Assistant Administrator
Grumbles  explained  in  his  March  5,  2007,  memorandum,  ‘‘Using  Green  Infrastruc-
ture  to  Protect  Water  Quality  in  Stormwater,  CSO,  Non-point  Source  and  Other
Water  Programs,’’  green  infrastructure  provides  many  positive  environmental  and
social  benefits,  including:  cleaner  water,  enhanced  water  supplies  (stormwater  per-
colation  through  the  soil  to  recharge  the  groundwater  and  the  base  flow  for
streams); cleaner air, reduced urban temperatures; increased energy efficiency; com-
munity livability and aesthetics; and cost savings. EPA supports local communities’
efforts to achieve all of these goals.

EPA  has  a  number  of  programs  that  focus  on  the  promotion  of  low  impact  devel-
opment (LID) and other community greening techniques that help local communities
to  develop  and  redevelop  in  a  more  environmentally  sustainable  manner.  Using
Clean  Water  Act  Section  319  grants  awarded  by  EPA,  states  have  focused  approxi-
mately $10 million on the implementation of projects including green roofs, rain gar-
dens, and bioswales, as well as projects that protect and restore valued riparian and
waterfront areas. Similar projects have been funded under the CWA’s State Revolv-
ing  Loan  Fund.  EPA’s  Brownfield’s  program  has  funded  projects  that  incorporate
green  infrastructure  into  redevelopment  activities  that  restore  vitality  to  many
urban neighborhoods.

We  believe  that  our  efforts  to  date  are  bearing  fruit,  as  we  see  more  and  more
communities  around  the  U.S.  working  to  integrate  green  infrastructure  into  their
programs  and  policies,  such  as  Chicago’s  commitment  to  greening  the  city  with
green  roofs  and  other  green  practices,  and  Kansas  City’s  commitment  to  create
10,000  rain  gardens.  In  addition,  many  cities  and  states  are  adopting  new  regula-
tions  and  policies  that  require  that  any  new  development  or  redevelopment  to  con-
sider  the  use  of  green  infrastructure  as  the  first  option  in  addressing  stormwater
that would result from the development.

EPA  supports  further  acceleration  of  local  communities’  use  of  green  infrastruc-
ture.  On  April  19,  EPA  Administrator  Steve  Johnson  signed  a  commitment  with  a
number of partnering organizations (including the Natural Resources Defense Coun-
cil, the National Association of Clean Water Agencies, the Low Impact Development
Center,  and  others)  that  expressed  the  signatories’  mutual  commitment  to  collabo-
rate  on  efforts  to  encourage  the  use  of  green  infrastructure.  We  are  working  to-
gether expeditiously to develop a joint agenda and to begin acting on various items,
including  developing  a  research  agenda,  providing  guidance  and  tools  that  promote

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

the  expanded  use  of  green  infrastructure,  analyzing  and  publicizing  the  economic
and  other  benefits  of  green  development,  and  other  action  items.  We  look  forward
to continuing to expand the number of states and communities throughout the coun-
try  that  incorporate  LID  and  other  green  approaches  as  critical  and  fundamental
components of their development and redevelopment policies and programs.

Lastly,  as  we  mentioned  in  our  response  to  Question  #2,  although  we  are  still  in
the  data  gathering  phase  with  our  Green  Highways  partners,  we  have  used  these
collaborative  research  and  demonstration  pilot  efforts  to  share  and  evaluate  green
technologies  and  their  performance  in  supporting  water  quality  improvements  and
other environmental benefits.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

Responses by Sam Adams, Commissioner of Public Utilities, City of Portland, Oregon

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Questions submitted by Chairman David Wu
Q1. How  has  the  City  of  Portland  used  information  on  green  transportation  infra-
structure  technologies  provided  by  federal  agencies  to  assist  in  developing  the
Green  Streets  Initiative?  As  a  city  executive,  what  strategies  would  you  rec-
ommend  to  the  EPA  and  FHWA  for  making  their  work  on  green  infrastructure
more accessible to local government officials?

A1. Portland  hasn’t  had  to  rely  on  the  assistance  of  federal  agencies  because  the
City’s green transportation initiatives pre-dated federal efforts by several years. For
example, our first parking lot swales were developed in the late 1980s. Our manual
of  stormwater  technologies  was  first  published  in  1999.  We  have  been  developing
and  refining  green  transportation  technologies  continuously  for  more  than  a  dozen
years.  We  recognized,  early  on,  that  the  City  could  employ  natural  systems  to
achieve  multiple  environmental  goals  at  lower  capital  costs  than  traditional
stormwater  infrastructure.  Since  then,  Portland  has  sought  opportunities  to  green
our infrastructure whenever practical. Early adoption of green technologies has been
propelled  by  overlaying  federal  requirements  to  protect  surface  water  and  ground
water  resources,  restore  endangered  fish  populations  and  restore  natural  habitats.
We recommend that EPA and FHWA work with NACWA, NRDC, State and local
stormwater  and  transportation  agencies,  academic  institutions  and  private  parties
to  develop  regionally-sensitive  guides  to  green  transportation  technologies.  These
guides would be indispensable to communities that are at the early stages of devel-
oping stormwater management plans to comply with the Clean Water Act. Wherever
possible, EPA and FHWA should build on the extensive work of existing stormwater
utilities, actively engage State and local partners in the development of stormwater
guides, and develop extensive training programs to ensure local use of green trans-
portation infrastructure.
Q2. What  are  the  estimated  life  cycle  cost  savings  for  the  City  of  Portland  if  green
transportation infrastructure is used citywide? What factors are included in this
estimate?

A2. We  know  that  green  transportation  infrastructure  can  yield  construction  sav-
ings. We also know that green transportation technologies can be designed and con-
structed at savings of 20 percent to 63 percent when compared to traditional storm
sewer  solutions.  Our  most  simple  and  efficient  green  street  technology  (curb  exten-
sions) appears to cost less than half of the cost of sewer separation projects in Port-
land combined sewer basin.

On  the  operations  side,  we  expect  to  see  additional  savings  in  long-term  mainte-
nance  costs  as  our  experience  increases.  We  will  fully  document  the  added  value  of
green technologies as we improve our ability to measure and value ecosystem bene-
fits, such as improved air and water quality, increased natural habitat, lower energy
costs, increased carbon sequestration and reduced heat island effects.
Q3. You  recommend  in  your  testimony  that  the  Federal  Government  should  support
R&D  for  new  green  technologies.  In  your  opinion,  what  are  the  most  pressing
research  needs  in  the  field  of  green  transportation  infrastructure?  Should  Fed-
eral  R&D  programs  focus  more  strongly  on  technology  development  or  testing
and evaluation? How would the City of Portland use the results of the R&D you
recommend?

A3. As  you  are  aware,  green  transportation  infrastructure  relies  on  natural  proc-
esses to capture, treat, transport and dispose of stormwater runoff. Soils and plants
are  integral  components  of  green  technologies.  While  we  are  experienced  in  design-
ing  and  constructing  green  facilities,  we  have  much  to  learn  about  the  interplay  of
soils and plants within these facilities.

We  recommend  that  Federal  R&D  programs  focus  on  documenting  the  natural
functions  of  green  technologies,  specifically  the  performance  of  plants  and  soils
under varied conditions, in varied combinations, to achieve varied stormwater man-
agement  objectives.  Investment  must  be  made  in  both  testing  and  development  to
ensure  successful  implementation  of  green  transportation  infrastructure.  Research
undertaken  nationally  will  substantiate  the  impacts  of  slope,  soil,  depth  to  ground-
water, and other factors that determine effectiveness. Robust monitoring and testing
conducted  over  an  extended  period  of  time  will  allow  cities  to  determine  the  most
effective locations, conditions and compositions of each type of green technology and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

provide  meaningful  performance  information  and  guidance  about  effective  mainte-
nance regiments.

Portland invests limited rate-payer resources to test and monitor the effectiveness
of  our  green  technologies.  However,  our  results  are  specific  to  the  geology,  geog-
raphy  and  hydrology  in  Portland.  While  this  information  maybe  indicative  of  how
facilities can be useful, success will not be assured without performance information
from  a  variety  of  conditions.  Portland  will  benefit  from  national  research  that  en-
gages State and local stormwater agencies, academic institutions and private stake-
holders.  A  broad-based  approach  to  the  research  will  produce  more  comprehensive
evaluations  and  deepen  our  collective  knowledge  of  green  technologies.  We  rec-
ommend  that  all  research  findings  be  made  readily  available  to  all  interested  par-
ties as the research unfolds.

Question submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey
Q1. During  your  testimony,  you  asked  federal  regulators  to  provide  ‘‘very  explicit
green  lights  that  this  is  not  just  okay  to  experiment  with,  but  this  is  okay  to
begin to have as part of the way of doing business.’’ Mr. Grumbles’ written testi-
mony  states,  ‘‘EPA  believes  that  green  infrastructure  approaches  and  practices
can be a significant component of State’s and cities’ programs to reduce and con-
trol  stormwater,  combined  sewer  overflows,  and  non-point  source  pollution.’’
This  sentiment  also  appears  in  his  March  5th  memo  to  EPA  regional  adminis-
trators. What other actions do you suggest EPA take to meet your request?

A1. We  applaud  Mr.  Grumbles’  commitment  to  green  infrastructure  and  stand
ready  to  work  with  the  EPA  to  develop  any  policies  that  further  the  use  of  these
green technologies. Mr. Grumbles has given life to a fundamental change in the way
we  think  about  stormwater,  the  way  we  manage  the  built  and  natural  landscapes,
and the way we regulate watershed health and water quality.

Portland’s  success  in  adopting  and  advancing  green  technologies  depends  on  a
fundamental  rethinking  of  our  laws,  engineering  principals,  design  standards,  util-
ity  operations  and  public  engagement.  This  rethinking  must  include  EPA  and  ex-
tend  to  State  and  local  governments.  Without  a  close  partnership  with  federal  and
State  regulators,  municipalities  will  not  be  able  or  willing  to  expend  the  time  and
resources to advance this initiative.

EPA’s  green  infrastructure  policies  must  be  guided  by  measurable  federal,  State
and  local  performance  goals.  EPA  should  encourage  adaptive  management  to  con-
vert  learning  into  continuous  improvements,  and  renew  its  commitment  to  green
technologies  through  the  periodic  refinement  of  laws  and  regulations  to  eliminate
uncertainty  and  obstacles  to  progress.  For  optimum  success  of  green  technologies,
commitment  to  these  innovations  must  be  expressed  and  memorialized  in  laws,
intergovernmental  agreements  and  permits  that  can  be  sustained  across  federal,
State and local administrations.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Daniel  J.  Huffman,  Managing  Director,  National  Resources,  National

Ready Mixed Concrete Association

Questions submitted by Chairman David Wu
Q1. Please describe the type of maintenance pervious pavements require. With proper
maintenance,  how  long  will  the  pavement  maintain  optimal  filtering  perform-
ance?  What  are  the  effects  on  filtering  if  maintenance  is  not  performed?  At  the
end of the pavement’s life cycle, can it be disposed of in a conventional manner?
A1. Pervious  concrete  pavements  are  infiltration-based  systems.  Water  passing
through  the  pavement  will  carry  with  it  varying  degrees  of  soluble  and  insoluble
pollutants  and  debris.  Most  of  this  debris  will  be  deposited  on  or  near  the  surface
of  the  pavement.  Optimal  performance  of  pervious  concrete  requires  that  the  void
structure  be  maintained  to  provide  sufficient  infiltration  of  stormwater.  The  major-
ity of pervious concrete pavements function well with little or no maintenance.

Maintenance  of  pervious  concrete  consists  primarily  of  prevention  of  clogging  of
the  void  structure.  This  can  be  achieved  by  vacuum/sweeping  or  pressure  washing
the pavement. Independent studies have shown each of these procedures to be effec-
tive in restoring the infiltration capabilities of the pervious concrete to accommodate
design  storms.  Research  conducted  by  the  Florida  Concrete  and  Products  Associa-
tion,  and  reported  in  the  American  Concrete  Institute’s  Committee  522,  Pervious
Concrete  Report,  quantifies  the  extent  of  contaminant  infiltration  in  pervious  con-
crete pavement systems. Five existing pervious concrete parking lots were examined
in the study, and the level of contaminant infiltration was found to be in the range
of 0.16 to 3.4 percent of the total void volume after eight years of service. Sweeping
the surface of the pervious concrete immediately restored over 50 percent of the per-
meability of the clogged pavement.

A  University  of  Central  Florida  (UCF),  report  titled  Construction  and  Mainte-
nance  of  Pervious  Concrete  Pavement,  published  in  January,  2007  documents  the
findings of a study conducted on eight existing pervious concrete parking lots, rang-
ing  from  six  to  20  years  of  service.  The  sample  lots  were  evaluated  to  determine
the infiltration rates of pervious concrete systems that received relatively no mainte-
nance. Infiltration rates were measured using an embedded single-ring infiltrometer
developed  specifically  for  testing  pervious  concrete  in  an  in-situ  state.  In-situ  infil-
tration  rates  ranged  from  2.1  to  75.4  inches  per  hour,  which  indicates  that  sample
lots though compromised, had retained functionality.

From  the  eight  parking  lots,  a  total  of  30  pervious  concrete  cores  were  extracted
and evaluated for infiltration rates after various rehabilitation techniques were per-
formed  to  improve  the  infiltration  capability  of  the  concrete.  The  techniques  were
pressure  washing,  vacuum  sweeping  and  a  combination  of  the  two  methods.  Re-
searchers  found  that  the  three  methods  of  maintenance  investigated  in  this  study
typically  resulted  in  a  200  percent  or  greater  increase  over  the  pre-treatment  infil-
tration rates of the clogged pervious concrete cores. Thus, with respect to longevity,
the UCF study indicates that even minimal maintenance will ensure long term per-
vious functionality.

Frequency of maintenance is, in part, a function of the site and the pavement de-
sign. The pervious concrete system should be designed such that washout from adja-
cent soil areas is not allowed to drain onto the pavement. Periodic visual inspection
of the pavement can determine when cleaning is necessary. The typical maintenance
schedule, as included in the Environmental Protection Agency’s (EPA) Best Manage-
ment  Practices  for  Stormwater  Management:  Porous  Pavements  Facts  Sheet,  calls
for  monthly  visual  inspection  of  the  pavement  to  ensure  that  it  is  clean  of  debris
and  that  it  sufficiently  dewaters  between  storms;  vacuum/sweep  or  pressure  wash
on  an  ‘‘as  needed’’  basis;  and  annual  inspection  of  the  surface  for  deterioration  or
spalling.  Average  costs  for  maintenance  of  pervious  concrete  can  range  widely,  de-
pendent on the amount of sediment and debris that is allowed to collect on the pave-
ment.  Common  practice,  however,  shows  these  costs  to  be  minimal,  in  most  cases
limited  to  similar  costs  for  sweeper/vacuum  of  conventional  pavement.  One  option
is  to  include  maintenance  planning  as  part  of  the  original  project  cost,  which  typi-
cally represents a very small percentage of that cost.

In  a  2003,  the  City  of  Olympia,  Washington  issued  its  Report  on  Cleaning  of  Po-
rous Concrete Sidewalk. The sidewalk, installed in 1999, was 5.5 feet wide and 1,500
feet  long  and  had  maintenance  performed  for  four  years.  The  void  structure  was
visibly  clogged  with  debris  from  tree  leaves  and  needles,  and  had  moss  growing  in
the  most  abundantly  clogged  areas.  The  city  successfully  used  pressure  washing  to

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

clean  out  the  debris  in  a  mere  41  man-hours.  Following  the  washing,  the  surface
pores were visibly clean and open.

Pervious concrete, similar to conventional concrete, is manufactured using no haz-
ardous  materials.  While  the  pervious  concrete  pavement  system  does  filter  certain
chemicals,  heavy  metals,  and  other  pollutants,  these  suspended  solids  occur  within
the  filter  bed  and  earthen  sub-base  below  the  actual  pervious  concrete.  Therefore,
pervious  concrete  that  has  reached  the  end  of  its  life  cycle  can  be  recycled  and/or
disposed of by conventional means.
Q2. What  channels  exist  for  industry  to  introduce  green  transportation  technologies
and  show  proof  of  concept  to  State  and  federal  regulatory  agencies?  What  ac-
tions should the Federal Government take to encourage both private development
and private adoption of new technologies?

A2. NRMCA  believes  that  one  of  the  ways  it  can  support  the  introduction  of  green
pavement  technologies  is  through  advancement  of  highly  developed  standards  com-
bined  with  a  robust  construction  training  programs.  NRMCA,  along  with  the  Port-
land Cement Association (PCA), are active in the development of guideline specifica-
tions for the design and use of pervious concrete through participation in the Amer-
ican  Concrete  Institute  (ACI)  standard  setting  committees.  Currently,  NRMCA  and
PCA  are  working  through  ACI  Committee  522  towards  the  revision  of  ACI  522R–
06  which  addresses  pervious  concrete  construction  and  maintenance.  NRMCA  and
PCA  are  also  finalizing  a  document  on  design  of  pervious  concrete  pavements  for
structural  and  hydrological  requirements  that  will  include  software  to  assist  in  de-
sign applications.

NRMCA  is  involved  in  a  newly  formed  American  Society  for  Testing  and  Mate-
rials  (ASTM)  subcommittee  to  develop  standards  for  testing  and  evaluation  of  per-
vious concrete. An NRMCA staff member chairs this subcommittee. ASTM is an or-
ganization that develops consensus standards that are used globally for various ma-
terials  and  products.  In  addition,  to  enhance  greater  utilization  of  pervious  tech-
nology,  NRMCA  has  embarked  on  a  national  program  for  the  certification  of  Per-
vious  Concrete  Contractors  which  has  resulted  in  1200  certifications  in  the  last  18
months.

Moreover,  in  order  to  provide  a  practical  response  to  the  growing  interest  in  per-
vious  concrete  pavements  for  stormwater  management,  the  American  Concrete
Pavement Association (ACPA) has released a new publication, ‘‘Stormwater Manage-
ment  with  Pervious  Concrete  Pavement.’’  This  user-friendly  document  details  appli-
cations, considerations, limitations, and benefits of pervious concrete on stormwater
management.

The  concrete  industry’s  training  efforts  have  been  complimented  by  the  EPA,
which has accepted pervious concrete as a recommended Best Management Practice
(BMP)  for  stormwater  management  on  a  local  and  regional  basis.  However,  due  to
a  lack  of  understanding  of  the  efficacy  of  the  BMP,  many  State  and  local  planners
still  have  failed  to  fully  utilize  pervious  concrete  and  some  have  actually  excluded
pervious  pavements  from  their  own  BMPs.  It  is  clear  that  this  is  a  problem  that
needs to be addressed on a regional basis by means of further education on the part
of both EPA and industry.

One  vehicle  for  providing  timely  information  about  ‘‘state-of-the-art’’  technologies
and for accelerating their development and use are public-private partnerships. One
such  partnership  is  the  Mid-Atlantic  Green  Highways  Partnership  (GHP)  of  which
NRMCA  and  ACPA  are  active  members.  The  GHP  has  diverse  members  including
the Industrial Resources Council, the Conservation Fund and the Pennsylvania De-
partment  of  Environmental  Protection.  The  GHP  is  grounded  in  a  commitment  to
developing  ecologically  advanced  infrastructure  projects.  GHP  seeks  to  transform
the manner in which the Nation’s transportation infrastructure is planned and con-
structed  through  a  blending  of  integrated  planning,  regulatory  flexibility,  and  mar-
ket-based rewards. Included in this effort is the goal of achieving broader utilization
of  green  pavement  technologies  that  will  help  support  superior  watershed-driven
stormwater management. In this regard, the GHP provides a unique opportunity for
industry  to  collaborate  with  Federal,  State  and  local  governments  to  introduce
‘‘state-of-the-art’’  technologies  such  as  pervious  concrete.  In  fact,  the  GHP  has  pro-
duced  a  cooperative  partnership  between  EPA’s  Region  III  and  NRMCA  leading  to
a  research  grant  for  Villanova  University  to  evaluate  the  water  quality  and  other
attributes  of  competing  porous  pavement  systems.  The  grant  has  come  from  EPA
with  assistance  from  the  RMC  Research  and  Education  Foundation  and  Villanova
University.

One  of  the  principal  benefits  of  the  GHP  is  that  it  allows  for  the  front-loading  of
the  environmental  review  process  through  demonstration  projects  that  can  dem-
onstrate proof of concept. NRMCA believes that proof of concept must involve an in-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

tegrated planning approach that provides for early stakeholder involvement prior to
initiation of the National Environmental Policy Act process. In order to secure regu-
latory  acceptance  of  the  technology  and  to  streamline  the  permitting  process  it  is
often  necessary  to  front-load  consultation  and  coordination  with  citizens  and  local
government  agencies  in  order  to  fully  educate  them  about  the  benefits  of  using
green  pavement  technologies  as  a  tool  to  comply  with  various  environmental  re-
quirements. As part of the GHP, NRMCA has recently made a commitment to par-
ticipate  in  the  U.S.  301  Waldorf  Maryland  Transportation  Improvements  Project
that  will  provide  a  forum  early  in  the  environmental  impact  assessment  stage  to
meet with regulators and train them on utilizing pervious concrete as an alternative
for  meeting  low-impact  development  (LID)  and  stormwater  management  objectives.
Similarly,  NRMCA  looks  forward  to  working  with  EPA  Region  III  and  the  FHWA
as  part  of  the  Anacostia  Restoration  Project  which  supports  LID  and  sustainable
transportation systems in and around the Anacostia watershed in the District of Co-
lumbia and Maryland.
Q3. What R&D, including testing and evaluation, is required to make pervious pave-
ment more feasible for use in higher traffic areas, such as roads and highways?
What are the costs and benefits of expanding the use of pervious pavement?
How difficult is it to get construction contractors to use green transportation in-
frastructure  technologies?  What  additional  education  is  necessary  to  encourage
builders  and  architects  to  specify  green  technologies  in  their  design  plans?  Is
there  a  role  for  the  Federal  Government  in  educating  builders,  architects,  and
other engineers?

A3. The  federal  tax  code  provides  about  $500  billion  each  year  in  incentives  in-
tended  to  encourage  socially-valued  activities,  including  homeownership,  charitable
contributions,  health  insurance,  and  education.  NRMCA  believes  that  adoption  of
green  pavement  technologies  should  be  included  as  one  of  these  socially-valued  ac-
tivities.  By  supporting  new  green  technologies,  the  government  can  offer  every
American  an  opportunity  to  enjoy  higher  water  quality  and  a  better,  more  sustain-
able environment at lower costs.

One model for rewarding socially-valued activity is the Energy Policy Act of 2005,
which  offers  consumers  and  businesses  federal  tax  credits  for  purchasing  fuel-effi-
cient hybrid-electric vehicles and energy-efficient appliances and products. The ben-
efits  to  the  environment  in  terms  of  reduced  air  pollution  of  buying  and  driving  a
fuel-efficient  vehicle  and  purchasing  and  installing  energy  efficient  appliances  and
home improvement products are obvious. Consumers who purchase and install spe-
cific products such as energy efficient windows, insulation, doors, roofs and heating
and cooling equipment in the home can receive a tax credit of up to $500 for eligible
purchases. In the same manner, homeowners that install a pervious concrete drive-
way  should  be  eligible  for  a  proportionate  tax  credit  for  helping  to  reduce
stormwater runoff. Also, businesses that employ pervious concrete pavement around
buildings  (walkways,  courtyards,  etc.)  and  parking  areas  and  low  volume  roads  in
housing  subdivisions  should  be  eligible  for  tax  credits  on  both  new  construction  as
well as improvements to existing properties.

Tax credits are generally a more valuable incentive than an equivalent tax deduc-
tion  because  a  tax  credit  reduces  tax  dollar-for-dollar,  while  a  deduction  only  re-
moves  a  percentage  of  the  tax  that  is  owed.  Yet,  there  are  also  beneficial  models
for  tax  deductions  that  have  proven  to  be  effective  in  environmental  clean-up.  One
example  is  the  Brownfields  Tax  Incentive  that  was  passed  as  part  of  the  Taxpayer
Relief Act of 1997. Brownfields are properties where reuse is complicated by environ-
mental contamination concerns. The incentive allows a taxpayer to fully deduct the
costs  of  environmental  cleanups  in  the  year  the  costs  were  incurred  rather  being
capitalized and spread over a period of years. Its purpose is to spur the cleanup and
redevelopment  of  brownfields.  A  similar  tax  incentive  should  be  afforded  to  devel-
opers  who  replace  antiquated  conventional  stormwater  management  systems  in  in-
dustrial  and  residential  properties  with  an  LID  approach  that  combines  a
hydrologically  functional  site  design  with  pavement  technologies  like  pervious  con-
crete  to  compensate  for  land  development  impacts  on  hydrology  and  water  quality.
Other  examples  of  support  for  environmentally  preferable  products  can  be  found
in  federal  procurement  policy.  In  1983,  EPA  promulgated  the  first  federal  procure-
ment guideline that required all federal and all State and local government agencies
and  contractors  that  use  federal  funds  to  implement  a  preference  program  favoring
the purchase of cement and concrete containing fly ash. EPA published a summary
of  information  pertaining  to  coal  combustion  products  use  in  an  environmental  fact
sheet, Guideline for Purchasing Cement and Concrete Containing Fly Ash (EPA530–
SW–91–086,  January  1992).  In  addition,  Executive  Order  (E.O.)  12873,  Federal  Ac-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

quisition,  Recycling,  and  Waste  Prevention,  signed  on  October  20,  1993,  directs  fed-
eral agencies to develop affirmative procurement programs for environmentally pref-
erable  products.  With  respect  to  the  cement  and  concrete  containing  fly-ash,  E.O.
12873 requires that 100 percent of the purchases meet or exceed the EPA guideline
standards  unless  written  justification  is  provided  that  a  product  is  not  available
competitively  within  a  reasonable  time  frame,  does  not  meet  appropriate  perform-
ance  standards,  or  is  only  available  at  an  unreasonable  price.  These  same  types  of
procurement requirements would be highly effective drivers of green pavement tech-
nologies  in  federally  supported  combined  sewer  overflow  projects  as  well  as  in  sur-
face transportation projects that present stormwater management challenges.

Congress  has  also  recognized  the  importance  of  using  innovative  technologies  in
water  quality  management,  both  in  terms  of  funding  research  into  possible  new
technologies and in demonstrating existing (but relatively new) technologies. In the
1977  Clean  Water  Act  amendments,  Congress  established  a  three-year  innovative
and alternative technologies (known as ‘‘I/A’’) program. The I/A program helped suc-
cessfully  move  technologies  such  as 
land  treatment  of  wastewater,  sludge
composting and alternative collection systems from relative obscurity to widespread
acceptance. For example, the I/A program documented successes and problems with
ultraviolet  disinfection.  This  method  is  now  routinely  accepted  as  an  alternative  to
chlorination,  especially  where  there  are  concerns  about  security  or  toxic  effects  of
residual  chlorine  and  chlorine  byproducts.  The  program  also  demonstrated  that  I/
A technologies can reduce costs while increasing environmental performance.

To  further  encourage  research  into  innovative  green  pavement  technology,  it  is
critical  that  EPA  establish  both  a  research  and  development  program  and  a  dem-
onstration grant program. The research program should be aimed at: (1) increasing
the effectiveness and efficiency of water supply systems (including source water pro-
tection, stormwater reuse, and protection of the hydrology of wetlands, streams and
sub-surface waters); (2) encouraging the use of innovative or alternative approaches
relating  to  reduction  of  impervious  surfaces;  and  (3)  increasing  the  effectiveness  of
waste water systems through incorporation of impervious pavements, nonstructural
alternatives, water efficiency, and methods of dispersing, reusing, reclaiming and re-
cycling wastewater.

The  demonstration  grant  program  should  target  water  quality  management  and
enhancement  by  promoting  innovations  in  technology  and  alternative  approaches
with  the  goal  of  reducing  municipal  costs  of  complying  with  the  Clean  Water  Act.
Communities  selected  for  grants  must  describe  a  strategy  by  which  the  demonstra-
tion  grants  could  achieve  similar  goals  as  (1)  those  mandated  by  the  Clean  Water
Act  (e.g.,  requirements  of  stormwater  permits  under  the  National  Pollution  Dis-
charge  Elimination  System)  or  (2)  those  that  could  be  achieved  by  traditional
stormwater  management  methods.  The  Administrator  should  provide  grants  for
water  supply  or  water  quality  matters  relating  to  urban  or  suburban  population
pressure;  difficulties  in  water  conservation  and  efficiency;  non-point  source  pollu-
tion; sanitary or combined sewer overflows; or a lack of an alternative water supply.
Precedent for a recommended EPA demonstration grant programs that would sup-
port green pavement technologies can be found in the Surface Transportation Envi-
ronment  and  Planning  Cooperative  Research  Program  (STEP),  administered  by  the
Federal  Highway  Administration  (FHWA).  The  general  objective  of  STEP,  which
was created by SAFETEA–LU in Section 5207, is to improve understanding through
research  of  the  complex  relationship  between  surface  transportation,  planning  and
the  environment.  STEP  is  the  sole  source  of  SAFETEA–LU  funds  available  to  con-
duct  FHWA  research  on  planning  and  environmental  issues.  It  has  already  ad-
dressed  specific  high  utility  stormwater  initiatives  including  the  International
Stormwater  Best  Management  Practices  Database,  Evaluation  and  Update  of
FHWA Pollutant Loadings Model for Highway Stormwater Runoff, and Synthesis on
the  Fate  and  Effects  of  Chloride  from  Road  Salt  Applied  to  Highways  for  Deicing.
Ultimately,  to  ensure  that  green  pavement  technologies  are  actually  deployed,
State  and  local  planners  and  agencies  responsible  for  administering  of  the  Nation’s
water quality program have to have confidence that all proven technologies are fully
available  to  them  to  meet  the  Clean  Water  Act’s  goals  and  requirements.  As  such,
it is recommended that Section 603(c) of the Clean Water Act be amended to identify
that  financial  assistance  is  available  from  the  State  Revolving  Loan  Fund  program
for stormwater management projects, to include the use of pervious pavement tech-
nologies.

NRMCA appreciates the opportunity to answer questions submitted for the record
by  Members  of  the  Subcommittee.  If  you  need  additional  information,  please  feel
free  to  contact  Robert  L.  Sullivan,  NRMCA’s  Senior  Vice  President  of  Government
& Legal Affairs at (240) 485–1148 or at rsullivan@nrmca.org.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Hal  Kassoff,  Senior  Vice  President  for  Sustainable  Development,  Par-

sons Brinckerhoff

Questions submitted by Chairman David Wu
Q1. What State or federal regulations have affected your company’s green infrastruc-

ture practices?

A1. With transportation representing the largest part of our business, federal regu-
lations  relating  to  NEPA,  Clean  Water,  Clean  Air,  Historic  Preservation,  Rare  and
Endangered Species, Storm Water Management, and Noise all have a profound im-
pact  on  the  projects  that  we  work  on  for  our  clients.  While  each  area  has  its  own
legislation  and  regulations,  and  this  in  and  of  itself  can  be  problematic,  the  pre-
vailing  approach  among  them  when  it  comes  to  the  potential  impacts  associated
with projects can perhaps best be described as ‘‘avoid, minimize, mitigate.’’ This con-
cept  is  reasonable  as  a  regulatory  foundation  for  achieving  green  infrastructure.  A
minimum  bar  must  be  set  to  protect  our  resources  and  that  bar  is,  in  essence,  de-
fined by those three words—first do no harm if that is possible, and if some degree
of  harm  is  unavoidable  then  the  next  rung  on  the  ladder  is  to  minimize  that  harm
with  all  reasonable  measures,  as  well  as  mitigate  the  harm  by  somehow  replacing
the  functional  value  of  what  was  lost—this  could  mean  anything  from  wetland  cre-
ation  to  enhancing  an  historic  district.  The  ‘‘affect’’  of  these  regulations  is  to  allow
many projects to proceed but to do so in as green a manner is possible.

However,  there  is  often  even  more  that  can  be  done  if  our  mindset  is  advanced
one more notch from avoid, minimize and mitigate harm to creating a positive (bet-
ter  than  before)  net  outcome  with  respect  to  the  natural,  social  and  built  environ-
ments.  This  simply  means  that  in  addition  to  meeting  regulatory  standards  for
avoiding,  minimizing  and  mitigating  harm,  transportation  and  environmental  re-
source  professionals  might  seek  outcomes  in  which  at  little  or  no  additional  cost,
measures  might  be  taken  to  improve  upon  the  environmental  footprint  that  pre-ex-
isted the project. Such opportunities most often arise from the fact that the vast ma-
jority of projects—certainly in the highway business—involve upgrading existing fa-
cilities,  few  of  which  were  built  to  current  standards  of  environmental  protection.
The  problem  is  that  to  do  more  than  regulations  require,  by  definition  is  impos-
sible  to  regulate.  So  when  we  ask  what  can  be  done  from  a  regulatory  perspective
to  improve  the  likelihood  of  achieving  ‘‘green  infrastructure’’  the  answer  has  to  be
nothing  beyond  the  avoid,  minimize  and  mitigate  harm  ‘‘standard’’  and  then  every-
thing  to  encourage  voluntary  efforts  to  find  reasonable  and  affordable  ways  to  go
beyond  regulatory  minimums  as  a  normal  matter  of  doing  business—with  the  at-
tendant  benefits  of  an  improved  natural,  social  and  built  environment,  and  im-
proved  relationships  and  greater  trust  between  project  sponsors  and  resource  regu-
lators.
Q2. In your opinion, what are the most pressing research needs in the field of green
transportation infrastructure? Should federal R&D programs focus more strong-
ly  on  technology  development  or  testing  and  evaluation?  How  would  Parsons
Brinckerhoff use the results of that R&D?

A2. A  particularly  pressing  need  involving  research  is  to  improve  the  ability  of  re-
source agencies to have access to and to apply the science, and a factual foundation,
behind what are perceived, but are not in fact always proven to be, the real harmful
effects of projects, as well as the real benefits of mitigation and enhancement meas-
ures.  This  point  is  perhaps  best  illustrated  with  a  story  about  one  of  the  most  sig-
nificant  environmental  challenges  I  had  encountered  in  my  40  plus  years  in  this
business.

We  had  completed  and  received  federal  approval  of  the  Environmental  Impact
Statement  for  a  long-awaited  highway  project  and  after  an  additional  two  years  to
complete final design and acquire right-of-way, we were stopped in our tracks at the
wetland  permitting  stage  when  federal  resource  agencies  told  us  that  notwith-
standing the approved EIS, the project would not receive necessary wetland permits.
The  reason  cited  was  that  during  the  permit  review  stage  it  was  determined  that
the wetland impacts were too severe and that design changes would be needed, even
though they would delay the project by over a year and add $20 million in cost.

After engaging a renowned wetland expert to assess the situation we learned from
him the good news was that the resource agencies were mistaken and were, in fact,
reacting  literally  to  surface  appearances  in  attempting  to  protect  a  pristine  looking
wetland  area  that  was  actually  created  by  poor  drainage  from  an  adjacent  project.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

81

The other somewhat ironic news we were given was that while the area the resource
agencies  wanted  to  protect  could  not  be  backed  up  by  a  factual  analysis,  there  was
indeed  another  area  that  had  been  dismissed  as  being  of  low  value—again  largely
due to surface appearances—which had a very significant function as a wetland due
to  its  sub-surface  connection  to  important  aquifers.  So  in  the  end  we  suffered  the
delay  and  most  of  the  additional  cost,  but  had  the  satisfaction  of  knowing  that  the
harm we prevented was real.

Related  to  the  need  to  get  the  information  to  practitioners  and  ensure  that  it  is
used,  is  the  need  for  better  information  about  what  mitigation  measures  are  most
effective  and  which  ones  are  marginal.  Again,  using  wetlands  as  an  example,  how
effective have the many thousands of very small, on site, difficult to maintain miti-
gation  sites  proven  to  be  compared  to  some  of  the  larger,  off-site  and  even  out-of-
watershed measures, such as wetland banking.

Finally,  is  it  possible  to  develop  cross  functional  green  infrastructure  mitigation
to  address  situations  where  the  resource  affected  is  not  particularly  scarce  and  re-
placing the loss would have marginal, if any benefit, but on the other hand another
resource, which was perhaps not affected, is threatened. So instead of replacing five
acres  of  wetland  adjacent  to  a  50,000  acre  wetland  system  would  it  be  of  greater
value  to  use  mitigation  funding  for  upland  habitat  preservation  in  connection  with
an  endangered  mammal?  What  are  the  tradeoffs.  How  are  they  quantified?  What
are the institutional barriers and how can they be overcome?

Questions submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey
Q1. Does  current  research  successfully  encapsulate  the  local  environmental  factors
that  affect  Best  Management  Practices  which  are  appropriate  for  different  envi-
ronments?  Does  for  instance,  the  International  Stormwater  Best  Management
Practices Database include all of the relevant performance data? And if not, are
the gaps known and being addressed by State or federal research programs?

A1. While  I  am  unable  to  respond  to  these  questions  I  have  asked  members  of  our
firm who might be able to address them to do so. (Their response follows.)

Many  excellent  studies  have  been  conducted  to  evaluate  the  performance,  pollut-
ant  removal  efficiency  and  cost  of  various  types  of  storm  water  BMPs.  Of  these  re-
search  projects,  however,  only  a  few  were  specifically  designed  to  study  geographic
variation.  EPA  has  published  some  information  regarding  site  specific  BMP  infor-
mation, regional limitation and operation and maintenance burdens of these BMPs,
but  not  in  great  and  practical  details  sufficient  to  guide  selection  and  installation.
Cooperative  research  efforts  such  as  the  International  Stormwater  BMP  Database
project  have  done  an  excellent  job  in  reaching  out  and  collecting  storm  water  BMP
data.  The  sites  contained  in  the  database  to  date,  however,  are  not  yet  geographi-
cally diverse. A large amount of data has come from a small number of states, such
as  California,  Texas,  and  Florida.  Not  many  BMP  data  represent  the  Northeast,
Mid-Atlantic  and  Midwest.  For  the  State  of  Maryland,  for  example,  only  two  BMP
data  sets  were  presented  despite  the  numerous  storm  water  BMPs  that  have  been
applied  in  the  past  two  decades.  This  poor  geographic  distribution  of  the  data  set
makes  study  of  the  geographic  variation  in  BMP  performance  statistically  difficult.
Another gap in research is the type of BMPs being studied. For example, one can
more  readily  find  detention  pond-based  BMPs  performance  data,  mainly  due  to  its
long  history  of  implementation.  One  can  also  find  many  proprietary  BMPs,  such  as
hydrodynamic  devices,  on  the  Internet  particularly  due  to  commercial  interests.  By
comparison, there is limited information and research related to low impact develop-
ment (LID) BMP techniques such as bioretention, grass swales, and infiltration.
Q2. What  recommendations  do  you  have  for  improving  university  awareness  and

education of green infrastructure practices?

A2. Clearly  our  universities  as  well  as  our  agencies  and  businesses  that  employ
practitioners would benefit from greater cross fertilization of ideas—through intern-
ships  among  students,  continuing  education  for  practitioners,  conferences,  and  the
like.  The  notion  of  green  infrastructure  in  the  U.S.  is  still  relatively  new  but  inter-
est in it is growing very rapidly. Certainly if Congress expressed its interest in and
provided  additional  funding  for  research  and  educational  programs  centered  upon
green  infrastructure  (hopefully  with  earmarks),  that  would  send  a  powerful  mes-
sage.
Q3. How can federal agencies such as FHWA and EPA create incentives for projects
to  improve  environmental  quality  rather  than  simply  meet  regulations  to  avoid
harm?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

82

A3. The most important aspect of this question is the implied recognition that regu-
lations  will  not  succeed  in  going  beyond  the  ‘‘avoid,  minimize  and  mitigate  harm’’
standard.  Simply  put,  what  we  need  is  ensure  success  of  the  current  Green  High-
ways Partnership ‘‘experiment’’ in the Mid-Atlantic.

Transportation agencies which become convinced that a ‘‘better than before’’ envi-
ronmental  stewardship  ethic  is  not  only  the  right  thing  to  do  but  yields  practical
benefits  in  gaining  the  trust  and  confidence  of  resource  agencies  will  clearly  move
in  that  direction.  Similar  movement  is  needed  among  resource  agencies  to  see  that
win-win outcomes are possible with their pro-active support and that a track record
of  poor  relationships  and  frequent  appeals  means  that  they  may  not  be  working
hard enough to find win-win solutions.

While  doing  more  than  meeting  minimum  requirements  to  improve  the  environ-
ment will not happen through legislation, programs to identify, recognize, celebrate
and spread the word about green infrastructure successes in the U.S. and elsewhere
can and should be defined.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(83)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

STATEMENT OF THE INTERLOCKING CONCRETE PAVEMENT INSTITUTE

84

Mr.  Chairman,  my  name  is  Randall  G.  Pence,  Capitol  Hill  Advocates,  Inc.  I  am
pleased to offer testimony on behalf of ICPI, the Interlocking Concrete Pavement In-
stitute with offices at 1444 I St., NW, Washington, DC 20005.

ICPI  represents  producers  and  installers  of  segmental  interlocking  concrete  pav-
ers in the United States, Canada and elsewhere. ICPI is the voice of the segmental
interlocking  concrete  pavement  industry  and  is  the  leader  in  efforts  to  develop  the
industry in the Americas through technological research, engineering, product devel-
opment and innovation, marketing, government relations and public relations.

Segmental  interlocking  concrete  pavements  provide  multiple  benefits  of  interest
in public policy. For the purposes of today’s hearing, I will focus on the characteris-
tics of paver surfaces as permeable interlocking concrete pavements (PICP).

PICP  are  comprised  of  a  layer  of  concrete  pavers  placed  in  layers  of  small  stones
and  separated  by  joints  filled  with  even  smaller  stones.  Permeable  pavements  pro-
vide  tremendous  stormwater  runoff  advantages.  The  concrete  paving  units  are  not
permeable,  but  the  joints  between  them,  typically  5–10  mm  wide,  provide  perme-
ability.  They  allow  water  to  percolate  through  the  base  materials  to  be  absorbed  in
local  soils  rather  than  flow  across  non-pervious  pavements,  carrying  surface  pollut-
ants to the Nation’s rivers. Further, there is a filtration benefit as stormwater trav-
els though the permeable pavements and the in situ soils.

PICPs  are  highly  effective  in  providing  infiltration,  detention  and  treatment  of
storm  water  pollution.  The  base  can  be  designed  to  filter,  treat  and  slowly  release
water into a storm sewer or water course while providing a walking and driving sur-
face.  PICPs  answer  the  call  from  municipal  regulations  to  limit  impervious  covers
and  runoff  into  storm  drains  working  at  capacity,  or  when  sites  have  limited  space
for  detention  ponds.  The  U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency  and  several  State
agencies  consider  PICPs  an  infiltration  Best  Management  Practice  (BMP).  An  in-
creasing  number  of  cities,  counties  and  states  are  incorporating  them  into  land  de-
velopment  and  runoff  standards,  low-impact  development  guidelines  and  design
manuals on stormwater control.

With  proper  design,  material  selection,  construction  and  routine  maintenance,
PICP is a sustainable low-impact BMP used by landscape architects, architects, en-
gineers, developers and public agency staff. PICPs have been widely used across Eu-
rope,  especially  Germany  since  the  early  1990s.  The  paving  products  shown  in  the
exhibit attached to this testimony demonstrate runoff reduction and improved water
quality in a range of climates, soils, hydrological and regulatory environments.

As  urbanization  increases,  so  does  the  concentration  of  pavements,  buildings  and
other impervious surfaces. These surfaces generate additional runoff and pollutants
during  rainstorms  causing  stream-bank  erosion,  as  well  as  degenerating  lakes  and
polluting  sources  of  drinking  water.  Increased  runoff  also  deprives  groundwater
from  being  recharged,  decreasing  the  amount  of  available  drinking  water  in  many
communities. Recreational opportunities from lakes, streams and rivers decline from
the  impacts  of  urban  runoff.  Commercial  fishing  productivity  can  decline  in  estu-
aries and bays thereby negatively impacting regional economies. In response to envi-
ronmental and economic impacts from stormwater runoff, U.S. federal law mandates
that  states  control  water  pollution  in  runoff  through  the  National  Pollutant  Dis-
charge  Elimination  System  (NPDES).  Among  many  things,  the  law  requires  that
states  and  localities  implement  best  management  practices  BMPs  to  control  non-
point source pollution in runoff from development. BMPs can include storage, filtra-
tion and infiltration land development practices. Infiltration practices capture runoff
and  rely  on  infiltration  through  soils,  vegetation,  or  aggregates  for  the  reduction  of
pollutants.  Detention  ponds  are  a  common  BMP  example  used  to  hold,  infiltrate,
and  release  stormwater.  Infiltration  trenches  are  another  that  reduce  stormwater
runoff  and  pollution,  and  replenish  groundwater.  All  of  these  BMPs  provide  some
treatment and reduction of runoff pollutants.

In  preparation  for  this  hearing,  Subcommittee  staff  have  asked  ICPI  to  address

these issues:
1. What  environmentally-friendly  transportation  infrastructure  technologies  are
available  to  private  developers?  What  are  the  costs  and  benefits  associated  with
these  technologies?  How  do  these  technologies  contribute  to  environmental  protec-
tion, including pollution control and energy efficiency?

2. How  do  you  determine  if  a  technology  is  environmentally-friendly?  How  do  life

cycle environmental costs affect whether a technology is considered ‘‘green’’?

3. What  are  the  barriers  preventing  widespread  use  of  these  technologies  by  private

entities?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

85

4. What  actions  can  the  Federal  Government  take  to  encourage  use  of  these  tech-

nologies by private entities?
The first two questions may be attended in brief. Clearly, PICP are a prime exam-
ple  of  an  environmentally-friendly  transportation  infrastructure  technology  that  is
available to all developers—private, public, institutional, suitable at small and larg-
er  scales  for  residential,  commercial,  government,  military  construction  and  more.
Costs  vary  by  several  factors  including  location,  design  complexity  and  more  but
PICP  are  cost-competitive  with  other  paving  surfaces.  The  environmental  benefits
are as set forth above in the introduction to PICP: effective stormwater management
due to the permeable qualities of the product, improved water quality due to filtra-
tion  and  flood  control.  The  energy  efficiency  benefits  may  not  be  a  distinguishing
factor.

In determining if a technology is environmentally friendly, we would suggest that
a good test would be to assess whether a given technology tends to bring about envi-
ronmental conditions more like the conditions that would exist if there were no de-
velopment in the location in question. PICP meet this standard by providing a per-
meable  surface  that  can  provide  substantial  in  situ  absorption  and  infiltration  as
would be expected without development. Life cycle costing is always a factor for con-
sideration,  but  finding  a  valid  cost  comparison  for  a  life  cycle  analysis  could  be  a
challenge. For example, life cycle costs at a specific job site might be relatively easy
to estimate in the long term, it might be more difficult to estimate the out-year costs
of  failing  to  implement  green  technologies  because  those  costs  could  occur  down-
stream of the job site.

Further,  any  life  cycle  cost  analysis  should  address  infrequent  but  potentially
overwhelming catastrophic events that are more likely to occur downstream if inno-
vative technologies are not supported upstream.
Barriers and Solutions

Questions  3  and  4  describe  issues  that  could  suggest  remedial  action  to  be  sup-

ported by the Subcommittee and are best answered together.

The prime barriers to widespread adoption of green technologies in transportation,
and other construction sectors as well, are initial construction costs and the general
issue of local custom—that which is familiar and safe in the thinking of local archi-
tects, designers and engineers.
A. The construction industry is well known for intense pressures to build as quickly
and as inexpensively as the legislative, regulatory and codes schemes will allow. As-
suming  that  most  environmentally  friendly  construction  options  that  are  not  being
widely used are not being used because they are not the least costly options for ini-
tial construction, the solution would seem to be for government to provide financial
incentives  for  green  construction.  This  could  take  the  form  of  tax  incentives  such
as  targeted  tax  credits  for  using  approved  technologies.  Perhaps  accelerated  depre-
ciation would be attractive to private sector entities that would intend to build and
own  properties.  It  may  well  be  the  case  that  such  tax  incentives  would  be  less  ex-
pensive than the costs of catastrophic event responses in the future, but clearly, tax
incentives would be costly and controversial for that reason, though ICPI would sup-
port the concept.
B.  Another  cost-related  barrier  is  that  associated  with  setting  aside  valuable  land
area  for  open  space  to  provide  infiltration  of  stormwater.  Open  areas  can  provide
strong  environmental  benefits  but  carry  large  costs  which  are  a  prime  impediment
to  their  use.  Innovative  techniques  like  PICP  can  obviate  this  barrier  if  they  can
provide  a  dual  use  of  the  area,  for  example,  meeting  the  needs  for  parking  areas
and simultaneously providing infiltration opportunity in the same space because the
parking area is a permeable pavement. As Congress considers means to move green
construction technologies to the mainstream, it should recognize and provide incen-
tives for efficient use of the land that allow for development and good environmental
impacts  without  relying  solely  on  undeveloped  open  spaces,  catch  basins  and  other
costly  space-consumptive  sole-use  techniques.  We  should  assume  that  those  green
technologies that have lower costs in terms of dedicated land set-asides will be more
attractive to developers and face lesser barriers to adoption on this basis.
C.  Perhaps  the  more  pervasive  barrier,  and  one  which  Congress  might  help  sur-
mount for small commitments of funding, is the vexing problem of attracting to de-
viate  from  prior  practice  and  custom  and  to  adopt  new  technologies.  Local  govern-
ments and local markets have the primary impact on codes, regulations and customs
for  construction.  The  construction  industry  tends  to  stay  with  what  is  safe,  what  is
familiar, and what has been done before.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

Congress  can  have  positive  impacts  in  overcoming  this  barrier  by  providing  rel-
atively  modest  funding  for  innovative  technology  research,  engineering  and  dem-
onstration  projects  to  be  conducted  at  the  local  level,  helping  develop  local  famili-
arity, local applications, local reference data, local experience and expertise. Recipi-
ents  of  federal  grant  funding  for  this  purpose  should  be  made  available  to  State
water  pollution  control  agencies,  interstate  agencies,  other  public  or  nonprofit  pri-
vate  agencies,  institutions,  organizations,  and  individuals.  The  purpose  would  be  to
conduct  and  promote  the  coordination  and  acceleration  of,  research,  investigations,
experiments,  training,  demonstrations,  surveys,  and  studies  relating  to  the  causes,
effects,  extent,  prevention,  reduction,  and  elimination  of  pollution,  with  special  em-
phasis  on  demonstrating  uses  of  low-impact,  decentralized  stormwater  control  tech-
nologies  and  applications  using  permeable  pavements,  including  interlocking  con-
crete pavements, to prevent and control stormwater run-off at the source.

EPA has such a program in place. Unfortunately, it has not been funded consist-
ently  enough  to  reach  critical  mass  with  the  construction  community.  ICPI  would
recommend  that  the  Subcommittee  support  full  funding  for  currently  authorized
EPA programs to award such grants. What is needed is more funding, especially to
demonstrate the feasibility of technologies like PICP to local government authorities
who  determine  which  technologies  are  recognized  at  the  local  level  as  BMPs  for
stormwater  management.  This  is  crucial  to  widespread  adoption  of  innovative  new
BMPs.

ICPI is urging the House Interior Appropriations Subcommittee to direct funding
of  $2  million  in  FY  2008  to  fund  grant  programs  authorized  under  33  USC  §
1254(B)(3)  to  research  and  demonstrate  stormwater  mitigation  demonstration
projects  nationwide,  many  of  which  will  include  use  of  concrete  paver  technology.
We urge this subcommittee to support funding for these EPA grant programs.
D. As part of its stormwater mandate, EPA maintains the most comprehensive data-
base of BMPs in the world for the management and reduction of stormwater runoff.
EPA  uses  the  database  to  make  policy  decisions  and  impact  grant  funding  for
stormwater projects. But the database’s impact goes far beyond EPA. Other agencies
use  the  EPA  database  to  make  their  stormwater  design  decisions.  Private  compa-
nies, designers, architects, and engineers across the world use the database.

The BMP database needs to be updated to reflect a substantial body of new BMP
research. Yet, in the most recent fiscal years, funding for the Clean Water Act’s Sec-
tion 104(b)(3) funds which EPA would use to conduct the update have been reduced
and  eliminated.  The  BMP  update  would  significantly  add  to  information  regarding
the use of concrete pavers and permeable pavement systems for stormwater mitiga-
tion.

Congress  could  jump-start  the  BMP  update  by  restoring  modest  funding  for  both
the BMP update and the grant program for to ensure that the construction and de-
sign  communities  worldwide  could  access  the  latest  data  for  their  stormwater  miti-
gation  strategies.  Industries  would  offer  new  data  that  would  focus  on  the
stormwater potential of making routine use of permeable interlocking concrete pav-
ers to capture important environment benefits.

ICPI  is  currently  recommending  to  the  House  Interior  Appropriations  Sub-
committee that is renew funding of up to $200,000 in FY 2008 for the CWA Section
104(b)(3) programs to conduct a major overhaul and update of the EPA stormwater
BMP  database,  which  is  likely  to  include  a  substantial  upgrade  and  enhancement
of  the  data  describing  how  concrete  paver  technology  can  be  used  very  effectively
to  mitigate  stormwater  runoff.  We  recommend  that  this  subcommittee  support  the
recommendation.
E.  It  is  noted  in  the  hearing  background  documents  that  a  regulatory  barrier  to
widespread  adoption  of  innovative  technologies  may  be  due  to  EPA  regional  offices
taking  different  positions  on  whether  permeable  pavements  that  inject  into  the
ground should be considered point sources subject to permitting under the NPDES.
Clearly,  Congress  could  act  to  remove  this  barrier  by  passing  legislation  to  clearly
define  permeable  pavements  that  inject  into  the  ground  are  either  not  defined  as
point  sources  or  are  point  sources  exempt  from  permitting  requirements  under
NPDES.  EPA  should  be  tasked  to  standardize  regulatory  responses  among  the  re-
gional offices with regard to permeable pavements.

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  provide  the  views  of  ICPI.  We
look  forward  to  working  with  you  as  the  Subcommittee  considers  policy  responses
to  enhance  adoption  of  these  technologies  and  would  be  happy  to  address  the  Sub-
committee’s questions.

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:26 Aug 13, 2007 Jkt 034909 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I07\051007\34909 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

